CHAPTER I.
A scene in the Park, and a walk on the Battery
.
After your death you were better have a bad epitaph than their ill report
while you live.
They'll take suggestions as a cat laps milk.
Shakspeare.
Nor numbers, nor example, with him wrought
To swerve from truth.
Milton
.
Whoever
has been in the city of New-York, the great
centre of the commerce of the western world, must
remember
the marble front of the hall of justice, or City Hall.
Standing on the highest ground which the democratic system
of filling up hollows by levelling hills, or lifting the low by
removing
the superfluity of the high, has left to the great
commercial
metropolis. Lifting its stainless face in the midst of
catalpas and elms, poplars and sycamores, the pride of our
forests, this structure, towers,like the protecting genius of the
land, inviting strangers to take shelter under the guardianship of
law, and promising protection to the oppressed of all nations.
It was on a fine day in the October of 1811, about the hour
of noon, when the sun was shining bright and giving a dazzling
lustre to the front of this building, that two gentlemen came
from within, and descending the flight of stairs with the gay,
elastic and careless step of youth, bent their way down the
centre avenue of the enclosure, in eager conversation: only
interrupted by occasional bursts of laughter. It was plain that
they were not of the tribe to which this building seems
principally
consignedthe men of the lawthere was not the hurried
step, nor the thought-pressed brow; neither were they of the
class of jurors dragged reluctantly from their own immediate
affairs to
pass upon
the interests, or the lives, or liberties of
others: nor were they litigious clients, filled with doubts and fears
of the law's uncertainty, or vexed by its delaythey were light
and joyous as the day, (and what American knows not the
beauty of an October day,) and appeared to defy or be
unconscious
of the existence of laws, judges, or jurors, except as their
protectors from wrong. They were tastefully and fashionably
dressed, and the shortest, who was not quite six feet in height,
was a model of manly beauty; his companion was of the
square herculean form, full six feet high, with the nose of a
Roman Csar, the eye of a Spanish contrabandista, and the
complexion of a Circassian belle.
The trees of the Park, for so the enclosure is called, were
yet loaded with foliage, which the early frosts had changed from
the uniform verdant livery of summer, to the motley brilliancy
which distinguishes our autummal scenery, presenting every tint
from gaudy yellow to deep purple, through the intermediate
shades of orange and scarlet; from the brightest golden hue,
through various grades to the dusky brown, which denotes the
speedy separation of the leaves from their parent stock, and return
to that state in which they become its food.
To such of the busy citizens as, in crossing this triangular
pleasure-ground, find leisure to think of nature, this imperfect
glimpse of the beauties of American landscape might recall
other more variegated pictures; the scenery of our mountains,
forests, and prairies: but these young men were not, at the
moment our story begins, thinking of woods and wildsthe
beauties of nature occupied their thoughts, but they were
beauties
of a higher order, though as fleeting as the changing foliage
under which they loitered, laughed and lounged. They walked
half-way down the centre avenue and stopped, as if without
sufficient motive either to proceed or return; meanwhile the
more Apollo-like gallant sported with a terrier dog that
followed
him, and who was addressed by the familiar appellation of
Billy. After a few minutes of this wanton idling they, dog
and all, bent their way again towards the hall of justice;
appearing
to look for some one to join them from thence, and
they had nearly reached the portico when two very dissimilar
figures came out of the front door of the theatre apparently
from the box-office, and within view of the first-mentioned pair.
The Park theatre, as we all know, being in its position opposite,
or nearly so, to the hall of justice.
The walk to and from the hall took some minutes,
notwithstanding
that John Duncan, a Scotch traveller and A.B., says
the enclosure we have praised only contains half an acre. If
ever our North-British friend should be condemned for his sins
to make a pilgrimage of the circumference of his half acre, his
shoes lined with peas, we doubt not that he will be happy to
take a him from a brother pilgrim and penitent, of former days,
and be especially careful to have them well boiled.
A long loud laugh on the part of one of the first mentioned
gentlemen was followed by, He cannot certainly think of
marrying
her. Her personal attractions are not great, although her
professional skill and talents may be deemed so; besides, she's
a foot taller than little Spiff. They might play the giantess and
Tom Thumb. And her mysterious conduct in regard to
Trowbridge, both before and after his death, is too notorious to
allow of such an alliance with a man of Spiffards correct way
of thinking.
But, said the other, who was no less a personage than
Thomas Apthorpe Cooper, the justly celebrated histrion;
She bears the name of a man high in his profession as a
tragedian
,
and Spiff may know nothing of her story, as he came
to New-York after Trowbridge's death, and long subsequent to
the affair to which you allude.
He was then, and for some years before, in England, said
the other.
Hilson knew him there, said the tragedian, See, he is
coming out of the theatre with his friend Tam.
As we mention the names of two well-known personages,
and shall hereafter in the course of our narrative frequently
introduce more of the same description, let us pause for
explanation
.
When we call a character by the name of a real person,
dead or alive, still the actions of such character, as connected
with this tale, are in general purely imaginary; and the deeds,
thoughts and words imputed to him or her, mere inventions of
the author's brain, meant to give point to the moral of his story,
or add to the amusement of his readers. As Walter Scott
makes use of the names of Cromwell, Charles Stuart, Ireton,
Claverhouse, Montrose and others to decorate his characters
withal, so we in our humble history of domestic life, take
those of Cooke, Cooper, Hilson and other mimic heroes and
and mimic villains, for our purposes, as well as some well
known names of politicians and professional men of that time.
If the action or incident attributed to the person is real, the
reader may look for a note indicating it to be so. But we
will not, if we have any skill in our vocation, appropriate actions
to any one, bearing the name of a real personage, which shall
be at variance with the general character of the person from
whom the name is borrowed; although we might plead in
excuse
that, the great Scotch novelist has made the greatest man
in England play the part of commander of a sergeant's guard,
or a bailiff with a search warrant, when he (Oliver Cromwell)
was in possession of supreme power. Once for all, we protest
that this real history is an unreal mockery as it respects
characters
and events: all is a fabricated tissue wrought by the brain,
or the imagination, from the materials collected during a long
and variegated life. But as all images must have had
existence
from previous impressions made by realities, the
fantastic
combination, which we intend to present, may leave a
lesson
of profit on the memory, for the reader's conduct in real life.
For we do believe that our book contains true pictures of
human nature, and that the actions therein described are the
actions of men and women, appropriate to real men and women
in similar circumstances, and that the consequences we
attribute
to the actions of our imaginary characters are the result of
such actions
, and will ever result from them. Therefore is our
book, although a novel and a fiction, a book of truth; calculated
to amend the heart, while it enlists the imagination under the
colours of fancy.
But to proceed.The tragedian and his companion,
having
again turned, had reached one of the avenues of the Park
on the east side, and were in full view of the theatre.
The herculean gentleman took a quizzing glass from his
pocket and applying it to one eye, said, It is Spiff and Tam,
sure enough. Suppose you introduce the subject of the lady,
and the world's babble about her, to show Spiff that
we
have
heard something, if he has not.
Agreed, said the tragedian. We shall have some sport
at any rate. It will be nuts for Tam. The two gentlemen
from the theatre had now advanced to the gate of the park
opposite
Beekman-street, and were entering the enclosure.
As one of the new-comers is the principal actor in our
Drama, and as both once were the very soul of hilaritythe
delight of the laughter-loving throngs who crowd play-houses
to see the creatures of Shakspeare and Sheridan, Coleman and
O'Keefeto gaze at scenes of imaginary magnificence, and
forget the poverty they have left at home; as both are
important
to the readers of this work, and one the very pivot on which
all our machinery turns, we will introduce them by a graphic
description of their persons.
Zebediah Spiffard, or as his companions familiarly called
him, Zeb. Spiff. was in height rather less than five feet five
inches. He was remarkably square and muscular, at the
1*
same time that he looked attenuated from the absence of all
those unctuous particles which give plumpness and swelling
contour to persons who like him are possessed of youth, and
endowed with health, strength and activity. There was no
rounding of feature or limb; all was angular and sharp.
His head was large and thickly covered with coarse sandy hair,
(or rather a bright orange red,) and his face was long enough
for a man of six feet. This face was in every feature, and in
the physiognomical combination (if we may be allowed the
expression
)
truly remarkable. The forehead was low, the
eyebrows
bushy, strongly marked, and almost meeting; they were
attached to powerful muscles, and could be moved in various
directions: his eyes were large and prominent, the colour of the
iris hazle, naturally bright, but so covered by the upper lid, as,
when not animated by passion, or excited by mirth, to appear
sleepy and lifeless; yet occasionally full of fire; and capable,
in concert with the flexible brows, of great comic expression, as
well as strong and concentrated marks of emotion. The nose
belonging to this extraordinary face was thin, high, and
extremely
hooked; with wide, ever-moving nostrils. The cheeks
hollow, freckled, and pale; the mouth wide, lips thin, and
bloodless; teeth long, regular and white; the chin square, yet
sharp, having an edge though no point: in short, such a
combination
of feature and limb in face and person, was never seen
before nor since. Spitfard's gait was as singular as his
physiognomy
.
His step was long, slow, and slouching; and although
he bore his head erect (as most short people do) he walked with
his body bent a little forward at every stride. His voice was
strong and clear; usually pitched high, but of great compass;
and his enunciation was deliberate and distinct in conversation,
but on the stage, in such characters as required the effort, it was
uncommonly rapid, without losing force or distinctness. Such
was Zebediah Spiffard, a Yankee by birth, and a water-drinker
in practice.
Spiffard's companion at this time was Thomas Hilson; who,
in appearance was a contrast to the Yankee water-drinker,
though in height and breadth nearly the same, probably an inch
or two taller. His frame well proportioned to his head. His
muscles full and round. All his form indicating power without
the hardness of his companion's. His dark hair curled naturally
and gracefully. His forehead was high and white. His eyes
small, black, and laughing. His nose far from prominent, and
partaking of the rubies of his cheeks and mouth, which both
glowed with the richest natural carmine that health could
bestow
;
the cheeks and chin only rivalled by the colour of the lips.
His whole physiognomy marked by youth, fun, frolic, and
intelligence.
Hilson's gait was erect, firm, and elastic. His voice deep and
powerful. His enunciation always rapid, and accompanied by
a slight lisp. Such were the two dissimilar persons who now
joined the tragedian and his companion within the precincts of
the Park.
Well Tam said Cooper, accosting Hilson familiarly,
what is doing on the stage?
Strange doings are going forward, was the reply. Old
Cooke is rehearsing a love scene with Mrs. Trowbridge: that's
strange, because she generally chooses younger loversbut
what is not strangehe is under the influence of last night's
jollification: rather blind.
And how does Mrs. Trowbridge take blind love? asked
the tragedian, chuckling to find Hilson stumbling at the first
step on the subject he wished.
Very kindly, replied the ruddy comedian: as ladies
should take love. The blind are entitled to pity, and pity leads
the soul to love.
A man must be blind in some way or other who could make
love to Mrs. Trowbridge, said Allenfor such was the name of
the tragedian's herculean companion,the man with the imperial
nose, towering height, and circassian skin.
The four young men appeared to be well acquainted with
each otherindeed on terms of intimacyand when this chat
first began, Allen had saluted Spiffard with the air of every-day
familiarity. The latter had not yet spoken; but with a
constrained
smile and half closed eyes appeared not to notice the
words of his companions.
What do you mean? said the laughing tragedian,
addressing
the last speaker, sure you would not disparage her charms?
They are undeniably
great
. I think, Allen, she would overtop
you
. And for weightyour scale would kick the beam if we
gave you half a hundred as a make-weight.
Heaven forbid, replied Allen, that I should be weighed in
the same scales with a lady of such ponderous person and
gossimer
reputation. Besides, I hope never to come so near her high
weightiness as only to be divided from her by the length of a
scale-beam.
Spiffard affected to laugh. His face was convulsed. A slight
flush passed over his pallid cheek. His under mandible was
projected, and his thin lips quivered. He at length with a ghastly
smile said, very gallant! Gentlemen! Ha ha! Very gallant!
and no doubt very witty.
Does she not? asked Allen, sinking the last word in
Hilson's
ear.
It is more than suspected said Hilsonand as to the
mother here was another mysterious whisper, and Spiffard
made another convulsive and abortive attempt at a laugh.
I do not believe it of the daughter, said the tragedian.
By the by, Spiff, said Hilson, they begin to talk of you
and the lady; and it has been currently reported that you have
made proposalsand further
they do say
that she does not look
down upon, but condescendingly stoops to meet your lofty
pretensions
.
If it should be soall I say issuch a pair is the
long and the short of matrimonial felicity.
Ha ha ha! well said Tam!but will the water-drinker,
the man whose cold cup never coddles his calculation, the
philosopher
whose transparent draught never discolours the object
he contemplateswill he, take such a leap in the dark!
The cold-blooded sage whose cup can never excuse a
desperate
act! Why if common fame says true
The tragedian was fortunately interrupted. Spiffard cut short
the intended portentous
on dit
by exclaiming, You are very
facetious gentlemen! But I must stop the current of your
mirth even at the risk that its overflow may blast some
unprolected
name. I now inform you that your merriment is
misdirected
,
as the person of whom you speak is my wife. Mrs.
Trowbridge that
was
, is now Mrs. Spiffard. While the three
stood aghastafter a pause, he added, I am her protector
and
that
gentlemen,
is
the, long and the short, of it.
Great as we are at descriptions of the human countenance
divine, we will not attempt to portray the faces of either the
face-making tragedian or comedian, on hearing this speech from
Spiffard. The curtain no longer half hid the sleepy eye. It
turned flashing from one to the other, while the flushed cheek
and bent brow spoke displeasure. Allen, a mere tyro in the art
of face-making, was motionless and dumb. He looked any
where but at Spiffard. The tragedian and comedian (Cooper
and Hilson) exchanged glances; and the latter, with a tone in
which good sense and good nature combined said, Pooh, pooh,
we have carried the joke too farBeg your pardon, Spiff. We
knew it. Wish you joy with all my heart---but you deserve all
the hoax for stealing a march on us. A married man should
never attempt to pass for a bachelor. We shall insist on a treat
though---Ha, Cooper?---A rump and dozen.---We drink wine
though you don't. Ha!---what say you?---Wish you joy! and
so saying he took the manager's arm and they moved off across
the Park to Broadway. Allen was left with the Benedict, and
not having the facilities of the theatre, he very awkwardly
iterated
wish you joy---Mr. Spiffard! Then turned and followed
the heroes of the sock and buskin.
Poor Zeb---our hero--for he is the hero of this true history,
however defective he may appear, and shorn of the usual
qualifications
,
stood as fixed as an antique statue, although in contour
or attitude nothing like; his feet were thrown out like the
picture
(in that book of wonders, called the nine wonders of the
world) of the Colossus of Rhodes---and bending his head
forward
in the direction of his late tormentors, he ejaculated, Joy!
The joy ye wish me go with ye. Confound ye all!---what have I
to do with such jesters? Then turning towards the gate by
which he had entered, he strided slowly back from whence be
came, not knowing exactly what he aimed at or whither he was
going.
After a few long strides, which denoted rather the presence of
muscular power than presence of mind, he began to soliloquize
aloud. Was it a trick theatrical? Was it a habit derived from
the stage? Or is it natural and common to most men? We
are inclined to the latter opinion. We cannot recollect the time
when we did not think aloud, especially when under the
influence
of extraordinary excitement. Theatrical?---There are
many things and actions, which in vulgar parlance are called
theatrical, meaning thereby
unnatural
. Trust us, ladies, the
truly theatrical, is the truly just imitation of nature. The
writings
of Shakspeare are theatrical---the gesticulations of Cooke
and Garrick, of Kean and Kemble were theatrical; those of
Mr.  on the stage, or Mr.  in the pulpit, are neither
theatrical, nor natural. Butwhether you trust us or notZeb
began very naturally and audibly, thus: What do those
fellows
mean? He then took three strides. They are eminent
at a quiznotorious. But then it is plain that they did
not
know
that I was married; and they might have meant
Thus speaking, he opened the same gate at which he had
entered
in perfect tranquillity a few minutes before. This gate, as
mutable as his happiness, has long passed awaythrown by
split up to kindle some kitchen-wench's kettle-boiling fire--it
was unlike the iron enclosure of the present day, but was
a ricketty wooden pale-gate drawn back by a chain and bullet.
From my soul I hope--- You are very rude, Sir! squeak'd
a female voicefor he had most indecorously, though
unconsciously
,
pressed against a girl, who supposing he opened the
gate to let her pass, was entering the park---I hope it is all a
quiz, said Zeb, looking her full in the face without seeing her.
No quizzing matter, you ugly, impudent fellow. She passed
on, adjusting her bonnet. He went on talking. My mind
misgives meI now remember circumstancesI now
remember
Ihave
been precipitateperhapsHe walked faster,
and his strides became even longer. To marry on so short
an acquaintance
How do you do, my boy! cried a cheerful but harsh
voice; and looking up he saw George Frederick Cooke
descending
the stairs in front of the theatre.
The appearance of the veteran denoted that at least fifty-five
winters had passed over his head. His once athletic frame
had lost the rounded outline of youth, and assumed the hard
inflexible contours of age: yet his port was erect, and his step
though stiff was firm; especially when he was under the
influence
,
as at present, of the poison which was destroying him.
It might be said of him in Shakspeare's words,
He is in his fit now; and does not talk after the wisest.
His features were large, and had lost none of their plastic
powerthey could give form to the poet's airy creations, and
were capable of expressing the widest range of passion. His
forehead was broad, high, and prominent. His eyes of a
dark grey, the upper eye-lids projecting and filling the space
between the brows and the coloured portion of the organ.
When the pupil of the eye expanded, it gave to the whole iris the
appearance of brilliant hazle, almost black. The space
between
his brows was remarkably wide. His nose was aquiline
and broad, without deserving the epithet Roman. The
whole physiognomy denoted something uncommon, and by
nature, commanding. His grey hair was neatly dressed,
powdered
,
and (behind) gathered into a short
queue
, which, with his
suit of grey broad-cloth, gave him an old-school air, very
prepossessing
,
and every inch a gentleman.
Spiffard would willingly, at this time, have avoided him; but
the gay tragedian, (who was at the second day's progress in
one of those careers of folly which it is well known ended in
prostration of strength and intellect, and finally in death) had
taken enough of the stimulating poison to render him talkative,
and unceremonious; and had already seized the melancholy
comedian by the arm. The deference due to age, and to
the Drama's hero, rendered the miserable husband passive,
Cooke walked on, and talked on; while Spiffard sometimes
attending, and oftener thinking of home, and the scenes of
domestic
discord which his fears told him were preparing for
him, led the garrulous veteran down Broadway towards the
Battery.
We have got through rehearsal, said the tragedian, Not
very clear. It is sometime since I played Penruddock.
John's the best Penruddock. Black Jack, such was his
familiar appellation for his great rival, Kemble. I must read
the part before night. I should have
stuck
but for Mrs.
Trowbridge
.
She is a fine spirited widow; flesh enough about her,
and, flesh is frailty; a little haughty in the toss of her head, but
that commanding brow of hers suits tragedy. They say she
is not always on stiltswho is? I knew nothing of
Trowbridge
;
they say he played tragedy well, he was a Yankee I
believe; a Yankee tragedian! A Yankee king! King of
the Yankee-doodles! He was a favourite with the ladies I am
told, ladies of free and dashing demeanour; and Mrs.
Trowbridge
Zeb. tried to change the too evident current of his thoughts
by asking, Do you think, sir, that she resembles Mrs.
Siddons
?
What! Sarah? No, sirr! Sarah is the Queen of
Tragedy
as well as the Tragic Queen. The Tragic Muse herself!
John is great, Black Jack, as we call him, but he is nothing to
Sarah. I wonder, sir, that any one who has seen the Siddons
should make the comparison. Compare Mrs. Trowbridge to
the Siddons! Blasphemy! that is, stage blasphemy! She
may pass though for a Yankee Siddons. Sarah is tall, but this
woman is a grenadier in petticoats. A good eye, thoughand
a wicked. A fine black brow, but she's nothing to the Siddons!
They are a very extraordinary family. Charles is a good lad.
Often has Charles sat up to
see
me home, good fellow, when
John and I, Heaven bless us, were both past
seeing
. But
Sarah's the pride of the flock. John is a poet; and can take
the inspiring draught too, like other poets. There is Byron
My dear boy, of all vices
that
is the most detestable! the most
destructive! the most insidious!---it undermines the
constitution
of the strongest, and levels the loftiest talent with the
meanest. You are young, Mr. Spiffard, and comparatively have
seen little of either the real or the mimic world. I can tell
you from observation, sir, and lowering his head, and then
looking up, askance, over his shoulder as if addressing a third
person, and at the same time changing the tone of his voice,
perhaps, I might say
experience
: then resuming his former
high harsh tone and imperative manner, sirr, it is the bane of
both health and talent, it is `the accursed thing,' sir, as much as
that spoken of in holy writ. Then with another sudden change
of voice accompanied by a corresponding expression of his
changeful eye, he added, I see, you laugh, sirr; yet the Devil
can quote scripture for his purposes; but
he
never does so for
the purpose of warning from evil as I do now. Then with
a firm and dignified air he continued. Sirr, it is the besetting
sin of our profession---the efforts we make exhaust us, and
we fly to stimulants for relief or support in those exertions we
have yet to make. At midnight we go from the theatre to
the tavern, or the hospitable board of an admirer, and we
further
exhaust, instead of repairing exhausted nature. This, sirr,
becomes habit, and we become drunkards---drunkards, sirr!
Sirr, the mind and body of the drunkard becomes enfeebled
until he appears only to live when under the influence of the
poison which is consuming him. When in possession of his
reason he feels his lost condition---he loathes existence, yet he
dreads its termination---as reason torments him, he seeks
madness
,
and the desire of life hurries him on to death, here and
hereafter. Spiffard gazed upon the speaker intensely. The
meaning of the excessive interest he displayed may be hereafter
explained.
As Cooke ended they found themselves opposite to the City
Hotel, and the moralizer suddenly exclaimed, My dear boy, step
in here with me. Let us look over the files of English papers. It
is so refreshing to read an English paper. The Yankee journals
are as flat as the whole surface of society in this country---a dead
level---we look in vain for the splendid column with its
Corinthian
capital---the princely inheritor of millions who diffuses
splendour on all around him and attracts the gaze of every eye.
True, said Spiffard, and we cannot find thousands who
are prostrate in the dust; or the kneeling supporters of the one
princely column.
The tragedian did not appear to notice this Yankee
observation
;
but saying, in a hurried manner, I have an ugly pain,
he hastened into the bar-room of the hotel, and his
companion
followed.
Spiffard sat down and took up a newspaper. Cooke went to
the bar, and gave a practical illustration of his discourse on
the evils of ebriety, by adding more fire to the consuming
flame within---by seeking in madness a refuge from reason and
conscience.
The unhappy bridegroom looked on the newspaper, but it
was a blank to his eyes; his mind was far away. He ruminated
upon what he had heard in the Park; he endeavoured to
determine
upon the manner in which he should conduct himself at
his next meeting with his wife. The first thing to be done was
to announce his marriage to the public, and have Mrs. Spiffard's
name put in the play-bills. This being resolved as a first
step, then came thronging on his mind, doubts, resolutions,
objections, recollections, jealousies, and dire misgivings, which
made his heart sink at one moment, and at the next seem to rise
and swell almost to suffocation. He forgot all present objects.
He struck his fist upon the table at which he sat, and exclaimed,
I will have some
The sentence was left unfinished, for the sound of his voice
brought to his mind the place in which he was about to
soliloquize
,
and to his eyes the surrounding objects; and this
awakening
of his faculties was aided by an audible exclamation and
start on the part of a gentleman who sat nearly opposite to
him, absorbed in the price of stocks as reported in the Daily
Advertiser. Among the surrounding objects stood a waiter.
Some
what
sir? What will you please to have?
Come, my boy! said Cooke. Let us be moving. I
feel better. Let us be going. Exercise is the parent of
health.
Yes sir, said the comedian, rising, and temperance,
the preserver.
They left the tavern, and Cooke, yet more garrulous,
proceeded
with additional powers of voice and energy of emphasis,
Let us continue our ramble. Exercise gives health of body
and mind: promotes cheerfulness, dispels the thick-coming
fancies of the brain, which late revels, and slothful morning
indulgences (two familiar sins of our profession) bring upon us.
Spiffard had willingly obeyed the summons, glad to be
relieved
,
in some degree, from his own thoughts by change of place;
and the veteran, leaning on his arm, continued to pour forth
his remarks and moralizings with renewed energy, but with
increasing abruptness.
As they passed in front of Trinity church, Cooke, (to use the
phraseology of his profession) took his cue from the object
before him, and forcing his companion's distracted attention by
making a stop and pointing to the door of the building, he
commenced
one of those rhapsodies which his unfortunate habits
and peculiar mind made so strikingly his own. What a mass
of deformity in architecture these Yankees have made of this
2
once noble gothic edifice! It now belongs to no order or age.
I remember it, when proudly it towered a monument of the
taste of Englishmen, and the liberality of the church and
government
of England. A pure specimen of the rich and
awe-inspiring
gothic without, and decorated within by the sculptures
and paintings of the most eminent artists of Britain. What is
it now? A Yankee specimen of republican economy! They
had better have left it a noble ruin as they made it when they
fled from their gracious monarch's armies, sent in mercy to teach
them their true interests. I remember, sirr
You! Mr. Cooke!
Yes, sirr! I, George Frederick Cooke! I remember
Trinity church in its pride, and I remember it in its ruins, even
then infinitely more beautiful than in its present state. During
the rebellion, sirr, when we occupied this city by right of
conquest
,
the public
mall
, the favourite walk, was in front of the
ruins of that proud building which even then from its dilapidated
turrets spoke in praise of monarchy and prelacy---of church
and state---and frowned on democracy and rebellion. Then,
sirr, every evening in summer, we had our military bands of
regimental musicians playing loyal airs in the church yard, while
we promenaded with the wives and daughters of the refugees
and loyalists, and confirmed them in the love of old England.
In the morning, sirr, it was the parade ground, from which the
guards were detailed, and marched with drum, fife, trumpet,
bugle, and bagpipe, to their stations. The main guard was
down there, in Wall-street, where the Custom House now
stands. There stood the old City Hall and Court House,
projecting
into the street. Sirr, you stare at my knowledge of
this place, and its historycome on, sirr! By this time some
other auditors were collecting, and he moved on, but soon
resumed
his rhodomontade. The night after we crossed from
Brooklyn, all this part of the city, including old Trinity, was one
sheet of flameall was burnt by the rebel incendiaries. All
on fire from Trinity downwards, and then across to the east,
leaving Kennedy's and a few houses towards Fort George,
and the Battery. Here stood an old Sectarian meeting house
which the flames had spared, and we made a military store
house of it. The Yankee shopkeepers have built what they
think an elegant church on the site and called it Grace,
there is grace in making it episcopal. Heaven grant them grace
to improve their taste in architecture! It looks more like a
storehouse still than a temple.
Thus the excited old man poured forth his recollections from
reading or from associating with officers who had been in
America at the time he spoke of, mingled with his imaginings,
as the objects they passed suggested images of things partly
remembered and partly created. Thus with rapid strides and
occasional pauses, he proceeded on his way, every word and
every action marking that state of increasing excitement, which
added an unnatural power to his colloquial faculties. His
young companion, glad to escape from his own thoughts, gave
way to the interest created by the remarks of his leader, and
hung, wondering, upon his copious, singular, and wild eloquence.
They arrived at the Bowling-green. There, sirr,
continued
Cooke. There stood the equestrian statue of his
sacred Majesty George the Third, my royal master!
There, sirr, within that circular enclosure. It was of
lead, gilt over. Then with a sudden change of voice and
countenance, looking over his shoulder as if speaking to some
one behind him, in an under tone he added, Gilded lead, said
by the vile Jacobites, to be an apt emblem of the house of
Hanover. Again resuming his former tone and manner, he
proceeded, Before we landed, the rebels had melted the
Lord's anointed, and cast the heavy material into bullets
musket
balls to murder his loyal subjectsthus adding sacrilege to
parricide, rebellion, murder and treason. Yes, sirr, his leaden
majesty was dethroned before we gained the townbut I
remember
Pitt's statue in Wall street, the rebels left him standing
because he was the leader of the opposition in parliamentand
because they could not make bullets of the marble: but some
of our wild boys took his head off one nightby way of hint
to those who encourage rebellion. Ha! this, sirr, is Kennedy's
house, the head quarters of Sir William, Sir Henry, and Sir
Guy, his majesty's commanders-in-chief, now rebuilt and
enlarged
to receive a Yankee broker! Yes, sirr, this corner
house was the British head quarters, and opposite rose
majestically
Fort George, surmounted with the floating banner of
England, surrounded by her invincible fleets and armies,
over-looking
land and waterthe town, the battery and the baybut
the democrats have levelled itthe hill is removed by the
faithless
,
and the natural defence of the city prostrated by the
foolish.
Perhaps they think its defence is in its men.
And now, sirr, they are building yon stone Frenchified
things! castles! things that one of our seventy-fours would
batter down in an hour.
Provided no guns were mounted on, or fired from them.
Guns or no guns, sirr! Guns or no guns!
They had now entered within the fence (then of wooden
pales) which separated our magnificent public walk, still called
the Battery, from the street which occupies part of the former
site of Fort George, and is called State-street; and now the
view of the spacious bay, with its islands, the rich and beautiful
shores of the neighbouring state of New Jersey, the hills of
Staten Island, and the meadows and groves of that part of
Long Island which with the sister isle forms the outlet to the
Atlantic and the inlet to all the commerce of the world, burst
upon the view.
The hero of the mimic scene, looked around him on the
realities of
the present
, and was for a moment silent: but soon
he began again, taking a new hint from the prospect which
opened upon him, and seeming to inhale additional animation
from the pure sea breezes which swept over the waters,
pouring
health upon the busy multitudes he had left behind him.
My young friend said he, I never walk here, and look on
these rivers, this bay and those shores, but I think over the days
of my youth. I traverse again in triumph those heights. And
he pointed to Long Island. I marched proudly, driving
before me the rebels with their Washington and their Lord
Sterling
(not a sterling Lord) until the night saved them from utter
annihilation. It was the twenty-fifth of August when they fled
before us to their lines in Brooklyn. I must give Washington
credit for bringing them off that night. Yes, he made a
skillful
retreat, and did all that mana Yankee mancould do with
such troops. These Yankees, with all their self-conceit, are a
poor race, sirr, a degenerate race in every thing.
I think, Mr. Cooke said Spiffard with an affected
simplicity
,
that it was on the twenty-fifth of August you said,
seventeen
hundred and seventy-six, that Washington fled with his
army of raggamuffins before the disciplined veterans of
Britain?
Aye, sirr! the twenty-fifth! the twenty-fifth!
And on the twenty-fifth Spiffard was interrupted by
the exulting repetition of the words, Ay, sirr! the
twenty-fifth
!
But the Yankee proceeded deliberately, the
twenty-fifth
of November, seventeen hundred and eighty-three, these
same Yankees, led by this same Washington, marched into this
same city not leading a rabble of raggamuffins but a few
regiments
of well dressed, well equipped, well disciplined Yankee
soldiers; and was welcomed by the grateful inhabitants as their
benefactor and Saviour! while his Britannic majesty's fleet,
men-of-war, transports and all, were seen from this same spot,
wafting his crest-fallen warriors back to their native shores.
My dear fellow, said Cooke, with one of his arch looks,
we will say nothing of that.
This day, ever to be commemorated not only by New-York,
but by America, as the last day their soil was polluted by an
enemy during the war of the revolution; this memorable
twenty-fifth
of November, 1783, was witnessed as a scene of triumph
by the writer of these memoirs; and the words put into the mouth
of Spiffard, supposed to be spoken by him as the result of
tradition
,
may be received by the reader as the testimony of an
eyewitness
.
After a pause Cooke added, You spoke the latter part of
that last sentence, in a tone that would almost induce me to
think you an American, but that you are too short and too clever
for a Yankee. It is odd, sirr, that they have never produced
one good actor. How long is it since you came to this
country
?
Five and twenty years.
Then you must have come when you were six months old
or less.
Less, sir. Not an hour old. I am guilty of being born in
Yankee land.
So, so, so! and I have been be-rating the country, and the
people, to aa
A Yankee actor, said Spiffard laughing.
A sterling actor, said the veteran in his best manner,
come you when or whence you will. The chain of romance
and rhodomontade seemed broken, and with a pleasant smile
the old man said, I have been fairly caught, I must confess.
But I like you none the worse for being a native of the land of
pumpkins and puritans. You must let me have my fling at you,
especially as you know, let who will laugh, or who will rail,
you Yankees have won the game.
Thus chatting, and somewhat recovered from the effects of
reading the English newspapers with the bar-keeper of the
tavern, the veteran was accompanied by the young comedian to
his lodgings, who with difficulty excused himself from entering
to share in the rich profusion of Jemmy Bryden's board at the
Tontine Coffee House.
When alone, Spiffard again fell into mournful ruminations on
his rueful condition. If the suspicions which my volatile
companions have raised should prove to be founded on fact. At
one moment he strove against the thought that tortured him,
2*
and the next gave way to his fears. These fellows are
quizzing
me. They are always at their hoaxing sportsport to
them!but then how should they know that I am married to
her? I boarded in the house before. It is but two weeksand
no one in the house knows it but Mrs. Epsom, not even her
cousin Emmano, no, there is a foundation for this insinuation.
I remember now a thousand circumstances in confirmation.
But then she has a mind so far above the ordinary class of
women. Her sentiments are elevated. The whole tenor of
her reading and conversation is masculine and philosophic.
True, her passions are remarkably strong, and she may have
followed the example of her former husband whom she loved
to excessshe may havebut that she now loves me I cannot
doubt, and with her good qualities and superior mind what have
I to fear?
So soliloquizing our hero strode up Wall-street to Broadway,
and on to the house of Mrs. Epsom, his mother-in-law, having
in a good degree tranquilized his mind, and being determined
neither to do nor say any thing which might interrupt his
domestic
felicity; unless it should be disturbed by the public
avowal of his change of state, and the annunciation in papers
and bills of his wife's change of name, which had become
necessary
after the scene in the Park.
CHAPTER II.
Heroines on and off the stage
.
Have you the lion's part written? pray you, if it be, give it me, for I am
slow of study.
Shakspeare
.
Study is still the cant term used in the theatre for getting any nonsense
by rote.
Stevens
.
Bottom discovers a true genius for the stage by his solicitude for
propriety
of dress, and his deliberation which beard to choose among many
beards, all unnatural.
Johnson
.
I will draw you a bill of properties, such as our play wants.
Shaks
.
A cue in stage cant is the last words of the preceding speech, and
serves as a hint to him who is to speak next.
Stevens
.
Before
Zeb appears again or undertakes to make known
his purpose or rather his change of resolution, we will introduce
the reader to the family circle at Mrs. Epsom's. Mrs.
Trowbridge
(we will call her so for the present) had just returned
from rehearsal (Cooke having absconded before his time,
leaving
the prompter to read Penruddock) and was busied in
selecting
and preparing the dress and properties she intended for the
character of the evening. Mrs. Epsom sailed majestically
about the house, occasionally visiting the kitchen to see that
Rachel the black girl executed her orders, then with dignified
pace and action taking her seat by the parlour window, and after
an abundant administration of snuff to her capacious nostrils,
resuming her spectacles and her occupation of sewing. A book
was open on the chair beside her: whether on morality or
religion
the reader must determine when he has perused to the end
of this history. We rather think it was deposited there for
what in playhouse technicalities is called study.
Mrs. Trowbridge, or Mrs. Spiffard, as the reader pleases, was
a vigorous square built woman of the largest English model; not
only broad in frame but tall, and appearing still more so by
the side of her Zebediah, who although a native of Vermont,
it may be remembered was the very reverse of the long lank
Yankee of the novelist and story-teller, or the towering and
manly form of the real Vermonter; and she appeared the taller
as she never lost an inch of her height by stooping, having a
true tragedy elevation of head and a commanding carriage of the
neck and shoulders. Her swan-like neck rose proudly from
her chest, giving an air of pride as well as grace to the
movements of the head, whose ornament was hair that in
luxuriance
and colour was truly Asiatic. Her arms were full,
plump, white and terminated by small graceful hands. Her
feet were rather large; they were decidedly not American. Her
face was very remote from the painter's or sculptor's standard
of beauty; yet might be called fine; complexion, a light brunette,
but in spots rather ruddy. Forehead good, high, broad, white
strongly marked black eyebrows, which, with black eyes, and
hair falling in masses of raven hue, gave powerful effect to the
poet's passions, and sometimes to her own. She had a
prominent
full nosered lips, somewhat thick, the upper one having
rather a scornful curl towards its neighbour the impending nose,
when separated they displayed brilliant teeththis
congregation
of features was finished by a square prominent chin, and
the whole visage was slightly marked by disappointment. The
aggregate gave indications of strong intellect, and, to the
close observer, ungoverned passions.
Her mother, who played the tragedy, or serious, old women
of the Drama occasionally, was tall and thin, with a
cream-coloured
face, except the nose which was red, sharp, short and
puggishthin lips, the upper one of which (as well as her nose)
was always discoloured with snuffher whole physiognomy
hypocriticaland in her air was seen that mock dignity, and
that swimming and sailing manner already mentioned.
At the other window, so retired as that the light should fall on
her work and not on her face, sat Emma Portland. She was
intently employed in sewing; and her eyes being cast down in
the direction of her needle, caused the long, dark, auburn lashes
to be more apparent as contrasted with the brilliant white of her
skin: they were relieved like the delicate touches of the pencil on
a ground of snowy purity. When the fringed curtains of her
eyes were raised, their azure tint and softness of expression
caused fascinationnot the fascination of the enchantress, but
a holy attraction inspiring admiration, divested of all impurity,
except when the beholder was impure. Complexion is
evanescent
yet
transparency and bloom add to the charms of form
and expression. The most delicate tint of the damask
rose-leaf
did not equal the colour of this maiden's cheek. She
appeared
by the purity and simplicity of her dress, the placidity of
her countenance, the slender symmetry of her justly proportioned
form, and the graceful movement accompanying this common
domestic occupation, to contrast strongly with the majestic
figure of one, and the worldly appearance of the other of her
companions.
Emma was not yet eighteen, and looked two years younger
when not speaking. When she spoke, a mind of maturity
indicating
many years appeared in the unveiled mirror of her soul
her facewhich beamed with intelligence and intellectual
beauty. Nor did her words belie her lovely countenance, or in
the least disappoint the expectation which her all-expressive
physiognomy had raised. Purity and truthpiety and love
(heavenly love) were written on her countenance. Of her form
and face it might be said with the poet,
There is nothing ill can dwell in such a temple.
Her voice was
musical
As bright Apollo's harp strung with his hair,
Or that of Orpheus, strung with poet's sinews.
A spotless white morning dress covered her person from the
feet to the chin. There was no studied art to display form, or
coquettishly to conceal it; but the perfection of female loveliness
was seen in every movement and in every limb. Her hair was
auburn, fine and glossy as the richest silk; modestly braided,
it formed a natural crown copeing her maiden brow; that
portion
which impinged upon the ivory of her forehead, was parted
in the midst, and in ringlets hung clustering on either side,
shading the blue veins of her temples, and sometimes as they
waved, adding golden tinted shadows to the rich hues near them.
Her face approached the oval in its form, with a portion of
girlish roundness, which only added to its innocent expression
when, as now, perfectly tranquil, and which expression of
extreme
youth was heightened by the glowing colour of her cheeks
and lips. These lips were as usual two, and as the old poet
says,
The one was thin,
Compared with that was next her chin.
Yet both were full, exquisitely curved and rounded, and parted
by a line more resembling the bow of Cupid when unbent,
than any thing merely mortal; within this mouth, the rows of
brilliant, pearly teeth, were in unison with the honied breath and
honied words which flowed from the healthful frame and
healthful
mind of this matchless maiden. With this beauty she
possessed
a higher, holier loveliness; proceeding from within. In
her eyes you beheld the pure soul which never knew or thought
deceitthe charm of truth was spread over her countenance,
but it
shone
in her eyes. She had read and heard of falsehood
and arts of deceit, but they were theories with hershe confided
in every one, because she felt her own sincerity and heretofore
had no experience of the lack of it in others. She confided in
all, and all confided in her. How could they avoid it? Truth
was an innate and a practical virtue, which had such power in
her voice that no human creature could doubt an assertion from
her lips. She possessed another virtueCharity. Charity in
its widest sensein its theory and practice. She thought
charitably of all, and she acted charitably to all. She could
not give money, or food, or clothing to the poor, but rarely and
scantily: she could not send fuel to the cold, and sick, and
shivering: but she did moreshe sought their abodes and
cheered them with looks and words. She pointed out their
cheerless dwellings to those who could supply their physical
wants and alleviate their sufferings.
How came such a creature in such a place and in such
company
?
We will tell the reader in few words.
The father of Emma Portland left England, his native
land, and took refuge in America, after the destruction of
his family by the elopement of his sister with a worthless
strolling player of the name of Epsom. This sister, though
now such as we have seen her had
then
a showy kind of so-called
beauty, was vain, and thought it would be a charming thing to
receive the plaudits of the theatreto be admired by hundreds,
to stand aloft and dazzle thousands, and to be the wife of the
tall, handsome, tragic actor, Mr. Adolphus Epsom. She was
an only daughter, and her conduct killed first her father and
subsequently
her mother. Her brother, a well disposed young man,
but with no extraordinary talents or acquirements, sought a home
in Philadelphia, prospered in commerce, married one of the
loveliest and best of women, and was blest by her perfections
mental and physicaland more by the good conduct of a son
and daughter, Thomas and Emma; so named from himself
and wife. The children inherited the talents of the mother, and
imbibed from her an ardent love of truth: the foundation of
every virtue.
Emma had in infancy the inestimable advantage of the
example
and instruction of an enlightened and good mother; and
as her mind expanded, her beloved brother, some years older
than herself, and devoted to science and literature, became her
chosen companion, and instructor. Thus with every advantage
which wealth, science, virtue and piety could surround her, she
attained her fifteenth year. Then came a sad reverse. The
father, heretofore a princely merchant, failedsunk under the
shock and died. The mother bowed her head to God, and rose
higher and firmer from the conviction that to do his will was her
duty and her happiness; that his will is the happiness of his
creatures
;
and that her duty was to make her children and herself
useful
in the great work of promoting happiness. The brother and
mother sought and found employment. Their sister and
daughter
cheered their labours and cheerfully added her own. Soon
a lingering and cruel disease, the consumption, the
consequence
,
perhaps, of too severe study, was apparent in the
flushed cheek and enfeebled frame of the brother. The
mother seemed to melt away as her first born withered, as it is
fabled that the victim of malignity sinks with the melting of the
charm-fraught image moulded by the hand of accursed sorcery.
Both diedresigned to the will of him who had given life and
much happinessthankful for the past and confiding in the
future; they diedfirst the brother, then the mother, and left the
orphan Emmanot alone and unprotected, for in our country
the child of the wise and good cannot want friends. But
Emma
,
though not friendless, was poor. Her mother had no near
relations. Dependency upon strangers, however kind they may
be, is a hard lot.
In the meantime Epsom, his wife, and only child, a daughter,
had emigrated to Boston, where he died. The wife and
daughter
,
both on the stage, were prosperous in public favour. They
visited Charleston South Carolina, New-York, and several of
the principal cities. The daughter who had been educated for
dramatic life, and used to it from childhood, married a well
known young tragedian of the name of Trowbridge, and
became
a skillful tragic actress, far surpassing her instructor.
Trowbridge died of the disease which destroys so many foreign
actors of the middling classintemperance; he attributed as
usual the decline of his health altogether to the climate, and
expired
cursing the country. Mrs. Epsom and her daughter
visited Philadelphia for the first time in their professional
capacities
and there by accident, that is, through the medium of an
English merchant who knew Portland and his family history,
Mrs. Epsom became acquainted with the situation of her niece.
She might have neglected her, but her daughter had better
feelings
.
She saw and admired the orphan. She could appreciate
and even love the excellence which she could not imitate.
Emma was visited and solicited to accept the home her aunt
could offer.
Emma Portland, by the advice of well meaning friends, who
thought so young and beautiful a creature ought to be under the
guardianship of her natural relations, (relations who were
prosperous
and of unimpeached character in general estimation)
placed herself under the protection of her aunt and cousin.
Her wardrobe was more than sufficient for her humble
prospects
,
and a small sum, the savings from the wreck and
subsequent
industry, was secured at interest with the philanthropic
banker, Stephen Girard. She was received with apparent
kindness by the aunt, and with real admiration, which soon
became
affection, by the superior minded but unhappy cousin.
Nay even the obtuse Mrs. Epsom became sensible that in
Emma Portland she had no burden, but rather a treasure as
respected
her economical domestic arrangements, which were
sometimes sadly neglected, owing to the duties and cares
inseparable from the stage. With these relatives Emma
removed to New-York, where they obtained a permanent
engagement
.
In this situation, with people whose manners, maxims,
thoughts, and conversation were all, not only strange and
different
,
but generally opposite and repulsive to this young creature,
she was placed; and she must either sink to their level, or by
the elastic energy of a well taught and well regulated mind, rise
from the struggle of hostile opinions, and be strengthened and
confirmed in all the precepts and practice of her mother and
brother, in all the beauty of active virtue and true piety.
Which course Emma pursued, and to what it led will make
an important portion of this true and interesting historytrue in
preceptinteresting in incident.
Before we proceed to detail the conversation which passed
between Emma Portland and her relatives, we will go back in
our story, only two days, and recount an adventure which befell
the lovely girla circumstance which had produced the
determination
she on that occasion made known; and which we
have to record as an important part of this characteristic scene.
The company of comedians to which Mrs. Trowbridge and
her mother belonged played at this period three times a week,
in the only theatre in the city: the nights of performance were
Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays. Emma from the
kindness
of her gentle disposition, and her wish to oblige, had, though
with reluctance, been induced occasionally to accompany her
aunt and cousin to their dressing room in the theatre,
particularly
when the latter had some new character to perform and of
course new dress, to appear in; or was unusually anxious to
support or increase her reputation and favour with the audience.
Such had been the case on the last play-night. Emma had
accompanied
Mrs. Trowbridge and Mrs. Epsom to their dressing
room, and had been until the time of raising the curtain so
sedulously
employed in assisting her cousin to mould her person
(rather tall and masculine for the heroine of the tragedy of the
night) by dress and decoration, to the form which the author of
the character she had to portray meant to represent. This
accomplished
to the satisfaction of one at least of the parties, who
evidently viewed in the full length mirror her towering form and
gorgeous ornaments, her raven hair, glowing cheeks and
flashing
eyes with some little complacency, the simply dressed maid
resumed her bonnet and left the heroine to the care of the
ordinary
attendant of the apartmenta dresser furnished to every
dressing room by the rules of a well regulated theatre.
Notwithstanding her cousin's earnest solicitations that she
would go in front and, with Mrs. Epsom, see the tragedy,
Emma tripped down stairs on her way home to pursue those
studies marked out for her by her lamented brother, and now,
more than ever enjoyed, as all studies are in proportion to the
progress made in them, and the consciousness of intellectual
power thereby gained. She had no fastidious notions respecting
the Drama. She had read plays, English and French, selected
by her brother. She saw no reason to suppose that the effect of
a good poem in prose or verse would be lessened by the just
representation of its characters, and powerful delivery of its
moral sentiments. She had seen with the delight incident to
inexperienced youth the charms of scenic representation; and
although, since her residence with her aunt Epsom, her feelings
toward the theatre had undergone a change, still her only
motive
on this occasion, was the preference given to retirement and
the pursuit of a study she had commenced.
It is known, without our aid, to some of our readers, that the
dressing rooms of the Park Theatre, are over the green-room,
or room for the assembling of performers when ready to obey
the prompter's summons to the stage. The passage leading to
these rooms, and to the stage, opened in a darksome dirty street
called Theatre Alley; since that time, like many other things,
reformed. The first floor of the building, which is an adjunct to
the theatre proper, was occupied by the aforesaid green-room,
and the passage way from the street or alley to it, to the stage,
and to the stair-case leading to the dressing rooms. The second
floor was divided into three apartments, one of which was at this
time appropriated to Mr. Cooke, and the others to some of the
principal male performers of the company, none of whom
happened
to play on the evening of which we speak, nor were their
usual occupants in the house. The third floor had likewise
three dressing rooms, one of which was occupied by Mrs.
Epsom
and her daughter, a second accommodated Mr. Spiffard and
another comedian, and the third was similarly used by others of
the company. Above this again were other tiring rooms, better
filled, at least in quantity, (the persons of lesser weight in this
community, as in other places, rising nearer the clouds, as poets
and painters mount to garrets,)and still higher were
apartments
for tailors, supernumeraries and trumpery, all called
wardrobe
.
Each landing on the staircase was lighted usually by a
lamp, but as Emma ascended with her aunt and cousin, it being
yet twilight, she had not noticed whether the lamp was burning
or not.
As she now descended to the floor on which the dressing
room of George Frederick Cooke was situated, she found
herself
involved in darkness, and it appeared to her that the lamp
had been extinguished at the moment she opened the door of
3
the apartment from which she issued. With the confidence of
innocence, and that courage given by a just appreciation of her
own character, she kept on her way, darkling; but as she
passed
the last dressing room she was suddenly arrested, and felt
herself seized round the waist, by the strong grasp of a man's
arm, and forcibly drawn towards the door. She struggled to
return to the stairs whence she cameand in her struggles
confusedly
heard the words murmured, lovely girlI will make
your fortuneI love youno harm and a rude kiss was
attempted
upon her averted face.
Help! Aunt! Cousin! Cousin Trowbridge, cried the
struggling maid, Monster! Ruffian! Help! Help!
A door opened, and a figure in a dressing gown appeared in the
doorway. This person, finding the landing and stairs in
darkness, turned back into the room, snatched a light and
rushed
out. The arm which had seized Emma was suddenly
withdrawn
,
the ruffian had vanished, and she sunk on the lower step
of the stairs she had just descended, faintly crying Help.
Thus before she could see the satyr who had assailed her,
except
by the faint and impeded light from the door that had been
thrown open, some rays of which fell on a face unknown to her,
she was left alone, sitting on the stairs leading to her aunt's
dressing roomleaning with one arm on the step above that on
which she was seated, and with the other outstretched in search
of her bonnetin that attitudeher bonnet offher face, neck
and shoulders almost covered by the profusion of her golden
ringletsin this state of apparent helplessness was she found
by George Frederick Cooke.
The veteran had been preparing for the ensuing scene, under
the hands of his hair-dresser, Dennis O`Dogherty; and
attended
by his servant, or, as he called himself, his
valet de sham
,
Trustworthy Davenport (the first an honest hibernian, and the
second a thorough going yankee,) and hearing a female voice
cry for help, George Frederick rushed to the rescue with all the
promptitude of a
preux chevalier
, and stood in an attitude of
unfeigned amazement at the apparition of such a lovely creature
so strangely situated; lovely he could now see that she was, for
a blaze of light fell strong and full upon her, from the candle he
had seized, and from another borne aloft by the tall yankee, his
valet.
This way, O'Dogherty!Here, Davenport!My dear
young lady, have you fallen?Are you hurt?Let me assist
you! Are you hurt?
No sir. I am not hurt. Some ruffian assailed me. He
must have gone into that room, I thinkor perhaps down stairs.
That door? Ha!O'Dogherty!Davenport!that door
I beg your pardon, Madam. Bring a glass of wine,
O'Dogherty
!and
Davenport, see who is in that roomthe door is
open.
And there is no speck of light, said Trusty, as he obeyed.
You are faint, my dear, said the old gentleman, Let me
assist you into this roomand there you can sit down until you
recover yourself. For Emma was now standing at the foot of
the stairs near the tragedian's open door.
Oh no sir, no, no, I am well now; and the trembling girl,
hastily adjusting her long and dishevelled tresses under her
bonnet, attempted to ascend the stairs, but suddenly recollecting
that to her aunt and cousin, as then engaged, the knowledge of
her adventure would prove unseasonable and annoying, and that
it might prevent Mrs. Trowbridge's exertions as an actress, at
the same time wondering that her cries had not brought those
ladies down (but in truth they had not heard her faint and stifled
calls for help) she concluded to leave them in ignorance for the
present.
Davenport returned from his search with the report that no
one was to be found.
Emma, after a moment of hesitation, re-assumed her
intention
of going home, and was proceeding down stairs to the lower
floor, after thanking the old gentleman for his assistance and
kind offers.
Where would you go, young lady? said he.
Home, sir.
Alone!
There is no danger, sir.
I think there is.
None, sir, after leaving this house.
Indeed, miss, said Dennis O'Dogherty, who stood holding
a decanter of Madeira in one hand, and a full glass in the other.
There are more bad houses in this alley.
What sirr! said Cooke, do you make a bad house of
the theatre?
Not I, sir, but among us I think it will get its name up. I
only mane that there are others in the alley, though this is the
biggest.
Mr. O'Dogherty, said the Yankee, you are mending the
matter
clean
with a plaster of mud.
Hold your tongues, sirrs! said Cooke. How far are you
going, young lady?
Only to Mrs. Epsom's, sir.
My coat! Davenport! I dont go on till the second act.
O'Dogherty, my hat! Young lady, you must not go through
that dark alley alone. I am George Frederick Cooke, madam;
and though my grey hairsif I hadn't this black wig onmight
be assurance enough for your security, we will have Dennis
with us, who knows the alley so well, and Davenport shall carry
a lanthorn before us.
Indeed, sir, I have no fears, when out of this house.
The house has its traps, sure enough, miss; and there are
some who make the sight of an unprotected beauty a cue to
their licentiousness; but pardon me, the night is growing dark,
and such a figure as yours flitting through Theatre-alley might
attract a ruffian, and occasion an insult even out of the theatre.
So you must permittherefore, pardon me, I
will
see you home.
Give me that glass of wine, O'Dogherty, and take care of the
bottle; and do you, Trusty, take the lanthorn. Having tossed
off the bumper, he proceeded. I will see you safe home by the
light of Dennis's face and Trustworthy's lanthorn. And as I
shall be supporting you, and Davenport carrying the light before
us, that Hibernian shall follow as a rear guard. Come along,
Davenport, and take your cudgel with you, Dennis!
Emma could no longer decline the aid so frankly offered;
and supported by the arm of the veteran, lighted by his trusty
valet, and guarded by the red-faced Irishman, they descended
the stairs, at the bottom of which they found the old porter.
Did any one pass out within a few minutes? said Cooke.
Yes, sir, a gentleman in a great hurry.
Who was he?
I dont know, sir?
You must know all the performers?
He was not a performer I'm sure sir.
Then what business had he here?
He did not come in this way since I came from my supper,
and as he looked like a gentleman, I let him pass without asking
questions. He was wrapp'd in a cloak, and his face partly
covered.
Some young scape-grace, ejaculated Cooke, as they passed
out.
No, sir, said the porter, he was not young, that I know
by the way he came down the stairs. He was none of your
hop-skip-and-jump fellows.
Emma reached her aunt's house in safety; receiving all the
delicate attentions which a man of sense and feeling would
bestow
upon a young female in her situation; for it happened that
Mr. Cooke was at this time such as nature had qualified him for
being at all times.
When they stopped at the door, Emma, having thoroughly
recovered her self-possession, said, I will not ask you in, sir.
I know your engagements. My aunt will add her thanks to
mine, for your politeness, at some other time. I hope you
will call upon her, she is not now at home. The thanks and
blessings of the orphan are with you, sir. Then suddenly
bending her head, under the impulse of excited feelings, she
pressed her lips upon the hand which had assisted her, he felt a
warm tear drop, and she bastily left him.
Cooke, and his two attendants, turned to retrace their way to
the theatre, and they had walked in silence for a minute or
two, when the hero of the buskin ejaculated the single word,
strange! He drew out his handkerchief, and, rubbing his
eyes, said, Who is this beautiful creature, Dennis?
Sure and she is beautiful, sir, said Dennis.
I know that, you blockhead; but
who
is she?
Sure, Mister Cooke, you wouldn't call me a blockhead for
not knowing
all
the beautiful creatures. And, indeed, Mr.
Cooke, and I think she is none of the company, or she would
not have minded a little affair of that sortquite
so much
.
Get out, you blackguard, do you know what you are
saying
?
Mr. Dog-hearty, said Davenport, means the present
company.
To be sure, said Dennis, that's what I mean; the present
company always excepted.
He don't know what he means, said Cooke.
Fai't, and I do, sir, without maining any disrespect to
yourself
,
Mr. Cooke, or any of the other ladies of the stage, past,
present, or to come.
Hold your tongue, sir!
And I can do that; and what the more will you know if
I do?
Have
you
ever seen her before, Davenport? inquired the
tragedian, turning to his yankee attendant.
I have, be sure, Mr. Cooke, said the
valet de sham
, and
noticed her with considerable admiration. For, to tell the truth,
which I always endeavour to do,
modesty
, in
our house
, shines
like a candle in a dark night, or `a good deed in a naughty
world,' as the poet says. But I
see
her in another houseat
church; and there she looks like an inhabitant of the upper
regions
:
3*
I don't mean the gallery, or the upper tier of boxes. An
angela descending spirit, come to tell `the secrets of the
world unknown,' as Norval says.
This rhapsody, given with a nasal tone, and true
New
England
or
old
English peculiarity of accent and enunciation, tickled
the tragedian's fancy, and turned the current of his thoughts.
After good naturedly exclaiming, Hush, you barbarous
murderer
of Dominie Home! he communed with himself as he
returned to the business of the night; occasionally a word
escaped him, such as brutebeautifuldaughterbut
further communication with Dennis or Davenport, he held none.
CHAPTER III.
A Renunciation
.
Time is the nurse and breeder of all good.
Temperance is a delicate wench.
Shakspeare
.
My
story is one of ordinary life. Its incidents are such,
mainly, as I have known to occur. If I have introduced an
Irishman and a Yankee, it is because my scene is in New-York;
and in New-York one cannot turn a corner but an Irishman is
at one elbow and a Yankee at the other. It will be seen by the
sequel that I mean no disrespect to the natives of the Emerald
IsleI feel none. Take Pat from the influence of bad, or no
education; give him a fair chance in the race, he will
out-strip
the best and the proudest of Europe; and Jonathan is my
own countryman, only born further down east, where I have
found some of the most enlightened heads, and truest hearts,
of all who can boast the name of Yankee.
We will now take up the thread of our story, and open the
conversation which was on the eve of commencement when we
dropt the stitch in our knitting-work. We return to the colloquy
of Mrs. Epsom, Mrs. Spiffard, (late Mrs. Trowbridge,) and
Emma Portland, which has been so long necessarily delayed.
Emma, dear, said Mrs. Spiffard, as she selected the dress
she intended to wear in the evening; will you help me with
these ruffles?
Certainly, cousin; and putting aside her needle-work,
she crossed the apartment to receive the stage ornaments.
Why, these are old fashioned.
They are for an elderly lady; I am to play an old lady
to-night
in Cumberland's `Wheel of Fortune.' You, who do not
read plays, may not know that Penruddock is one of Kemble's,
Cooke's, and Cooper's fine
parts
. As this is the first time of
Mr. Cooke's playing the character in America, I am anxious
that he may be well
supported
, as far as my exertions can go
towards giving support to his talents.
I have read the `Wheel of Fortune,' said Emma, and
most of Cumberland's plays. My brotherand a slight cloud
passed over her beaming countenance; my brother did not
prohibit dramatic authors, but he selected for me. I once had a
strong relish for plays.
When you were young, I suppose, said Mrs. Epsom, with
a sneering snuffle.
When I wasEmma was going to say `happy;' but
delicacy
,
and the consciousness of present good, checked her.
When myagain she stopped. What shall I do with this
ruffle, cousin?
Mrs. Spiffard gave the necessary directions, and described
the dress which was intended for the character of Mrs.
Woodville
,
in the above named play, and then continuedI don't
think you ever saw me personate an old woman. I am to play
a part, perhaps, unsuited to my figure to-night, and I hope you
will go and see how I perform, that I may have your opinion
to-morrow.
Emma had anticipated the trial which now approached. Even
before the outrage which had been offered by the unknown
ruffian, and which we have related, she had felt a growing
reluctance
to visiting the private part of the theatre. That
occurrence
had determined her; and with due consideration she had
made up her mind, (after consulting a friend who will be
hereafter
introduced to the reader,) to avoid, unless some duty
required her attendance, (some service not otherwise to be
performed for her protectors,) to avoid any communication
with the recesses of the theatre. To introduce the subject to
her friends, as they were situated, was a difficulty which her
delicate mind shrunk from. She had feared to mention the story
of the insult that had been offered to her; and feared still more
to make known the determination which had been its result;
but now she found it necessary to avow her resolution, and
assign
the cause. Having thus resolved what her conduct must
be hereafter in respect to the theatre, she answered with all the
firmness of a philosopher, but with all the gentleness of her sex,
and peculiarly sweet character, No cousin, I hope you will
excuse me.
No! why not? and both the ladies fixed their eyes in
astonishment
upon her.
I hope my aunt, and you, cousin, will permit me to remain
at home this evening, and not even ask
why?
Again she felt
unequal to her task, and wished to avoid explanation.
You may do as you please, certainly. But why not see the
play? The Wheel of Fortune is an unceptionable comedy.
I have read it, and many by the same author. Mr.
Cumberland
has been characterized by Goldsmith as `the Terence
of England, the mender of hearts;' but I do not think his plays
unexceptionable. There are many objectionable passages; and
in all his works he is an advocate for the absurd and unchristian
practice of duelling.
O my Emma, you are a little prude, said Mrs. Spiffard;
and rising, she took a seat nearer Emma, accompanying her
words with a playful tap on the cheek.
I hope not, Cousin, said the blushing girl.
I can't see what objection you can have to seeing your
cousin's scenes, snuffled Mrs. Epsom.
Will not my dear aunt permit me to remain at home?
You grow more and more opposed to the theatre, I think,
was the reply; and with your voice and figure, it is exactly
the line of life you ought to choose, and I have told you so
again and again.
But you have also told me, dear aunt, that you would have
me consult my own happiness. My needle, and my habits of
industry place me above the dread of want; and I have no
ambition
to display my voice or figure.
And then, continued the aunt, what an advantage to
have the instruction of your cousin and myself.
But Emma, added Mrs. Spiffard, would feel herself
degraded
by treading the stage. This was said with some
asperityperhaps from consciousness.
Oh, exclaimed Emma, her beautiful cheeks glowing with
additional colour, Oh, how I have dreaded and wished to
avoid this subject! But I find that in this as in every thing
else, an honest, plain avowal of the truth, is the best mode of
overcoming difficulties.
I beg your pardon, my dear, said Mrs. Spiffard, earnestly
and tenderly. I did not mean to hurt your feelings, or
reproach you for differing from us in opinion. My education
has been very unlike yours; and she sighed. But you
had better go with usperhapsyou will be very lonely here.
Take your book, as you have before done, and sit in our room,
if you will not go in front and see the play.
Unless for some very particular reason, cousin, said
Emma
,
firmly, I will never again enter the walls of that theatre.
Heyday! what have we now! exclaimed the aunt.
Emma, then, with simplicity, related the insult she had
received
,
and the fright she had experienced. She narrated the
occurrence, not as we have described it (we, to whom all things
are known,) but as it appeared to her. She apologized for
letting
so many hours pass without mentioning the circumstance.
She expressed her deep feeling of the insult offered to her from
some one evidently acquainted with the house, and, as she
could not but suppose, feeling at home in it. She expressed
strongly her gratitude to her protector, and added, It is not
the fear of personal injury that has made me come to this
resolution
,
but a sense of what is due to you and to myself; to
you, my aunt and cousin, as protectors of my orphan state; to
myself, as one depending for future prosperity and usefulness
on present conduct. I ought, as the subject is now unavoidably
brought into discussion, to add that it is not alone the event I have
recounted to you that has caused my determination, but the
improper
words I have, at various times, been obliged to hear in
passing and repassing to your apartment in the theatre, and the
improper conduct I have been forced to witness. With
you
in
your company
, I am protected from insult, and see, at least, the
appearance of decency among the people called
supernumeraries
,
and others, who, when unrestrained by the presence of
their superiors or employers, are not governed by laws or
feelings
which render them proper persons for a young and
unprotected
female to be placed so near, as to be within hearing of
their jests and ribaldry. You cannot be always with meyour
duty calls you before the publicand my appearance does not
command respect from the ignorant, or shield my conduct from
the suspicions or the censures of the libertine. My pleasure is
in retirement. The gay frequenters of the boxesor the
glittering
decorations of the proscenium of the theatre, give me, of
late, no delight; I am isolated among the auditors; and the
scenes which appear to please them, too often disgust me. If
such is my situation in front of the curtain, behind it I feel that
I am exposed to insult except in your immediate presence.
The gentlemen and ladies of the theatre are engaged in their
respective duties; and are, for the most part, unknown to me.
That I may be subjected to calumny is but too apparent, while
placed so nearly in contact with vulgar indelicacynot to say
indecency. I hope my good aunt and cousin will yield to me
in this, and not attribute my refusal to visit the theatre (except
on occasions when duty to them requires) to false delicacy or
any improper motive.
Her good aunt sat petrified during this address. She
had never heard any thing like it from female mouth before,
and thought the girl possessed. Mrs. Spiffard's
countenance
had varied as Emma spoke. As she looked at her
animated
face, her own dark eyes sparkledas she listened to the
accents of truth, purity, and feeling, she thought of the
innocence
of childhood, and the train of events which had since
occurred and changed her to that which she knew herself now
to be.
When Emma ceased to speak, her cousin dismissed these
remembrances of former days and subsequent eventsshe felt
as if she would willingly be in union with the holiness of the
beautiful object before her, and at the same time be its prop.
All her better self filled her bosom and glowed in her
countenance
,
as she exlaimed, I will never ascribe any of my
Emma's actions to an improper motive! and she kissed the
girl with enthusiasm, while tears of affection dimmed the lustre
of her eyesbut the jewel, which nature has bestowed on all
her children, shone with its native radiance through those
healing
tears.
I don't know what is the matter with me this morning,
said Mrs. Epsom. I have not felt well since breakfast, and
she went to a closet, and mixing something in a tumbler
applied
to it as a medicine.
Before the good lady had taken the emptied glass from her
mouth, Spiffard enteredin that frame of mind which the
reader may imagine to have been the result of the conversation
and inuendos heard in the park, the ramble with Cooke, and
the soliloquy which followed; all of which we have made the
world duly acquainted with.
The first thing that caught his sight was the tumbler at the
mouth of Mrs. Epsom. His eye was fixed upon it, and upon
the old lady, with an expression, the description of which,
words cannot convey. All the terrific images which he had
been combatting rushed again triumphantly upon his
imagination
.
His lips were compressedhe was fixed to the spot
and the eyes of his wife and her mother were fixed upon him.
The latter turned away, put by the tumbler, and resumed her
seat with great and dignified composure.
Spiffard turned his eye to his wife with a look of inquiry.
What's the matter, Mr. Spiffard? she asked.
The matter? nothingII have had a long walk with
Mr. CookeII am a little fatigued. And he sat down.
His feelings approached to that sickness which occasions total
prostration of bodily powersome times called heart-sickness.
I hope, said Mrs. Spiffard, that the old gentleman was
gay and agreeable. He was not very clear at rehearsal, and cut
it rather short, leaving the prompter to supply his place. I am
afraid he has been busier with his bottle than his book. This
was spoken in a forced manner, and to hide the feelings
occasioned
by the previous scene.
What a pity it is, said Emma, who had now resumed her
secluded seat by the window, that a man of such talents
should be a slave to such a debasing vice.
It is a great pity, said the old lady, with a most
hypocritical
sigh, as she took a huge pinch of Irish blackguard.
It is damnable, cried Spiffard, with a tone and look which
was as new to his auditory as it was unaccountable from any
thing that had occurred since his appearance among them.
It is thus that we bring into new scenes and companies the
feelings
acquired elsewhereand which are discordant, and
sometimes
irritating, to those of the persons we approach; and thus
we, by our ill temper, mar the social harmony of our friends.
How is this to be avoided? By repressing our selfish
sensations
,
and adapting ourselves to those we mingle with.
Perfectly damnable, he continued. How can rational
creatures
be reconciled to the infamy which must attend so loathsome
a habit, even if they do not dread the misery that precedes the
death they purchase by their folly? We do not sufficiently show
our detestation of the practice in
men
, but even the most
thoughtless are shocked when they see it in a woman: and
he looked at Mrs. Epsom, not unobserved by his wife.
Indeed, Mr. Spiffard, you take the matter up too seriously,
and speak too severely, she said. A little stimulus is
necessary
,
absolutely necessary after, and sometimes during the
exertions our profession demands.
I deny the necessity, madam. If it exists, the profession
ought to be abandoned. This stimulating, when often repeated,
becomes a habit. The practitioner from a little goes to more,
until the stomach becomes vitiated, and the appetite depraved.
Then the time inevitably comes, when to refrain appears worse
than death; worse than the worst of deaths; a death of madness
and remorse! unless some friendly hand, or blessed
circumstance
,
snatches the victim from destruction.
I believe there is much truth in what you say, said his
wife; but I do not see what has occasioned your great warmth
on the subject at this moment. Before you came in, we were
engaged in a very interesting discussionone in which you will
take part; and I must make an appeal to you. What do you
think? our little Emma has determined never to enter within
the walls of the theatre; and I can assure you that she has
delivered
her determination with an emphasis and mannernot
to say discretionwhich has convinced me that she would be
the ornament of any stage in the world. But she abjures
playhouses
in totoat least all behind the curtain, if not both boxes
and stage.
She is right! said Spiffard, emphatically; the stage! no!
she is right!
Right? exclaimed the two actresses.
Yes, right. She is innocentshe is pureshe is
unsophisticated
and uncontaminated: and to remain so let her hold to
her determination.
Thank you, sir, said his wife, and her eyes flashed their
lightnings, and then were overclouded by the dark black
descending
brow; while her previously flushed cheek blanched.
My mother and myself are indebted to you!
The husband was silent. His silence was not that of one
who has said that which was wrong or untrue. He looked
firmly in the eyes of his wife, as if to read his destiny there.
Emma felt as if she was the cause of this threatening silence
the stillness which precedes the thunder's crashand she
wished to conduct, harmless, the lightnings of the gathering
storm. She lifted her sunny eyes as she spoke, and fixed them
upon Mrs. Spiffard.
Nay, cousin, Mr. Spiffard knows, as we all do, that many,
very many ladies, exemplary for virtues, as well as conspicuous
for talents and acquirements, have not only frequented the
theatre
,
but trod the stage. Ladies, who have adorned real life by
their good conduct, their prudence, and their charity, as
splendidly
as they did the stage by their accomplishments and genius.
I need not go to a foreign land for examples, when I can name
so many at homeand when I know and feel the purity and
virtues
of my kind and good cousin.
This was spoken by the charming girl with the full
confidence
of truth, for such was her conviction. But the words
entered the soul of Mrs. Spiffard like a two-edged sword. The
blood rushed to her faceher cheeks burnedand from her
lowering brow and dark eyes, flashed a glance upon Emma,
such as only truth might bear unharmed. But it met the open
eye and arched brow of innocence, unconscious of offending,
and the glance of the conscience-stricken was cast on the floor,
with an expression of troubled emotion, confused ideas, and
wandering thoughts, almost too much for endurance.
Emma felt that she had failed to produce the good she wished;
but could little conceive the cause of the failure. The gloomy
silence continued. At length Spiffard spoke, mildly and in a
subdued tone. Mrs. Spiffard, said he, rising, and taking her
hand, I have something to communicate to you.
The lady rose gloomily to accompany her lord.
I will finish this ruffle up stairs, and bring it to you in a
minute or two, said Emma; and without waiting reply she left
the room with an air as light and graceful as we may imagine
the waving of an angel's plumes, when winged to the regions of
bliss.
There was a pause of a few moments. Zeb seemed to think
that as the young lady had left the room, the old lady might do
the same; but old ladies do not always follow the example of
young ones; and when they do, they do not always move upon
angels' wings. She did not seem inclined to move at all. The
husband sat down. His wife took her seat again in a dignified
sullen silence. He revolved in his mind the communication he
had to make. Should he speak of the remarks of the young
men? He dismissed the thought. How should he break the
subject? His reverie was interrupted by his wife's voice.
Mamma, Mr. Spiffard, it appears, has some private
communication
to make to me. Shall we retire? and she again
moved from her seat.
I am going, child. And the stately dame took a liberal
pinch of snuff, gathered together her sewing materials, and her
book, and with a swimming air and no very sweet expression of
countenance, left her son and daughter to the matrimonial
happiness
which appeared to await them.
Mrs. Spiffard looked gloomily upon her spouse. He started
upwalkedand then sat down again.
The importance of our subjectviz.conjugal happiness, or
the reverse, is so great, that we are compelled to commence
another chapter before venturing upon it.
VOL. I. 4
CHAPTER IV.
Explanations and Concealments
.
will but join you together as they join wainscot; then one of
you will prove a shrunk
pannel
, and like green timber, warpwarp!
Wooing, wedding, and repenting, is as a Scotch jig;****** the firstfull
as fantasticalthe wedding mannerly-modestthen comes repentance and
*** falls into a cinque-pacetill he sinks into his grave.
Shakspeare
.
It
is no trifling matter, gentle reader, for us to draw aside the
veil of the matrimonial sanctuaryand expose to your gaze the
mysteries of wedded life. Be assured it is not to gratify your
idle curiosity that we do it, but to show you the inevitable
consequences
of ill-assorted unionsmatches that smell of the
brimstoneand to point out the blessings which as certainly
flow from a marriage in which the parties are induced to make
the important contract from a knowledge of each other's good
qualities founded upon long continued observation, and a sense
of their moral duties. To such, the quotations at the head of
this chapter do not apply.
Neither will we exclude from the list of good qualities, in male
or female, youth, health, or beauty. We would have you,
madam (or miss,) to marry a man
a little
older than yourself,
even ten years older if you should be foolish enough to think
of a husband at fifteen. Now, our hero, Zebediah Spiffard,
was five years younger than his wife, and this was not as it
ought to be, though the experiment may succeed. But, my
dear young ladies, as you value soul or body, do not marry an
old manor even an elderly gentleman of fiftywig or no
wighowever tempting his riches, his accomplishments, his
knowledge of the world, or even his virtues. Nature has
forbidden
it; and she will be obeyed, or the pains and penalties
must be inflicted for the breach of her laws.
She
does not
bring those who break them into court, formally to arraign, try,
condemn, and punish themthe crime, as in many other
cases, brings its own punishment. As to the old
gentleman
,
or man of fifty, if he must have a wife, let him be content
to marry
merit
, and waive pretensions to youth and beauty.
But it is time we return to the man and wife of our story.
Mr. and Mrs. Spiffard, were left, by the departure of Emma
Portland and Mrs. Epsom, to the full and free enjoyment of
the bitter cup which they had been preparing for themselves
each for the otherand each for selfby precipitation on one
part, and deception on the other.
Spiffard still continued sitting, as if unconscious of the
departure
of the young lady or the old; or as if he had no part to
play in the matrimonial scene. In truth he was at a loss how
to begin.
Before he had arrived at the theatre of action, he thought he
had resolved to tell his wife
how
evil tongues spoke of her;
and to question her bluntly; but now, that she was before him,
he had not the heart to do it. In truth, his nature was such
that he would not willingly inflict pain upon any human being,
and much less upon one who loved him. We say he would
not willingly, that is, when reason was unclouded by passion.
But it had become necessary that their marriage should be
announcedthat his wife's
name
; that the words `Mrs. Spiffard'
should be in the play-bills. It had been at his request that the
union had been kept private, meaning to announce it at the end
of the theatrical season. The secrecy had originated in a fear,
which he did not avow to himself, of the ridicule of these same
young gentlemen, who had now, by commencing an attack
upon him, forced him to avow his blissful state. And what
reason should he give for the change of plan and opinion?
Spiffard was a lover of truth; a declaimer against disguise:
he had deviated from the path of rectitude in concealing his
marriage; he had acted under the influence of self-delusion,
and contrary to sober conviction, in contracting it: he was
punished by the consequences naturally flowing from the fault.
Mrs. Spiffard had resumed her uneasy seat, and sat looking
at the livid countenance of her husband, and feeling
that
sickness
of the heart which the consciousness of hidden acts, and
the fear of detection, causes. At length, impatient of a
suspense
which became more dreadful each moment, and tortured
by imaginings more harrowing than any reality, she started
from her chair, and arousing all that whirlwind of passion
which a bad education, and evil example from childhood, had
made her own, and, as it were, engrafted upon her better
nature
,
(and a display of which had never been made before her
present husband, or even her cousin Emma,) she folded her
beautiful arms, and with a step which is called theatrical, but
which is the true indication of lofty feeling or great excitement,
and belongs to the nature of passion, she walked the room,
bending on her lord as threatening a look as ever Lady
Macbeth
bestowed upon her wavering would-be-king when he
hesitated to do that which he wished done; letting I dare
not wait upon I would, like the poor cat i'the adage. At
length she ceased her walk, and stood before him; and, after a
pause, assuming a tone of irony, she said, I thought you had
something of high import to propose, Mr. Spiffard!
Please to sit down, madam, said Zeb, who had been
roused by his wife's tone and attitude; please to be seated,
and he led her to her chair. She resumed her seat with a
scornful toss of the head. He slowly drew his chair near,
and placed himself beside her.
It has become necessary, Mrs. Spiffard, that our marriage
should be announced.
A weight was lifted from the lady's bosomshe breathed
freerand replied, the concealment was a plan of your own,
Mr. Spiffard.
It was, madam, and like all concealments, was foolish if
not criminal, and rewarded accordingly.
Mrs. Spiffard felt the blood rush to her cheeks and forehead
again she breathed hard, as she said, What has changed
your view of the subject?I meanwhat ?
Our hero felt unequal to the task of telling the truth, although
thus questioned. He shrunk from inflicting pain on one who
had committed her welfare to his keeping. He took refuge in
a second concealment, while reprobating the first. This is
weakness, but not uncommon. He hesitated, and then said,
concealment looks like fear of shameor consciousness of
wrong.
The concealment was in compliance with your wish,
replied his wife; but in a tone faltering and subdued.
My intention was, as I then stated to you, that your
name should remain unaltered in the bills until the end of your
present engagement; when we would leave town, and
announce
our marriage at the time. But circumstances
impertinent
in
short, it is best to tell the truth openlyand meet
he hesitated.
Mrs. Spiffard again had been pale; now, the blood rushed
to her face and neck. Meet what, sir?
The consequences.
The consequences! she repeated. The consequences!
At least, he continued, when it is known that you are
my wife, I shall not hearorif I doI shall have a right to
resent as insults to myself again he hesitated.
The haughty spirit of the unfortunate woman had been
aroused. She had begun the conversation in a strain of high
feeling, and a tone of offended pride, and assumed superiority;
but conscience now asserted its rights. We mean, by
conscience
,
the memory of past transactions, which reason
pronounces
to be wrong. And the inward inquiry of, What has
he heard? overpowered her.
It is the misfortune of our professionits curse at
length, she said, that the idle, the mischievous, and the
malignant
,
feel at liberty to suggest any ill, or frame any report to
our detriment, and the world is ready to credit any story that
may be fabricated to the disadvantage of an actress.
It is too true. But you can defy?
I do defy, sir!
Short as had been the time between the quailing of her lofty
spirit and the last question, she had rallied the energies of
her character, so far, at least, as to
act
the offended innocent,
but it was in a style of unnatural exaggeration; which,
although
not satisfactory to her husband, gave an excuse and
opportunity for self-delusion; and he resolved to believe,
where it was so much his interest that the belief should be well
founded. Much of the belief of this credulous world has the
same species of foundation.
All the native kindly disposition of the water-drinker
returned
or
rather burst forth from the cloud which had obscured it
and taking his wife's hand, he said, I have been urged to
uneasiness, irritation, anxious thought, and almost to unjust
suspicions, by the foolish babble of two or three gentlemen, who
no doubt knew, by some means, of our marriage, and took this
mode of punishing me for the concealment. They perhaps,
for the moment, think themselves justifiable; though I cannot
see how the term
quiz
or
hoax
can justify falsehood of any
description
.
Truth is too sacred to be jested with; and its
violation
,
in any shape, is a blot upon the character of man or
woman; it is a fault that ought to be punished by the contempt
of the world, as well as by self-disapprobation. I will
immediately
announce our marriage. I wronged both you and
myself
in the wish for a moment's concealment. Your name
shall appear as Mrs. Spiffard in the next bills of the theatre.
This will prevent any more
hoaxing;
and I hope you will
forgive me for allowing the jests of these thoughtless young
men to have a momentary effect upon me.
Mrs. Spiffard burst into tears. She was moved by
conflicting
thoughts; and, though tears were a relief, there was a
portion of bitterness mingled in the stream from the
overflowing
cup of conscience.
4*
The husband spoke soothingly. Come, come, no more
of thisI am going out for a short timewhen I come back
let me see that this cloud has left no trace behind it.
Oh, God! oh, God! what a wretch am I! exclaimed his
wife, as soon as left alone.
Having thus introduced our readers (in that abrupt manner
recommended by critics, and long practised by story-tellers in
prose and verse,) to some of the prominent personages of our
history, we will now go to the beginning, and, soberly and
regularly, give an account of the birth, parentage, and
education
of Zebediah Spiffard; and perhaps show that he is of
noble descent, and might bear heraldric honours on his coach,
if he had onethat is as it may be.
We will speak of the water-drinker, showing how he passed
through the states or
stages
of lifeof a barefooted Green
Mountain boya Boston lawyer's clerkand a travelling
yankee gentleman, to the
stage
, on which we found him, of the
New-York Theatre. But in all this it will be our pleasant
duty, more especially, to account for that morbid sensibility,
which was woven into his very essence, on the subject of
ebriety; that dread which he entertained of the effects of any
approach to a habit of intemperancea dread, which, with the
species of fascination that every victim to the habit exerted
over him, formed the basis of his character.
CHAPTER V.
Beginning of a Townand a Man
.
For the table, sir, it shall be served in; for the meat, sir, it shall be
covered
;
for your coming in to dinner, sir, let it be as humours and conceits
shall govern.
Shakspeare
.
Fair laughs the morn, and soft the zephyr blows,
While proudly riding o'er the azure realm,
In gallant trim the gilded vessel goes;
Youth on the prow, and pleasure at the helm:
Regardless of the sweeping whirlwind's sway,
That hushed in grim repose, expects his evening prey.
Gray
.
Gentle
and courteous reader, or rather readers, (for like
Legion, ye are many that shall read these memoirs;) fair
readers
for
the life of Zebediah Spiffard will be read by every
female that can read, (and all read in this our happy land;) this
book will be sought after by the fair sex, inasmuch as it treats
of the gay and the gravethe good and badof ladies, and of
those who, next to soldiers, are the delight of ladies; we mean
players; those lively, happy, delightful children of the mimic
world, who present to the minds of youth a picture of
enchanting
power, ever varying and ever bright. Kind readers,
of both sexes, we sit down determined to write for your
amusement
,
(far be it from us to attempt to instruct you,) a faithful
narrative of adventures appertaining to the romance of real life,
from the perusal of which you shall undoubtedly rise as tired in
mind and body, owing to excessive excitement and long
continued
gratification, as ever you did from the representation of
a play, or even of an Italian opera. But as we have promised to
begin at the beginning, we must hasten to commence our story.
Zebediah Spiffard was born in the month of October, of the
year 1786, in an obscure but very pleasant village, appertaining
to the truly democratic state of Vermont. His father had been
one of the first settlers, a pioneer, and the village, in
accordance
with self-complacency, which makes so great an item in
the account of human happiness, was called Spiffard Town.
Squire Spiffard, our hero's father, made the first clearing in
the valley of Long-pond, where he arrived with all his worldly
possessions, (an axe, a yoke of oxen, a wagon, and a wife,)
before a tree had been felled; and where he, in a few years,
saw a thriving village, the fruit of his enterprising industry,
spread from his dwelling and surround him; the inhabitants of
which were grateful to the man who had led them to the
wilderness
,
pointing their way to a land flowing with milk and honey.
His first shelter, a log hut, now (that is, at this second
beginning
of our history, and the first beginning of the life of our
hero in 1786,) appertained, or was appended to the neat and
spacious white mansion that sheltered his numerous offspring,
and served as a wash-house, having previously served as a
kitchen, when the present kitchen was the mansion-house.
Such is the progress of a settler in the wilderness, and it is
but a few years since Vermont was such. The log
hut
is at
first parlour, kitchen, and hall; then is erected the log
house
,
larger, better furnished, and more comfortably plastered with
clay; then the hut becomes the kitchen, and shortly after, (a
saw-mill having been erected on a neighbouring stream,) the
framed and planked mansion arises, the house becomes, in its
turn, the kitchen, while the original germ, the hut, is degraded
to a wash-house or pig-sty.
Instead of looking, as he once did, from the door of his lowly
dwelling, on a thick and almost impenetrable forest, his own
clearing alone giving him a peep at the beautiful sheet of water
he called a pond, Squire Spiffard now saw a long street of
comfortable
houses, each with its garden and orchard, while the
spires of the Court-house, the school, and the church, marked
the presence of justice, education, and religion. It is true that
the squire's house, like those of most of his neighbours, was not
finished. The upper story served, however, for
bed-chambers
and store-rooms; and below, or on the ground floor, all
looked and was comfortableincluding the best bed-chamber
for the ever welcome guest.
So rapid is the progress of Yankee improvement, that by the
time our hero was qualified to appreciate its beauties, the valley
of Long-pond had become a little paradise. We do not mean
a heavenly, but an earthly paradise, with all its concomitant
imperfections
,
yet possessing that paradisaical feature, youth, with
its bloom and growing perfection; and in spite of the diseases
incident to youth, a total absence of every symptom of decay.
A row of neat white houses, separated from each other by
cultivated enclosures, skirted the level road formed at the foot
of one of those hills that encircled this valley. This road was
on the margin of a lake, which, after the homely manner of our
country, was called a pond; and which presented its sweet
waters to the eye, limpid as those of Lake George, so well
known to those for whom I write.
This lovely sheet of pure water extended for miles in front
of the dwellings occupied by Yankee yeoman, (not farmers of
the soil but proprietors,) serving and delighting their wives, and
swarms of white-headed urchins. The pond gave to the
villagers
fish and wild fowl, and afforded the male children
opportunities
for exercise in swimming, rowing, sliding, and skaiting.
Between the road and the lake, the comfields and meadows
spread in rich luxuriance; and as you ascended the hill behind
the houses, you were cheered, in the spring, by the fragrance
of the apple blossoms, and in autumn, by fruit of every tint and
flavour. In winter, the hearths blazed with piles of hickory, and
were made to resound with the shouts of gladness by the
frequent
husking frolic; when the yellow ears of maize are stript
of their outward dusky covering, and the grain rasped from
the cob, and poured into the basket or bin; while the rustic jest,
or the tale of grandfather's wars with the Indians on
Connecticut
riveror father's adventures when opposed to Burgoyne, at
old
Tye
, Bennington, or Saratoga, mingle with the cracking of
the
kisskatomasses
, the chesnuts, the butternuts, and walnuts,
and are interrupted by draughts of the precious juice of the crab,
the spitzbergen, and the red-streak, from the orchard
exhaustless
source of innocent exhilaration--the gift of heaven, not yet
converted to a curse by the poison-making still.
It is not our intention to enter into descriptions of the life of
the pioneer on an American settlement; let the reader look to
the pages of Flint, or the inimitable pictures of nature,
character
,
and manners, in The Pioneers of Fennimore Cooper.
We merely wish to give some notion of the place of our hero's
birth, and of those scenes which surrounded his infancy and
boyhood at Spiffard Town; for these scenes of early life are
ever present to the adult, go where he will in after days, and
the impressions from them make part of his character, and
influence
his actions, whether as a
Ledyard
, he explores the
Pacific ocean and the deserts of Africa, or as a
Starke
or a
Greene
leads his brother yeomen to encounter the invader of
home and the homestead. The scenery and scenes of the
Valley
of Long-pond, tended to form a part of the character of
Zebediah
Spiffard, and therefore appertain to his memoirs.
We have said, that behind the row of houses which formed
the village, was a gently-rising hill, on which bloomed the
health-giving
orchard. A few gardens likewise decorated this
beautiful
hill, with here and there a grove of the undisturbed native
growth of the soil, giving a touch of the picturesque to what
would otherwise have been too uniform. Do not let it be
supposed
that we mean to insinuate that the gardens had too much
regularity, or neatness, or uniformity; for, except the squire's
and the parson's, they exhibited a sufficient portion of luxuriant
negligence about them to avert that charge, and in truth were
many of them more abundant in weeds than in worth. The
church likewise ornamented this favoured hill (which in
England
would have been a mountain), and its rustic spire was a
heart-soothing feature in the landscape, whether seen from the
rock which towered above its vane, or from the lake in which
its peace-inspiring image was reflected.
We have given some account of the Adam or first man of
this paradise, by name Jeremiah Spiffard, and by title squire;
but as there never was a paradise without an Eve, or a
Zebediah
without a mother, it is incumbent upon us to introduce
the squire's lady, and Zeb's mamma, to the reader. The squire
had brought with him to the wilderness, as we have said, and
we do not like repetitions, but, at the same time, know that they
are very useful to the memories of novel readers, or even the
readers of true histories like this; be that as it may, we have
said, and we repeat, he brought with him to the wilderness a
yoke of oxen, an axe, a wagon, and a wife. Before the thicket
became a paradisebefore the swamps on the borders of the
lake became meadows, or the blessed sun had been permitted
to shine upon the earth and dissipate the encumbent fogs and
redundant moisture, poor Mrs. Spiffard died. The husband
was left wifeless, childless, and disconsolate. He had loved his
wife. She was his first love, and perhaps he never loved again.
Marry again he certainly did, or we should never have written
these memoirs of his oldest and lawfully-begotten son.
After bearing up manfully for a time without a help-mate
after seeing all clear around himsettlers coming in upon his
land as fast as a land-owner could wisha school-house, a
tavern
,
and a church built, he paid a visit to Boston, where his
elder brother resided, and in truth his principal business was to
seek a wife. He felt it to be his duty to contribute to the
school-house
and church. Under such circumstances the object is
soon found. Some of those who purchased his lands and
brought families into the settlement, said they thought Squire
Spiffard might have found a wife among their daughters, as fit
for a squire's lady at the Valley of Long-pond, as any he would
be like to find among the fine ladies of Boston. Perhaps they
were right. We shall see.
An Englishman, Mr. James Atherton, had recently arrived
at the metropolis of Massachusetts, in search of what he had
lost in Londonfortune. He was what Shakspeare has called
an ebbing man; and has said
Ebbing men, indeed,
Most often do so near the bottom run
By fear or sloth.
He had run so near the bottom as to touch. He brought with
him a wife and three daughters, two of whom, although, until
the voyage of emigration, they had scarcely been out of the
sound of Bow-bell, and never in the first, or perhaps second,
circles of that country of circles, were nevertheless genteel, and
what is called well-educated; the third was yet a child. A
knowledge of the new world into which their father had brought
them, had not been thought of, as a part of their education.
Their father knew as little of it, except as a mart for
merchandise
and a nursery of rebellion. Europeans, then, disdained
such knowledge. They have since been induced to inquire
how it is, that a people of many millions manage to prosper
without the protection of kings or lords, or a national church,
or a standing army; and by what contrivance they render
harmless
the hosts of paupers and criminals, which want and
worthlessness
drive from the shores of the old world, for refuge in
the new.
The elder daughters of Mr. Atherton had the usual cockney
contempt for all foreigners, especially Yankees; and although
conscious of their father's humiliating necessities, felt themselves
better than any thing in Boston. The oldest of these young
ladies
,
who was about five-and-twenty, was what is called showy;
nay, she was handsome. Fine, dark, glossy hair, fine teeth,
fine complexion, brilliant eyes, tall person, fashionable dress,
and an animated manner, fascinated the Vermont yeoman; who
would have been despised by the second sister, a more decided
beauty (though very like the first), and perhaps by Louisa, the
oldest of the three, if the prudent father had not given her some
hints which were not to be neglected. In short, Jeremiah
Spiffard
married the beautiful English fine lady, and took her to
Spiffard-town, at that time consisting of five houses, a
school-house
,
tavern, church, and blacksmith's-shop.
What a change was here! From the metropolis of Great
Britain, to a paltry village in Vermont. From a Lord mayor's
ball to a husking frolic. To live in Boston was death to Louisa,
(so she said), what, then, was life in Spiffard-town? Her
husband's
good sense and kind behaviour, with handsome furniture
and garniture brought from Boston, made this death in life
somewhat supportable. Then there was some satisfaction in
showing off to the natives, and in being the great lady of the
place. Besides that, during the first year of her residence, she
experienced the fears, hopes, and joys, attending the birth of
our hero. Then came a visit to Boston to see her family, who
were preparing to return, disappointed, to England. They did
return; and Mrs. Spiffard the second, returned to
Spiffard-town
,
feeling that she was abandoned by all that she held most
valuable in the world: for what, alas! to a London lady, is a
Yankee husband, and a Yankee child, if she is doomed to live
in a Yankee village?
Thus Squire Spiffard had not only got a town lady, but a
foreign
ladya London ladyfor a wife. Never let an
American
marry an Englishwoman, unless he is willing and resolved
to abandon his country. We say English, because we know
more
of them, and think
higher
of them, than of any other
Europeans
.
If an American marries in England, and brings his
wife home, it is almost impossible but that domestic misery is
the consequence. No English
man
has a just notion of this
country; and we must not expect better information in the
better
sex, who are accustomed to rely for that article too much
upon the stronger. A woman, who, even under the influence
of love, gives up parents and country, will find every
disappointment
doubled, and every sorrow aggravated, by the recollection
of what she left behind; and disappointments and sorrows will
come, do what we will. Spiffard had the consolation of
knowing
that he did not induce his wife to leave her country; but
then he was the cause that she did not return to it. In short,
he had made a very foolish choice of a wife. Mrs. Spiffard
became a very discontented woman; and not the less so, for
finding that her claims to superiority were resisted or laughed
at by the wives and daughters of the settlers, who rapidly
increased
her husband's village; many of whom were, in all the
better part of knowledge, better instructed than the squire's
lady.
CHAPTER VI.
A Sporling Gentleman, and a Philosophic Lady
.
Alas! poor hurt fowl! Now will he creep in sedges.
Tyrants,
To fright the animals, and kill them up
In their assigned and native place.
A poor sequester'd stag
That from the hunter's
aim had ta'en a hurt
Did come to languish.
Shakspeare
.
Another
year passed, and another child was given to the
husband; and early in the third year of her residence at
Spiffard-town
,
the arrival of an English gentleman of fortune, with
his wife and two young children, gave a gleam of joy to the
misplaced Louisa; but only to plunge her in deeper darkness.
The gentleman brought letters from Mrs. Spiffard's father;
and having, as he thought, determined to make America the
place of his future residence, only inquired for a good sporting
country; and being told that Spiffard-town and its vicinity
abounded in game, and was destitute of game-laws, he never
doubted that the pheasant of Asia (domesticated in his father's
park), and the partridge of Europe, were natives of the Green
Mountains; especially as he found real English snipe on the
borders of the lake, woodcock on the upland, and deer, by
the herd, all along Champlain. He fixed, at once, on that
sequestered spot, purchased land, and began to plan a
mansion-house
,
park, gardens, and pleasure-grounds; but, in the
meantime
,
found no difficulty in purchasing the house and
improvements
of a sturdy yeoman, who began to think he had too
many neighbours, and turned his thoughts to the Genesee
country. The lady of this gentleman had no apparent wish for
introduction to those of her own sex and station in Boston (the
port at which they landed), but seemed willing to seek romantic
solitude among those, whom she called the unsophisticated
farmers of a new and innocent world.
This gentleman's name was Lovedog. This is not a coined
name to express character, like Fielding's Allworthy, or the
Lovegold, the Crackjaw, and the thousand others of Comedy,
but a real family, English name; and that it should denote the
bearer's character, is not our fault. It certainly did so: for
Mr. Lovedog bestowed no small portion of his affections on
some very fine pointers, setters, and terriers, who had
accompanied
him from England. Until he could determine on a site
for his intended buildings and plantations, he endeavoured to
content himself in the house recently built by a Connecticut
settler, who, having got all comfortable about him, was very
glad to sell his buildings and go west, leaving the rich
Englishman
to furnish his purchase by importations from Boston
and New-York.
The sportsman was out with his gun and dogs every day and
all day. Sometimes Spiffard accompanied, but generally he
went alonehis dogs his only companions. Spiffard used to
say, that it was very pleasant to him, to ramble over hills and
dales, and that he felt great exultation when he attained
sufficient
skill to strike down a distant bird in its rapid flight, and to
be as expert with a double-barreled fowling-piece, as he had
from youth been with a musket and rifle; but when he saw that
he wounded more birds than he killedthat he frequently, after
having brought to the earth, with a broken wing, an innocent
and a harmless fellow-creature, had to chase it before he could
make prey of it, and while struggling in agony and terror, to
VOL. I. 5
crush its head or dash it on a stone through mere mercy, he
began
to think that what was sport to him was worse than death to
creatures endowed with life by the same Creator who blessed
him with health and strength; creatures enjoying the same
blessings in another degree;this gave him pauseand
reason told him that he was counteracting God's will. He
frequently
observed too that a bird though wounded escaped, and he
knew that there was no surgeon to cure the wound, or nurse to
attend the patientfor misery doth part the flux of company
the herd shun the wounded stagthe struck bird seeks the
rushes and there pines and dies in solitude. One day Spiffard
exultingly brought down a bird from its flightthe fowl was
winged only, and ran. The triumphant
man
pursuedovertook,
and placed his foot on his victim. He stooped to seize itthe
bird turned up his eye and looked him full in the face with such
an imploring, such a reproving glance, that his heart smote
him; and his reason rebuked him as a convicted murderera
murderer for sport. In times long after he has said, I have
seen that eye a thousand times. He never discharged a gun
to kill for pleasure again.
At the proper season for the sport, for the time and season
for hunting each species of game was observed by the rough
VermontersLovedog was shown, by a neighbour, the manner
of hunting the deer in America. Here the free denizens of the
forest were as free as the citizens of the republic who trespassed
on their haunts, and sought their lives in sport. Lovedog had
been only accustomed to see the beautiful animal in the parks
of the lordly aristocrats of England, protected from commoners
by laws which seemed to value their lives as if equal to the lives
of men, but which only protected them from vulgar
interference
with the lord's pastimes, to be sacrificed to the luxury,
the pleasures, and the pomp of the chosen few, the titled
Nimrods
,
deriving what they call their rights from the conquering
Norman, who desolated provinces to form privileged hunting
forests for his own gratification. The English sportsman now
saw the beautiful animal in a state of nature, free to rove his
native
woodlands. The novelty pleased the gentleman for a time,
but he soon became weary of the change; and the deer hunt of
Vermont suffered in comparison with the sports he had been
used to, as much as the shooting of the partridges, snipe, and
grouse of the country, appeared contemptible and laborious,
compared with the same kind of bloody amusement, of which he
had been a privileged participant in the enclosures devoted to
the lordly game. He sighed for the park and the race-course
of England. If he had sighed for the intellectual pleasures of
that favoured country, he might be pitied in his voluntary exile,
but such pleasures were to him unknown.
Therefore while Lovedog continued in Vermont, his pointers
and setters were almost exclusively his associates. Spiffard
said, some time after, that his dogs were his only fit companions.
In truth, it was hard to conceive that an English gentleman of
fortune (and fortune he certainly had) could be so profoundly
ignorant as Lovedog. Not so his wife. She was almost blue.
She had not only read, but conversed with the Darwins,
Hayleys
,
Sheridans, Moores, and Sewards. But she was as totally
ignorant of the world she had come to, as she was of the world
to come. She thought she was a philosopher, and was willing
to be thought an atheist, rather than her philosophy should be
doubted. Voltaire, Rousseau, Condorcet, Helvetius, Hume and
Gibbon, were at her tongue's tip. She imagined that on coming
to America she should find an Arcadia, such as she
imagined
Arcadia had been; and was determined to be the lawgiver, the
female Solon of an Utopia, such as she thought an Utopia ought
to be. She found herself in Spiffard-town, among practical
pioneers, and was soon solicited for her contribution to the
building
a new church, and the support of a new clergyman who
preached thorough-going Calvinism in the school house, until his
pulpit and steeple should be erected.
Disappointed in not finding an Utopia, she imagined herself
in a Botany bay. Mrs. Lovedog soon tired of, and became
tiresome to her neighbours. The yeomen's wives, (simple souls!)
were shocked at what they thought indecency, and she was
disgusted
by what she (enlightened creature!) termed
mauvaise
honte
, false delicacy, and unphilosophical ignorance. Mrs.
Spiffard was neither a blue, nor a Yankee, and therefore was
treated with indulgent condescending politeness; a mode of
treatment sometimes felt as insult: not so in this instance.
Being countrywomen, there was a bond of union which
continued
unimpaired when the bonds were all broken which united
Mrs. Lovedog and the other females of the village. Mrs.
Spiffard
,
though she had conformed, by degrees, to the mode of those
among whom she had been thrown, was pleased to find that
boldand as we think, indelicate style of conversation and
choice of subject in Mrs. Lovedog, to which she had been
accustomed
at home. She was become, in most things, a disciple of
the dashing female philosopher; but at length Spiffard became
dissatisfied; for he found that the learned lady prescribed
ether and laudanum to his wife as well as materialism and
irreligion.
There are many, male and female, who, living in what are
called christian countries, have no notion of the essence of
christianity. Many think only, (when they think at all, on the
subject) of abuses practised by nominal christians. They are
taught to abhor the actions and teachings of wolves in sheep's
clothing, and to cry all is false. There are many again, who
admit that the lessons and life of the author of christianity are
truly admirable. If they would believe and imitate that life and
teaching, we should not deny them a place among christians,
whatever name they may assume. Mrs. Lovedog could talk
of the beauty of that life and that teaching, as of an admirable
fictionshe neither believed, nor felt. Her husband hated
priests, because he had paid tithes. He had been taught
something
at school about Moses and Christ, but had forgotten
whether they were racers or pointers.
The female philosopher having discovered that her neighbours
were not unsophisticated shepherds and shepherdesses of an
Utopian Arcadia, adopted an opinion on the other extreme, and
concluded that they were all sharpers or thieves. This led to
conduct which sometimes produced odd results, and often
covered
her with ridicule.
The servants she brought from England soon left her in
pursuit
of that independence which they saw others all around them
enjoying, or anticipating.
Help
she could not tolerate, nor
could the yeomen's daughters tolerate her manners or caprices;
neither would they condescend to be servants. The name, and
state of servitude had been made vile in America by the English
traffic in African slaves, and the English policy in attempting to
poison their colonies with the convicted thieves and other
outcasts
of their prisons. Mrs. Lovedog had been reduced to the
pitiful establishment of an old negress as a cook, and a little
girl from a neighbouring settlement, whose parents had on
overflowing
log-house; and were persuaded that the English lady
would instruct the girl and treat her as a companion, or child of
the family. Never were expectations less realized. Poor little
Sophy was a perfect slave to this lover of Utopian liberty; and
was taught little else, than to tremble in the presence of this
fair disciple of universal benevolence.
Nothing went according to previous anticipation in this
affluent
family, who were following their own unshackled wishes in
pursuit of happiness, but never suspected that the road to
happiness
was pointed out on a way-post in large letters, Love
God and your neighbour.
It happened one day that a sturdy yeoman, who had a territory
on the other side of the lake, much more extensive than that
of many a German sovereign, having taken more fish in his net
than he wanted for his family and immediate neighbours,
crossed
over to Spiffard-town to find a market for the surplus, and
with the produce buy tea and sugar,for although princely in
territory, his treasury was not filled by the labour of slaves or
subjects. He was directed to Lovedog's house; knocked:
was refused entrance at the street door, and told to go round
to the kitchen. Several messages and replies, reiterations,
replications
and rejoinders, through the medium of momo Dinah
and Sophy had passed and repassed between the Yankee and
the lady, until at length little Sophy came to inquire, from the
learned lady, if the fish were salt-water fish?
This question excited the loud laughter of both the farmer
and the black cook.
Who eber hear of such a ting in Varmount, said Dinah.
O dang it, she's quizzing me, said the farmer. And he took
his basket of salmon-trout, and half laughing, half offended, he
trudged off, determined to give, or sell, or
dicker
, the fish at his
friend Spiffard's.
Well Sophy! What does he say? Are they from the ocean?
Ma'am? said the timid girl, who had never heard the word
before.
Are they salt-water fish, child? What is his answer?
He said you were quizzing him.
I do not treat such folks with that familiarity. Tell him to
leave three or four with the cook, and call on Mr. Lovedog for
the money.
He's gone, Ma'am.
Gone! He must have come with some sinister purpose!
He only come with the fish, Ma'am.
Tell Diana to see that the spoons are all safeand the
silver forksand the silver handled carving-knife that she took
a few minutes ago from the knife-case.
Sophy went to the kitchen. The lady resumed her studies.
She was reading Zimmerman on solitude. Charming writer!
what a soothing quiet he sheds over the soul! All
perturbation
ceases! And the stormy passions which assail us in the
great world are put to rest forever!
Sophy returned with a report which tested the power of
Zimmerman
.
A report confirming former opinions of the dishonest
propensities of the corrupted and debased population she had
been enticed to trust herself among.
O solitude! how tranquilizing thy influence to the lover of
5 *
unsophisticated nature! Well child! What have you to say?
Momo Dinah says she can't find the carving knife.
The old negress, wanting pot-herbs, had taken the knife as
the first trenchant instrument she could lay her hand upon, and
having accomplished her purpose, left it in the garden; she now
looked for it in every
other place
she could think of.
I thought as much! Sophy! run after the man! He's a
thief! Tell him to bring back my carving-knife!Why do you
stand gazing like an idiot! Run! instantly! Where is there a
constable? Why do you stop?Run!bring him back!
The girl, who feared the lady more than she did any of her
own country folk, after recovering from her surprise, darted off
in pursuit, and soon overtook the heavy trudging yeoman, who
was every now and then ejaculating, Well!after all! these
old-country folk are more queer than cute. Salt water fish up
here in the green mountains!
Mister! shouted Sophy as she drew near. I don't know
your name, sir!
NoI suppose not, and he put down his basket of fish.
My name's Bloodgood. Well, my child, and what would you
havewith me?Why you are out of breath with running. Does
the fine lady want some lobsters? You are a nice little girl, he
continued, as he smiled and patted her curly head, are you
from the old country too? I have half a dozen at home, and
not one as pretty as you.
Mrs. Lovedogsir and the child stoppedpartly from
want of breath, and partly from shame and reluctance to deliver
her messagefor she would as soon have suspected the parson
of stealing, as any other of the inhabitants of the neighbourhood.
Ha ha ha! salt water fish for Mrs. Lovedog! If she wants
the fish she must come arter umfresh or salt!
She says, sirshe saysyou must bring back
Must! No, no I'll be dang'd if I do. I am not one of
your brook trout to be played back and forth with a hair line as
her husband catches um. I am not angry with you, my dear
but the fish won't bite again.
She says, siryou must bring back the carving-knife.
The
what
?
The carving-knife, sir.
My American readers will understand the feelings of the
Green Mountain yeoman, when the thought occurred that he
was suspected of being a thief.He repeated several times the
words carving-knife, before he formed any conception that he
had been accused of stealing. When he understood the mes
sage, the blood rushed to his face and he shouted in a voice of
thunder, What! Does she take me for a thief?
Sophy frightened, answered, Yes, sir, and made one of her
best curtseys.
Well, that's too good! Don't be frightened, child! If her
husband!Don't be scar't!Go back and tell her, she may
go to
England. And so saying, Bloodgood took up his
basket
,
turned and trudged on again towards Spiffard's, rather
sullenly
but
soon began to laugh. Well, I will be the first to
tell squire Spiffard of this,
however
! A thief!Steal! a
carving-knife
!
Why the woman's mad!
Poor Sophy returned with the message of, He says,
ma'am
Where's the knife?
He says, Ma'am,you may go to England.
Just then Lovedog with his pointers at his heels and his game
bag full of woodcock, returned from the chase. He had come
from an opposite direction to that yeoman Bloodgood had taken.
He was tiredbut there was no rest for him. He must go,
so said his wife, to Spiffard's, and take measures to apprehend
the thief of the carving-knife.
What would have been the result of the meeting under such
circumstances, between the English sportsman and the Yankee
yeoman, we will not pretend to say. May strife never again
arm the son of Old England and the New England man against
each other! The trial of valour was not now destined to be made,
for happily, Dinah, wanting more pot-herbs for her cookery,
took another knife, and, as Shakspeare says, shooting another
bolt the self-same way, she found the first. That is, carrying
a second knife to the parsley bed, she found the first where she
had left it.
[1]
[1]
This incident is founded on fact.
Such, sometimes, English men and English women appear
amongst Yankees. So they torment themselves, and are
laughed
at by those around themand then they go home, and the
learned ladies write books, (Mrs. Lovedog published three
volumes
)
to show, that men, where all men have equal rights, (and
are not divided into the two European classes of the oppressors
and the oppressed, the many and the few,) their manners and
pursuits are not the same as in Europe; and to show, above all
things, their own ignorance. Surely, every thinking mind must
know that where none are exclusively the inheritors of riches;
where none are in consequence of birth exclusively the highly
educated; but, where neither honours nor riches are hereditary,
and the roads to wealth and the highest offices are open to all
equally; the universal exertion for acquirement, whether of
fortune
,
fame, or official station, must cause a greater equality on
a higher level for the mass of the people; and must give to
society
a greater proportion of those who attain high intellectual
powers and extensive knowledge, than in monarchies and
aristocracies
.
It will be said, perhaps, that the inheritors of fortune
have a fairer starting post for the race, either of intellectual
improvement
,
or official rankbut can it be a question which state
of society tends most to general improvement and national
happiness?
But what has all this to do with the memoirs of Zebediah
Spiffard? Reader, you must not only be gentle and courteous,
but patient. If you are used to novel reading, you must know
that you have waded through many a tedious introductory page
in the hope that all the present prosing is necessary to, and will
give clearness and additional zest to the future story. The
plot must be made intricate to be interesting, and what appears
dull now, will be bright as a sun-ray at the unravelling. We
have our plot too. Trust us now; we will pay hereafterif
we can.
To conclude the history of the Lovedogs (who are rather
exceptions
to, than examples of, the characters of English
gentlemen
and ladies)the sagacious reader will readily believe that
they did not
settle
at Spiffard-town. The lady, as we have seen,
had been disappointed in all her expectations; and the
gentleman
,
who had at first been delighted with the free range of
unlimited
sporting ground, and the novelty presented by the game
of another hemisphere, now began to sigh for the stubble fields
enclosed by hedge rows, where his dogs were always in view,
one backing the other on the scent of the coveyfor the
pheasant
park, the fox hunt, the race-course, the cock-pit, the boxer's
ring, and all the many joys of his youth,in short, this happy
pair sold off in disgust, removed to Connecticutthence to
New-Yorkand thence they returned home, the lady to write
books on American manners, the gentleman to pay tithes and
poor-rates, hunt, set up for parliament, and rail on republican
institutions.
In the meantime, Zeb, our hero, grew; as is common with
other heroes between the age of ten and twenty, and he
received
that common unheroic kind of education which resulted from
his father's circumstances, and the circumstances of the country
at that time. He learned from Master McNorton, a teacher
from the north of Ireland, to read without the eastern
accentuation
or orthoepy, and was prevented, by his out-o-door
practice
in language, from acquiring a slight touch of the brogue
which adhered pertinaciously to his teacher's tongue. He was
taught to write a decent hand (there were then no Wriffards or
other doctors, native or foreign, travelling through the land to
teach elegant penmanship). He was taught to cipher as far as
the rule of three; and at the same time he learned to take care
of the cattle, the horses and the sheep. He could run barefoot
into the meadow and halter a horse, first enticing him within
striking distance by holding out an ear of corn, he would then
mount him by placing his toe on the joint of sorrel's hind leg
making stepping stones, as Master McNorton said, of the
poor brute's bones to get a saddle-sate on his bare backand
he could then, without saddle or bridle, ride as fearlessly through
woods or over rocks, as a Virginia negro, or a wild Arab.
Such were the attainments of Zebediah Spiffard, and he might
have gone on in the steps of his father, that isstepped from
Vermont to Ohio, or further; emigrating, and clearing, and
settling, and pulling up stakes, and emigrating again; or he
might have founded another Spiffard-town in the valley of the
Mississippi, and filled the great house of the founder with little
Zebs and Jerrys, never arriving at the prodigious honour of being
the hero of a book, but for certain circumstances, which though
still introductory, must be told before we can get at the marrow
of our story.
CHAPTER VII.
We go from Home to Boston
.
A barefoot pilgrim on a flinty world.
Unknown Play
.
O that clear honour was purchased by the merit of the wearer!
I never knew so young a body with so old a head.
Shakspeare
.
It
is not a new observation that a man's destination for life is
often fixed at an age when animal spirits are most abundant,
and reason most powerless. Impressions then made are
indelible
,
and habits are acquired which never, or at least not without
great trouble and pain, can be counteracted or shaken off. At
this perilous period of man's life our hero was sent from home.
A raw boy of sixteen, who had never been out of the precincts
of Spiffard-town, or seen man greater than squire Spiffard, was
suddenly transported to the famous metropolis of Massachusetts.
In the town of Boston, celebrated as the cradle, if not the
birth-place, of American independence, lived the uncle of Zeb
Spiff (as his schoolmates persisted in calling him, and as his
intimates always called him) Mr. Abraham Spiffard, who having
attained the mature age of sixty-eight in a state of single
blessedness
,
and having made his property procreate as fast as Jacob's
flocks or Shylock's ducats, now looked about him for an heir,
and bethought him of his long-neglected brother, who had
travelled
to the wilderness of Vermont at his father's death on
finding himself left nearly penniless by the willaccording to
the praiseworthy usage of the dear mother country, and the still
more praiseworthy motivea desire to support the name of
Spiffard by devising his property to the elder born son. The
brothers had not met since Jeremiah married the beautiful
Louisa Atherton. Abraham had at this time a two-fold motive
for thinking of one of his brother's children as an heir. He,
too, wished to keep up the august family name: and he had a
remaining
sense of juslice
a sense which is inherent with and
strong in every man, if not stifled by worldlinessand that sense
of justice told him, that every law or custom founded on a
miscalled
right of primogeniture
, is contrary to the law of nature
and of God; and consequently, that his younger brother had
been wronged, and he himself had been living and thriving on
the fruits of injustice. He therefore wrote to his brother,
desiring
him to send his eldest boy (for still the old leaven stuck
to him, and the first-born must have preference) promising to
educate and adopt him as his own. This was an opening not to
be neglected, and Zeb was accordingly fitted out for a journey
to the far-famed town of Boston.
We must, before taking our hero from home, mention one
circumstance, which had affected the domestic happiness of
Squire Spiffard's family, and made an impression upon little
Zebediah that moulded his character into the form which our
readers will find displayed, as we proceed with his storyfixing
within him an image that was through his future life ever
present
to his mind, and was the moving cause of thought and
action. The scenes he had witnessed in his father's household,
mingled with all his ideas of his fellow-creatures, coloured all
the future scenes of his existence, and were the springs which
impelled him in his course through his journey, until they were
obliterated by the hand of death.
We approach most unwillingly to this part of our subject.
To draw aside the decent veil that hides domestic misery, though
that misery proceeds from an accidental cause, is an irksome
task; but to expose the failings of one of that lovely sex from
which we have derived all the choice blessings of life, is
inexpressibly
painful. But we owe it to truth and to the world, for
our hero's character and actions would be inexplicable if we
did not give our readers this key to them.
It has been said that Mrs. Spiffard, the beautiful London
lady, was discontented, although placed in the paradise of
Spiffard
town. She regretted her banishment from her dear native
land. And who can blame her? She had there enjoyed
luxuries of which she was here deprived, and she had there
enjoyed youth, beauty and flattery. She could not but feel,
that if she returned, she would find the same delightful articles
for in her mind they were associated with the place. In
despite
of reason or even of experience, the returning wanderer
still expects to find
in home
, the home of his youth.
Mrs. Spiffard's health declined in proportion as she filled her
husband's house with health and life in the shape of little
Yankees
.
Her countrywoman, Mrs. Lovedog, had taught her that
ether and opium were most pleasant, and she said innocent
remedies for low spirits. In time other stimulants were resorted
to, for it was necessary, as has more than once been said
in excuse for such acknowledged weakness, to change the
current of her ideas, or she would go mad. The current was
changed; but it was only to increase, not remedy
ill
to save
her from the apprehension of that madness we pity and deplore,
with sympathy in nature's frailty, and consign her to
that
which
we despise and turn from with disgust.
Can any situation in life be so deplorable as that of a husband
under such circumstances?Yes. We shall see that
that
of a
wife, whose husband is a victim to this vice, is even worse.
Our business at present is with the first case. To see his
neglected
children gazing with expressions varied according to
their respective ages on the idiotic countenance and inconsistent
behaviour of their mother, tono, we will not enter into the
disgusting detail. Spiffard behaved like a good and discreet
a humane and determined man. He did not invite (as was his
wish) his friends or strangers to his house; his plea was his
wife's indisposition. He did not take her abroad; for he dreaded
to expose her. He did not pretend to excuse her, when
notwithstanding
his care she was exposed; nor did he by
falsehoods
outrage the good sense of his acquaintance. But it is
the effect which this disgraceful conduct in a mother had upon
his eldest son, that is our only object in recording it; and that
effect was seen, though not understood, in all he said or did to
the end of his life.
As a child it was long before he could comprehend the nature
of behaviour, in his mother, which was apparently causeless; and
was so unlike that of other females. When the truth burst upon
him, it produced a revolution in his feelings that seemed to
transport him from infancy to intellectual manhoodmade him
observant and thoughtful, instead of joyous and carelessand
in short, was quickly indicated by appearances inconsistent with
his age and previous sprightly disposition. The further he
advanced
in life and became capable of appreciating his mother's
degradation and his father's misery, the more intense were his
feelings until they became almost insupportable. He thought
as constantly upon the torturing subject as the nature of mind
will permit; for happily we are so constructed that one unbroken
chain of thought cannot be continued. One continuous chain
or circle of thought is either the cause or the effect of insanity.
Yet he strove to banish
other
thoughts, and avoided the sports
and pursuits incident to his happy age. He could not
speak of the subject of his meditations. There were none
to whom the deep coloured and indefinable images which poured
upon his mind could be communicated in conversation. He
feared lest his father should see that he noticed and understood
the cause of
his
woe. He became a recluse. Always devoted
to books, although reading without plan and almost without
improvement, he now appeared more than ever studious, and
yet his mind was frequently far from the page over which his
eyes wandered. He watched the behaviour of his father and
mother anxiously, and as anxiously avoided the appearance of
attending to their conduct. He seemed to become years older
as months passed away, and to advance in knowledge as if
by miracleknowledge gained by thoughtself-examination
not reading. It was a knowledge as bitter as that of our first
parentsand without fault in him, it deprived him of his
paradise
,
the joys without care of childhood
. It is thus that by the
undeviating chain of cause and effect, even the lot of the
guiltless
is not pure good, since we must partake of the good or ill
of others.
Our hero's father and the neighbours thought that Zebediah's
improvement was owing to his books, but it was the intense
operation of a vigorous mind set in action by
one circumstance
,
which affected him deeply and mysteriously; one spring, which
became the mainspring of his life and actions; and which
caused observation, comparison and combination in the boy, far
beyond his yearsin the man, a state of mind nearly
monomaniacal
.
When he was told that his uncle had sent for him, the first
sensation was joyous. He felt as if he should escape from
what was ever present to his imagination; his mother's infirmity
and his father's misery. But soon his heart sunk, and he could
not bear the thought of leaving the object which, as if by a
power of fascination, attracted his unceasing attention, and
bound him to the spotthe object to which his eyes were
constantly
turned, as it is said the poor bird cannot be diverted
from its gaze on the hateful serpent doomed to destroy it.
These feelings however soon passed away, and the wish for
change prevailed. He was scarce sixteen years of age, and at
that time of life when all abroad is new, fresh and refreshing
when even the circulation of the blood is pleasure, and when it
is impossible, if in health, to be long unhappyat such an age,
to see the wonders of the great city and become one in a new
and loftier state of existence, raised hopes and images which,
though undefined, made him impatient to obey the summons.
The very consciousness of being aliveas youth is aliveis
happiness; and though clouds and storms cross the morning of
life, they must pass away quickly, and the sunny beams of hope
and joy are sure to succeed.
Before we turn Zeb out upon the great world of Boston, we
will describe his person, that the reader, who we feel assured
will go with him, may have a clearer idea of his travelling
companion
.
We have seen what his appearance was at five and
twenty, but we cannot do him justice, or justice to our story,
without a full description of his beauties at sixteen.
Zeb was not only the oldest but the ugliest of his father's
children; and was formed as if in direct opposition to the
received
notions of Yankee proportion and symmetry. At the
period of which we speak, he was exactly five feet two inches
in height, and from the strong knitting of his joints, and the
uncommon
breadth as well as muscularity of his whole person, it
might have been judged that he never would attain a greater
altitude; but happily, a few years after, a hard fit of
fever-and-ague
shook him
so long
, that he became some inches longer.
Although remarkably square built and powerful in muscle, he
yet looked meagre. His knees were rather bowed outwards,
always a mark of firmness on the feet; his joints were all large,
but his limbs well proportioned to his body. His head was
VOL. I. 6
large, his visage long, his nose thin, high and hooked (
sometimes
called Roman and sometimes parrot-billed). His eyes
were dark hazel, the iris small, the balls very large and
prominent
,
and the white of the eye disproportionably great; the
upper lids covered the iris so as to give the idea of a West
India turtle. His mouth was wide, and garnished with strong
teeth, and his chin with the parts adjacent, assumed the
appearance
vulgarly called wapper-jaw'd. His beard in its incipient
and downy state, promised to be what Shakspeare calls
cane-coloured. A shock of coarse unyielding hair capp'd
this unpromising physiognomy with deviously diverging locks,
in colours rather too red to be called carotty. With all this
picturesque diversitythis variety of curve and line and angle,
in feature and in figure, there was an archness, an audacity,
and an expression of good nature in Zeb, that gained him a
firmer footing in the good will of those he happened to be
thrown among, than many a smoother form and face could
boast. His was an attractive figure. It did not pass
unnoticed
in a crowd. The eye once fixed on such a face was
not rapidly withdrawn; and when Zeb, in after times found
the looks of beauty rivetted on his form and features, he
enjoyed in return the privilege of gazing on sparkling eyes
fixed unconsciously on his odd physiognomyvermeil lips
half opened by surpriseand the happy consciousness of being
an object of admiration, for such he certainly was. A female
feels ashamed to gaze at a pretty fellow; but no one thought
it any harm to look at Zeb Spiff.
The aversion our hero felt to leaving home and his beloved
brothers and sisters, and schoolfellows, all endeared by scenes
of joy and, in years long past, by scenes of strife, was now
exchanged
for a desire to see the world. Curiosity and ambition
triumphed so far over his tender feelings, that he became
impatient
for the time of departure to arrive. The evening
previous
to that important day which consigned our Zebediah
Spiffard to the stage driver and the world, his father took him
apart, and bestowed on him a roll of hard dollars, and a lecture,
longer and quite as heavy, upon his future conduct in life.
Zeb afterwards said that it was
considerable lengthy;
but we
know that it was cut short by a loud snore unconsciously
sounded from the open mouth and nostrils of the patient, who
remembered nothing his father had said except that in great
towns young men were likely to be beset by temptations of
various kinds, especially in the form of beautiful young women,
who might distract his attention from business and interrupt his
studies. Strange as it may appear, our hero felt no alarm in
looking forward to the dangers that awaited himnay he even
became curious and anxious to know how these allurements
would affect him, and to try his strength against temptation.
Every enticement that the glass, however filled, could offer, he
was amply prepared to repel; and he had a fund of good sense
and sound morality to oppose to allurements which might war
with duty.
We have nothing of importance to record of our pilgrim
until he arrived at the end of his journey, and set foot in the
famous town of Boston. As the scenes and objects connected
with that image, the contemplation of which had formed as it
were the key-stone of his character, and had cast a shade
overall
his joysas these objects were left behind, other
associations
were created by the change, and his whole train of thought
and feeling received a new impulse and a new direction. He
still carried the arrow with him, but it ceased for a time to give
pain, or control thought or action.
He passed through Charlestown without knowing that close
at his left hand were the far-famed hills of Bunker and Breed's.
He was rattled over the bridge, and plunged among the
intricacies
of North-end, his senses almost overpowered by the
awful delight which the rapid succession of new objects
presented
by a dim light on entering a great city for the first time,
and the confused anticipations of the new life he was about to
enter into: while in silent expectation he awaited the long
delayed
moment when the coach would stop and deposit him, he
knew not where, to be received he knew not how. The coach
did at length stop at an inn near the market. The passengers
eagerly left the vehicle and each other, and Zeb found himself
about seven o'clock in the evening of the seventh of November,
in the bar room of the stage house. He knew no oneno
one knew himno one heeded him.
His trunk was thrown into the door. He looked around for
some one of his fellow passengers of whom he might inquire
his way to his uncle's; but all were already gone; each one
his own way, unmindful of the other; and poor Zeb felt for a
moment that he was alone in the world. This was but a
transient
feeling; his mind and body were endowed with an
elasticity
fitted to meet circumstances, and boldly confront them.
He saw a person busily dealing out liquor at the bar, and
approached to make inquiry of him for direction to Mr.
Abraham
Spiffard's, but he was surrounded by a crowd boisterously
demanding bittersbrandyginand uttering coarse jests
or coarser oaths. The noisethe appearance of those around
him, (principally draymen, porters, hostlers, and others of the
roughest cast, the attendants upon the market and the stage
house) with the smell of liquors and tobacco smoke, made the
poor boy's heart sink a second time, and he retired, shrinking
from the loathsome scene, and sat down on his trunk to collect
his thoughts: his head was whirling and dancing, as if still
feeling the motion of the stage-coach, and his heart sickened
at the scene before and around him. He heard the coach
drive from the door. Even this was like the departure of an
acquaintancethe last link that united him to
home
. In
addition
to the disagreeable objects that offended his physical senses,
his moral sense was pained by that which was
present
, and by
the revival or awakening of the
spectre
that haunted him. He
thought of his mother.
This situation, either of body or mind, could not endure
long with a boy of sixteen. He knew he must not remain
where he was, and now recollected, for the first time, that his
father had given him a letter, with, of course, the address of
his uncle. It was locked up carefully in his trunk. The first
movement was to open his trunk and seek it: but the thought
occurred, that in such a place and with such company, that
would not be eligible; he had read of tricks upon travellers.
He stood undetermined, looking at the depository of his worldly
treasure with somewhat of lack-lustre eye.
The suspicion that ill could be intended him by any thing in
human shape, had only entered his mind from books: and only
experience can make the innocent mind suspicious. He had
read of deceits and falsehoods, and in after life saw and
suffered
from them, as all must; but suspicion never, even in after
life, made a part of his character. To utter any words but
those of truth, would have appeared to the
Green-mountainboy
as impolitic as it was absurd. This characteristic always
remained with him. In despite of experience, he never could
be brought to suspect his fellow-creatures of deceit; and in
despite of the many inconveniences his frankness
occasioned
,
he continued to love truth the more he suffered for truth's
sake. As a man is induced to love his country the more in
consequence of those miseries he encounters in her defence.
All the mental debate we have suggested, and much more,
had passed in a moment of time, and the rumbling of the coach
wheels had scarcely ceased in his ears, or the giddiness
occasioned
by riding, left his head, when once more looking around
for some one to whom he might apply for that information he
had locked up in his trunk instead of his memory, he saw a
person near him whose appearance did not discourage the
address, and he asked this gentleman (for such he evidently
was) who happened to be near him, where Mr. Abraham
Spiffard lived?
The man was a tall, thin, upright figure, enveloped in an
ample blue cloak, clasped under his chin with silver: above
the collar of this cloak arose on each side of his
parchment-coloured
face, three formidable curls, such as belles sometimes
think ornamental to the faces of girls of sixteen, but at that
period, confined to the well-powdered wigs of gentlemen of
sixty. This buckram-stiff pile was surmounted by a large
cocked-hat, rather brown than blacknot from any lack of
brushing. Below the cloak could only be seen high-topp'd
shoes and silver buckles; both showing that they were daily
well cleaned, though now bespattered with mud from the low
and filthy place in which the stage-house stood.
I can tell you, my little man, was the old gentleman's
reply, as he looked down upon Zeb's queer face, turned up
towards his own, with a slight inclination to the right, and a
twist of the mouth to the left, while the earnest protrusion of
his dark sparkling eyes, and the honest confidence expressed
by all his features in combination, rivetted the stranger's
attention
to the person of our hero, though at first overlooked in his
examination of the travellers who had arrived in the stage.
And what may your business be with Mr. Abraham Spiffard?
I have been two days riding from Long-pond in the Green
Mountains, to come and pay him a visit, said Zeb, and I
have got a letter from father to him, but it is in my trunk.
Mr. Abraham Spiffard, to whom these words were addressed,
had come to await the arrival of the stage, kindly anticipating
the wants of his adopted son. On finding that this strange
figure was the object of his expectations, he stepped back
and surveyed the odd and uncouth appearance of the boy
with mingled sensations, in which pleasure did not predominate.
He had, in imagination, seen a tall, florid lad, rustic to be sure,
but looking as vigorous, towering, independent, and fresh as
the country of his birth; and he in the reality, saw a creature
of diminutive height, pallid complexion and
outr
physiognomy;
whose members appeared any thing rather than symmetrical,
and whove movements under present circumstances, gave no
indication of Green Mountain buoyancy, for though our hero
was in truth both independent in mind and vigorous in body,
his externals little denoted either; and these externals were
now in their worst dress.
6 *
The uncle's good sense overpowered his feelings of chagrin;
and telling Zebediah who he was, he welcomed him to Boston,
and hastily called the porter of the inn to bear the trunk of the
Green-mountain-boy to his future home. This done, he
courteously led his protegee to his house, which was pleasantly
situated near the summit of Fort-hill.
CHAPTER VIII.
An old Bachelor's house, a Lawyer's office, and a Play in
Boston
.
The principal end why we are to get knowledge here, is to make use of
it for the benefit of ourselves and others in this world.
Locke
.
The
reader doubtless has found out before he arrives at
the present chapter, that this book is not a romance, but a
story of every-day life. A fiction, it is true, but copied from
real life. Yet who does not know that the events of real life
are more astoundingmore difficult to reconcile to ordinary
reason than any romance ever writtensetting aside perhaps,
the delightful Arabian Nights, and some other tales in which
supernatural agency is introduced? What romancer would
have dared to invent such stupendous events as history records
of the early crusades? Who would have dared to tell of
thousands
of children flying from their parents and congregating to
conquer Syria from the Mussulman:marching unappalled
by difficulties over a great part of Europe, without meeting a
power, moral or physical, to stop their progress to destruction
inevitable? What romancer, if he had conceived such an
event as the western world loosened from its foundations
and precipitated upon the east, would have dared to describe
what he had imagined? or could have imagined, that from
centuries
of war, during which rapine was accompanied by
dissolute
manners, and guided by ignoranceand where famine,
disease, and the sword destroyed millionsthe blessings of
liberty, science and the arts would arise? But to recur to
later timesto the days yet scarce gone by: could poet have
thought in his wildest dreams of an adventurer rising up from
obscurity and binding emperors and kings in his chains; then
sinking, through overweening pride, to the state of an outcast
from society? Yet this we have seen. But setting history aside,
it is sufficient for my purpose to refer the reader to the volumes
of the
Causes Celebres
. Our story is a story of real lifeand
real life is sufficiently seasoned, by the wonderful, to make it
interesting to those who look for the racy and the spicy in the
pages of a novelist. Not that I promise to spread such high
seasoned food before the reader of these pages.
Abraham Spiffard had commenced his career in this mutable
state of existence as an attorney, and having inherited his
father's estate (before our separation from Great Britain) by
the English laws of primogeniture, he did not, as is usual,
make it his business to dissipate it; but, on the contrary,
feeling the comforts as well as consequence which property
gave him among his neighbours, he determined to increase the
sources of such enviable possessions. He at first proceeded
slowly and in the way of his profession; but his industry and
invariable attention to the interests of his clients, gained him
practice of the best kind, which gave him an opportunity to
make purchases of real estate in lands and houses, with
advantages
which none out of his profession could have. He was
honest, frugal, thriving, and became a rich man of
unimpeachable
character.
His establishment was that of an old bachelor. A neat and
well-furnished house, with a court yard before it, and a garden
behind. One man servant, who was gardener, hostler, butler
and footman; and one elderly female, who filled the station of
housekeeper, and condescended to be cook and chambermaid
both natives of New England, and both whiteconstituted
his household. Having long renounced his original profession,
Mr. Abraham Spiffard thus lived a life of retirement, with most
of the enjoyments which a mind of a philosophic inclination
could desire.
As the uncle had expected our hero, an apartment was in
readiness for him; and after the refreshment of tea and toast,
by a cheerful hickory fire, he dismissed him to bed by
remarking
that he was sure he must be tired,wisely determining
not to enter into an examination of his unpromising adopted
son until the morrow.
Being shown to his allotted apartment by his uncle, and left
with an injunction to extinguish the candle before he got into
bed, Zeb examined attentively every object about him, and in
truth felt much less sleepy than before he was ushered into a
domain of which he was told that he was the master, and
before
the restraint of a strange old gentleman's presence was
removed. He saw and felt, as soon as he entered, that the
chamber had been prepared with a view to his permanent
residence and future comfort; and that all around him had an
aspect very superior to any thing he had seen at Spiffard-town.
A narrow bed, much longer than necessary, with quilted calico
coverlet well stuffed with cotton wool; surrounded by calico
curtains, on which were depicted Lord Anson, his ship, his
sailors, and the groves and fountains of the isles of those
delightful
climes, the thought of which made Rousseau exclaim,
O Tinian! O Juan Fernandez!Below this pictured
enclosure was a resting place of down (or goose feathers)
covered by sheets and pillow-case white as the driven snow.
A table (over which hung a mahogany framed looking-glass;
and, on which stood a neat writing desk completely furnished)
was placed on the side of the room opposite the bed. Two
mahogany chairs, solid and heavy, with calico covered bottoms
were deemed sufficient for the boyand here again Lord
Anson, his ship, and his sailors, appeared in undiminished
beauty. But what gave most delight to Zeb was a handsome
chest of drawers (occupying part of the same side of the room
with the door) surmounted by a book-case with glass doors,
which showed rows of neatly arranged and well-bound volumes.
We feel assured, that our readers will be gratified, after
travelling from Vermont with the Green-mountain-boy, to
know, even to particulars, that he was set down in good
quarters
after his long journey.
Tired as Zeb was, he could not resist the temptation to
examine the last-mentioned treasure. Delighted he took down
volume after volume, almost all new to him. A collection of
modern and ancient history. Pope's Translations; Milton's
poems; Dryden's Virgil; Shakspeare's plays; and a rich
store of voyages and travels; a bible and a prayer book, with
his name printed in gold letters on the cover of each, completed
the arrangement and filled the shelves of this well-chosen piece
of furniture. All thoughts of sleep fled before intellectual
excitement, and time passed insensibly, when a knocking at
his chamber door aroused Zeb from his enchanting occupation.
He opened the door. It was his uncle who had knocked and
now presented himself. He saw with astonishment what had
been the employment of the youth, and his eyes sparkled with
pleasure at the discovery.
I observed a light under the door, said the old gentleman,
and I was afraid you had gone to bed and forgot to put out
the candle.
I beg pardon, sir, but I could not help looking at them.
You will have leisure enough, my son, said the old man.
It was the first time he had used that appellation. You will
have leisure enough to examine them; they are intended for
your use. They are your own. You are now fatigued, and
ought to rest, mind and body. To-morrow look at and open
the books, and
every day
after; and remember that it is for the
truth they contain that you are to study them. You must learn
to study fiction for truth's sake; and many a precious truth
you will find in the guise of fiction. The fables of Milton and
Shakspeare are mines of truth and knowledge. Knowledge
will give you power; if in the acquisition you do not destroy
your health; without health there is no power. Therefore
diligently read the best authors; and I have made choice of
some of those I think best; but do not deprive yourself of the
rest necessary to health, otherwise the knowledge you attain
by study will be as useless to others as its acquisition has been
injurious to yourself. The fatigues of your journey and the
excitement attendant upon a change of situation and prospects
render sleep doubly necessary to you
now
. Put out the light
and go to bed. I am pleased to see that you love books.
Good night! Put out the light!
I will sir, said Zeb.
The uncle again wished him `good night', and retired to rest,
perfectly satisfied that the boy was such as he wished,
notwithstanding
first appearances.
Zeb replaced the books, threw off his clothes, put out the
light, and as he laid his head on the pillow, thought he should
never be able to sleep: but that sleep that comes to all who are
healthy and guiltless, quickly came to the tired and delighted
boy, nor left him until the rising sun shone into his window and
on his bed.
He awoke only to renewed delight. He had sunk to
forgetfulness
amidst the images of his kind uncle and those who had
been his companions during the journey, fading and changing
into a moving chaos of the forms he had seen the last day,
mingled
with figures left behind at home; he opened his eyes upon
Lord Anson in Juan Fernandeshis own happy situation
flashed upon him as he looked at his book-case; and his soul
was filled with happy realities and overflowing with bright
anticipations
.
It was a November sun that shone upon our hero,
but it was through the medium of a pure and elastic atmosphere;
for the west wind had sprung up during the night and brought
with it just enough of frost to harden the surface of the earth,
and make clean walks for the early pedestrain. The youth
was quickly stationed at a window which gave him a view of
the waters of the wide spreading bay. All impatient to see
more of the wonders around and before him, it was but the
business of a few minutes to find his way out of the house,
although
somewhat puzzled when encountering bolts and bars in
his way, at the street door, things unthought of at Spiffard-town.
The key was in the lock, and Zeb unlocked, unbolted and
unbared
with the dexterity of one used to bending both body and
mind to the overcoming of difficulties; and nothing daunted by
the strangeness of his situation, or the novelties of the place,
he sallied forth, first observing the appearance of his uncle's
place of residence, and of its bearings with surrounding houses,
as he would the landmarks in the woods, and as he often had done
when there was no other means to find his way home again
while wandering on the hills of Vermont.
Soon he gained the top of Fort-hill. He had never before
seen the salt-sea, or the huge machines which float on it. He
looked enraptured and bewildered over the beautiful sheet of
water, and its islands. He saw ships under sail intermingled
with smaller vessels, all alive and glittering in the morning sun.
He looked down upon the roofs and chimnies of houses below
him, and the topmasts of merchant ships moored at the wharves.
He had seen such things only in book-engravings. He had
been instructed by books, and by his father, in the events of
that war which made his country the greatest republic in the
world, and he thought of the momentous events which took
place in and near the town of which he had now become a
resident
.
His gazing and his reveries were interrupted by a
summons to breakfast. His uncle, from his chamber window,
commanded a view of Fort-hill, and he had seen the boy as he
stood wrapt in wonder, (gazing with delight at the many novel
objects before him,) and in due time sent for him.
It is not our intention, or our interest, to weary the reader.
We hope to engage his attention not only by the incidents of
our history, or memoirs, but by those fascinating fancy-stirring
changes of scene which delight the imagination, rouse it from
any tendency to slumber when one set of objects have been
too long before it, and make it subservient to the author's
purposes
.
We will pass rapidly over the detail of those
circumstances
,
which, more than books or teaching, formed the second
part of our hero's education, and of course had their share in
moulding his character, for we are as impatient as our readers
can be to come to those great events which render him an
object
worthy of their curiosity, and our labours. But let us never
forget that the foundation of education and character was laid
at Spiffard-town.
Mr. Abraham Spiffard soon saw in what points the artificial
education of his adopted son were most deficient; and the
youth was placed in the best school Boston afforded, and
Boston
has always had the best schools in the United States; the
best teachers, the best systems; and is honoured accordingly.
Zeb improved rapidly, and was judged by his uncle, whose
scholarship was not profound, to be fitted for commencing the
reading of law in some counsellor's office, in rather less than a
year from the time of his arrival at the great city of the east,
modestly, (at the period of which we treat) called the
town of Boston. To be sure he had, as said of another
great character, little latin, and less greek; but as Mr.
Abraham
Spiffard had never found himself much the worse, as far
as he knew, for his lack of the same commodities, he
recommended
to his nephew, that he should continue his study of the
dead languages in his leisure moments, for he had observed
that a quotation which neither jurors nor auditors of any
description
understood, enhanced the character of the orator, and was
worth ten times the quantity of English. And you, courteous
reader, have thought more reverently of an author when you
have met a passage from Homer, Euripides, or Sophocles, in
the genuine Greek charactersalthough all greek to you.
Thus fitted and advised, the prudent uncle placed the youth
with a young lawyer of brilliant talents, but whose principal
recommendation to the old gentleman, was, that he had long
known him as the son of an old friend. Mr. Spiffard did not
exert his usual shrewdness in selecting a teacher for Zeb, as
will be seen in the sequel.
Thomas Treadwell, Esq., in whose office our hero now
passed a great portion of his time, was the son of a
select man
,
and had been carefully educated by his indulgent parent, who
justly admired his quick parts, (as all parents are in duty bound
to do,) and devoted him to the profession of the law, as the
surest road to the Presidential chair; which he doubted not
Tom would attain. He had the reputation of being a
belle-lettre
scholar; and he wrote verses with some skill, great spirit,
and sufficient obscurity; unfortunately he was better versed in
the works of verse-makers, than of jurists
unfortunately
at
least for his clients. No young man ever started in the race of
life, under better auspices, than Tom Treadwell, but he never
took kindly to labour, and he had Ranger's authority for law
being a damned dry study, and Ranger was authority higher
with him than Blackstone or Coke. He found the drama much
more to his taste, and the Muses and actresses much more
fascinating, than reports, records, or deeds. His
deeds
, and
their
record
, will be found to agree with such taste and such
conduct. In fact, just about the time our hero was placed
under
his tuition, to be instructed in the depth and subtleties of
jurisprudence; the tutor had, in defiance of all prudence,
privately
married a very beautiful girl, without education, property,
or decent connections, and was enamoured for the moment
with his new situation, so much as to neglect
the theatre
;
his office had been deserted before. Of all this Mr. Spiffard
knew nothing, he only knew the father of the man to whom he
had entrusted his son. The consequence was, as may be
supposed
,
that Zeb was left pretty much to his own choice in the
course of reading he pursued at the office.
Blackstone is always at hand in a lawyer's office in case any
one comes to seek the man of science for advice in law or
equity; and except on such occasions the knight is little
attended
to, even in appearance, by some students we wot of.
The love and practice of truth was never abandoned by our hero.
But insensibly this paltry mode of deception was becoming
seductive
.
He once placed a book of reports on his desk, open,
while he read a novel. Happily he saw his error before it was
too latethe first love prevailedhe blushed at the meanness
of pretending to one thing and practising another, and ever
after
,
truth marked his character almost undeviatingly.
Spiffard read history with delight. The translations of all
the great poets, ancient and modern, became familiar to him.
Milton's great poems and Shakspeare's plays he devoured.
The novels of Smollet and Fielding added to his pleasures, and
he was too ignorant of vice to be injured by them,
much
. His
evenings were devoted to teachers of French, Italian, Spanish,
and German: nor did he neglect the studies commenced at
school; he likewise took lessons in dancing and fencing.
He had been permitted, accompanied by his uncle, to see
some plays, immediately upon his arrival at Boston. The
impression
made upon him by the first exhibition of the kind that
he witnessed, though by no means singular in its general effects
must not be passed over in silence. All appeared as the work
of enchantment. Seated in the pit, he could see before the
play commenced the gayly decorated fronts of the boxes
glittering
with what was in his eyes gold and jewels. Beautiful
women, with all the advantages of dress entered those boxes.
The gay company by degrees took their seatstier above tier
they sat, all happy, doubtless, for all smiled. Even the third
tier, or upper boxes, appeared to him the abode of happiness
and purity. To the pure, all is pure. To the ingenuous boy
the smiles he saw were innocuous.
The music of the orchestra struck up, and although others did
not appear to hear it, our hero's delight was increased almost
to intoxication.
But however much his sense of hearing was captivated by
the orchestra, or his eyes attracted to the brilliant company in
the boxes, above all he looked at the green curtain with
interest
,
for the hidden and unknown is far more attractive than the
visible, however beautiful. After gazing with a wandering and
restless pleasure on the many-coloured objects around and
above, his eyes were fixed on the plain dull surface of the cloth
before him, which told nothing, but was pregnant with
mysterious
meaning; for he knew that behind
that
lay the something
that was to crown allwhen
that
should be removed his
felicity
would be complete.
How
he knew notbut he was sure
of it. A bell tinkled, and the front lamps rose as if by magic.
Another bell rung louder. The curtain vanished. All was
dazzling light and many-coloured brilliancy; the silence of
breathless expectation succeeded. Then appeared beautiful
men and women, with fine dresses, and sparkling eyes, and
red cheeks! surely actors and actresses must be not only the
most admired, but the best, most lovely, and happiest of
mortals
!
In the course of Zeb's novel reading he had not yet
read Gil Blas: and Wilhelm Meister was unknown to English
readers.
The play was the Jealous Wife. The boy's delight was
extreme
,
except during that scene in which Charles is exhibited
in a state of ebriety. While others laughed, he was absorbed
in a melancholy reverie. He felt sick. He wished himself
at home, and sighed for the seclusion of his chamber. The
remembrance of his mother's infirmity took such possession of
him from that moment, that only the novelty of the enchanting
spectacle, and his interest in the story, especially in the fate of
Charles, would have made the general impression of the
evening's
entertainment, when recollected, pleasurable. The
after-piece
(for he staid to the last, and wanted more,) the after-piece
was Rosina, which gave him pure delight.
Such was his first impression of the theatre. Now, that he
was with Treadwell, he had a full gratification of the desire
created by the few plays he had seen before he became a
student
7
of law; for his master gained him free admission to the
pit and boxes, and thus led him to the study of the dramatic
works of the French and English poets: of these he found
that Mr. Treadwell's office contained an abundance. Among
them was a complete old edition of Bell's British Theatre; all
of which he greedily devoured; a dose sufficient to poison a
regiment of Green-mountain boys! If such reading did not
destroy all his moral and religious propensities, it was because
his natural tendency to goodhis love of truthhis ignorance
of practical evilhis habitsand his abhorrence of ebriety,
shielded him from the death-doing influence.
Before proceeding with the story, (notwithstanding the
reader's
impatience,) we will, with permission, go back to the
second
play our hero saw performed before his introduction to the
mysteries behind the curtain and the scenes; this was Othello.
He had read Shakspeare; yet did not know what to expect
from a representation of characters so remote from any thing
he had seen in real life. What ideas could a Green-mountain
boy form of a Moora thick-lipsa negrocommanding an
army of white menof Italians? It is the player, the skilful
artist, that gives reality to the pictures of the dramatic poet.
The young or uninstructed mind forms confused images while
reading, in proportion to its ignorance.
On Zeb's second visit to a play-house, the delight
experienced
from the proscenium and preliminaries, was not so
vivid as at the first; but his impatience for the raising of the
green curtain was full as intense. The music gave him little
pleasure, and the beauties in the boxes had lost half their
charms.
The effect of this representation of one of Shakspeare's most
glorious productions upon our hero was such, that his reasoning
powers seemingly gained an advance of years. His intellect
grew almost perceptibly during the sitting; or while, as the
French say, he assisted at the representation. His whole soul
was alive to the story: the apothegms sunk upon his young
and yielding mind with a thrilling sensation of approbation,
that made them part of his moral being.
Again he was shocked by the representation of ebriety; and
his detestation of Iago was more increased by his playing the
part of a tempter, and subverting the reason of Cassio by wine,
than even by his atrocious villany in deceiving the noble Moor,
and destroying the wretched Desdemona. Cassio, deprived of
reason, was, to Spiffard, a spectacle of horror. While others
laughed, he experienced a sickness of the hearta sinking of
every physical powera confusion of his mental faculties
a loathing of existence; feelings that can only be conceived by
those who have had their hopes blasted by the effects of this
accursed vice. He gazed on the representative of Cassio, but
he saw his own desolated home. When the virtuous and
betrayed
lieutenant recovers his reason, and with disgust,
reprobates
his folly in putting an enemy into his mouth to steal
away his brains, the tears rolled down the cheeks of the boy,
and he sobbed aloud, until he found that he had become an
object of derision to those around him.
Shakspeare has truly represented intemperance as a vice
leading to certain degradation, crime, and self-reproach. He
has, in other parts of his works, shown it as the habitual
practice
of the criminal, (as in Hamlet's uncle,) the murderer,
the usurper, and fratricide. He has portrayed it as the vice
of the weak-minded, and of the brutal and the vulgar ruffian;
as in Sir Andrew Aguecheek and Sir Toby, in the Twelth
Night. But, generally, the stage has held up the drunkard
merely as an object of amusement, to be laughed at, not pitied
or detested; and has thus been deficient or negligent, if not
criminal, when it ought to have exposed its deformity, and
pointed out its inevitable consequences, misery, madness,
death, and contempt.
His master's attachment to the theatre at length introduced
our hero behind the scenes. What he there saw at first
disgusted
him. It appeared as if Ithuriel's spear had, by a touch,
caused the angel form to vanish, and the fiend to appear; had
changed beauty to deformity. That which had pleased the eye
as the glow of health, was, in reality, a coarse white and red
daubing, associated in his mind, from infancy, with disease or
moral depravity. The modest mien assumed before the
audience
,
was sometimes suddenly dismissed, after passing the side
scene, and replaced by coarse mirth, or coarser rage. The
devout or patient hero would instantly be converted into a fury,
venting curses upon the prompter or call-boy. The brilliant
dress, decorated with gold and jewels, was transformed to a
flimsy rag, covered with tinsel, glass, and foil; the warrior's
mail, into paste-board and spangles; all the order, harmony,
and splendour of the scenes, into confusion, wrangling, the
darkness of smoking lamps, and the jostling of dirty
scene-shifters
and vulgar supernumeraries. Yet all this is only an
image of the masking and unmasking in every day scenes of life.
To be sure, we do not see the mask lifted often; when we do,
we are shocked as the boy was. Though shocked, yet the ugly
chaos was recommended, in some measure, by novelty; and,
by degrees, (as to other ugly things,) he became reconciled or
indifferent. In the green-room he found amusement; and
sometimes, very rarely, was surprised by finding wit.
Treadwell's propensities induced a constant attendance,
(after the honeymoon,) upon those scenes either before or
behind the curtain, which his love of idleness had made
habitual; and as he wrote prologues, epilogues, and puffs, for
the managers, and performers, he was a free and welcome
visiter. Spiffard, of course, made acquaintances among the
players. He was found to be amusing; his voice was strong
and flexible, and it was discovered that his ear was quick for
music and mimicry. Thus he became transformed, by degrees,
from the plain green-mountain rustic, to a knowing frequenter
of the play-house; but still he shrunk from the contagion of
the vice which too frequently congregates there. Two
characteristics
distinguished him from the mass of his companions,
even more than talents; he never drank any thing but water,
nor spoke any thing but truth. He had another singularity, he
was as credulous as he was sincere. Time diminished this
characteristic, but could not eradicate it.
In the mean time, although Squire Spiffard, of Spiffard-town,
frequently wrote to his son, and mentioned his mother, as usual,
as, your mother sends her love, &c.; yet the son was
ignorant
of what he most wished to know. He could not but
hope that his father's patient and prudent conduct would
produce
the reformation he most desired. The father avoided
the subjecthow could he do otherwise? This one idea haunted
the son, and he knew not how to gain the information he
wished
.
He could only inquire after his mother's health; and the
answer could only be well, or sick, better, or worse.
At length, he accidentally met in the street one of his father's
neighbours, who had come for the first time to Boston, and was
gazing upon the wonders of the town open-mouthed.
Spiffard placed himself directly in his path, as he slowly
moved, with head turned aside, and eyes fixed on the treasures
of the shop-windows. The lord of an hundred acres, after
almost stumbling over the young man, stared for a moment in
his face, and then exclaimed, Why, I'll be dang'd, if here
is'n't little Zeb! After scrutinizing him from head to foot,
the yeoman exclaimed, why, Zeb! why you're not the same;
and yet you are the same, too. Taller and handsomer, and yet
the same funny face. Well, Zeb, I seed your daddy and
mammy
,
and all the boys and gals! And so here you be a fine
town gentleman!
After a hearty shake of the hand, our hero was glad to carry
his friend to the solitude of his master's office; feeling a little
prudent shyness, or false shame, in consequence of the loud
and hearty greetings of his townsman.
Farmer Freeman, after examining the premises, expressed
his admiration of Treadwell's book-cases. Why, Zeb, what
a power of books you've got! Arnt you afeerd, as the bible
says, `too much larning will make you mad?'
No fear of that, Mr. Freeman. And soall the folks
come sit down; and so all is well at Spiffard-town?
Why, pretty middling; all stirrin.
The town grows?
O aye, and the folks grow; but I don't know that they
grow much better. Turner, the store-keeper, you know, jist
there t'other side the church; why he has run off to Canada,
they say, and took as many people in as he could: but there
are two stores set up since. And would you believe it? Bill
Tomkin's, your school-fellow, is married to Sally Bell; he's
not nineteen yet, and she's sixteen next February; and his
father
is building a right smart house for him, not far from .
That's well! And how does
my
father look? Is he well?
Zeb did not dare to ask first after his mother's looks, though
she was uppermost in his thoughts.
Why the squire looks a little thinnish, I must say, was
Freeman's reply. He seems a little under the weather,
somehow
;
and yet he's not sick. He looks as if he had been jaded
like.
Zeb sighed. And my mother? hesitatingly he asked.
Why she's more and more varysome:one day pale, and
another day red. I suppose its the natur of your old country
complexions. And you know your mammy is changeful in
her ways of acting and speaking too: sometimes mighty
funny
,
and sometimes a little snappish, and grumlike. The
neighbours
do say
Zeb felt as if sinking through the floor. The farmer
continued
,
they think the squire's lady has never been herself
since that old country chap with his dogs, and his fine lady
wife lived among us.
Zeb lifted his headbreathed more freelyand Freeman
went on with his gossip. She looks a little queerlike,
sometimes
,
and slamakin, and then her face grows fat, and her body
grows thin, and then
And the children? asked the miserable son, hastily
interrupting
that
of which he had heard but too much. The
childrenthey I hope are well?
Yes,they are pretty so sonot hardy, though:they
don't look like my boys and gals; and the squire seems more
and more fond of them; but somehow or another your mammy
seems The yeoman paused, as if in want of a simileand
Zeb quickly changed the conversation, by abruptly inquiring
what he had seen in Boston, giving him an invitation to his
uncle's house, and making offers of service, with perfect
sincerity
and goodwill.
CHAPTER IX.
How to study Law.A change of destination
.
It was about to speak when the cock crew,
And then it started like a guilty thing.
Shakspeare
.
To his trust grew stranger, being transported
And wrapt in secret studies.
Der Mann muss hinaus
In's feindliche Leben,
Muss werken und streben
Schiller
.
By mine honour I will; and when I break that oath, let me turn
monster
.
Shakspeare
.
Excerpts
, as headings to chapters, have been sneered at.
I am inclined to multiply them. If my reader passes them
over, he will miss that which is worth more than the whole
chapter following.
Mr. Thomas Treadwell abandoned his office so entirely,
that after a time, no one thought of inquiring for him at that
place; or at any other, on business connected with his
profession
:
and Zeb mechanically opened the windows every
morning
,
and habitually sat down to
his
books, without thought of
courts, clients, or law. He was conscious that he was not in
the path intended for him by his uncle, and consequently the
course he was pursuing was wrong, but he was fascinated by
the opportunity that was afforded him of gratifying his passion
for reading; and as long as no one interrupted it, he could not
or would not, see the necessity for a change. His uncle had
advised a course of history, and
belles lettres
reading, meaning,
when not employed in the study of legal science:Zeb
followed
his uncle's advice literally and industriouslyneglecting
the spirit and intentand as no law reading was enjoined upon
him by his master, he quieted his conscience by acting up to
the letter of the instructions. He became a thorough historian
and
belles lettres
scholar, as far as English and French authors
could make him one. He partook of the Spanish, Italian,
and German; and delighted to task himself in the Latin
classics
his
tasks becoming another source of mental
improvement
,
another source of pleasurefor it is a law of the
benevolent
Creator, that perseverance in well-doing, although at first
a task, shall become more and more a pleasure; knowledge
increases the facilities of attaining knowledge, and the
appetite
grows by that it feeds on.
Of all the authors read by Spiffard, no one was studied with
so much pleasure as Shakspeare. The boy had early read him,
(for Shakspeare was found at Spiffard town) but he now studied
him and his commentators. His thoughts and language by
degrees became in a measure imbued with the images and
phraseology of the poet. It was only when in after time he
was laughed at by his companions, that he was induced to
relinquish a mode of expressing himself which appeared to
some affected.
Mankind are not generally aware of the influence which one
book, or one man, may have, and has had, on a nation or a
world. Even those who cannot (or those who do not) read,
hear the precepts of the author, sometimes quoted
as such
,
oftentimes mingled unconsciously in ordinary conversation.
The maxims of the Koran, the Vedah and the Shastah are
mingled in the intercourse of every-day life, among their
followers
,
as well as quoted from the desk or the pulpit; and the
same or greater effect is produced by the Hebrew and Greek
scriptures. So the popular poet or author sheds abroad a light
upon society which in its effects is incalculable.
If the poet's precepts are poured forth year after year for
ages from the stage, as are those of the Swan of Avon,
they make a part of the education of nations; they are mingled
with the thoughts and words of allinfluencing their passions
and actionsthey become instruments of illimitable power on
the civilization and consequent well-being of man.
A shrewd and well educated person once said, I went last
evening to see Othello, and I have been thinking ever since or
the many beautiful passages which have been familiar to me
from childhood, and which are to be found in that play.
Our hero became acquainted with all the beauties and defects
of the mighty master. He read him, and heard him expounded.
He studied him, and saw him illustrated. But of lawexcept
the poetic law of the stagyritehe was as ignorant as many
other young gentlemen who read, or smoke, in lawyers' offices.
What was Uncle Abraham about all this time? Reading
his
favourite books, and indulging as much research into
ancient
literature, as a defective early education permitted. Still
he entered into many speculative studies, and pursued them far
beyond the reading of mere men of this world; and when he
questioned his nephew on topics, little thought of by most young
men, he was pleased to find him intelligent, inquiring, and in
possession of knowledge uncommon for his age. At length,
old Mr. Spiffard, the uncle, thought it time that Zeb should be
prepared for his examination. He had passed nearly the
number
of years usual, and legally necessary, for reading law in the
capital of Massachusetts. I'll go to Mr. Treadwell's office,
and talk the matter over with him, and with my nephew, said
uncle Abraham. Accordingly, one day, as story-tellers have
it, he appeared suddenly at the office, while Zeb was standing
in the most approved attitude for delivering Marc Anthony's
oration over the body of Julius Csar. The door had been
left partly open, and his uncle entered, unperceived by the
young orator, who was practising postures before a mirror;
which, though only intended to aid Mr. Treadwell in adjusting
a cravat, before making his appearance in court, or in the
green-room, disclosed the graces of our hero's person and
action, (imperfectly it is true,) and at the same time served to
let him see that he had an admirer behind him. He was in
circumstances similar to the ghost of Hamlet's father, about to
speak when the cock crew, but alas! he could not vanish.
The uncle had been standing for a moment, before the young
lawyer was aware that any other than his own eyes witnessed
his
attitudenizing
. When he saw the reflection of Uncle
Abraham
,
he dropt his outstretched arm, and looked like any thing
rather than a hero.
That's right, said the old gentleman; I see that you
are preparing yourself for public speaking. It is the sure road
to wealth and honour in a republic.
The uncle certainly did not mean the same kind of public
speaking that occupied the mind of the nephew; but Zeb was
relieved from his embarrassment by the train of thought which
his preparation for enacting Marc Anthony had suggested; and
his uncle proceeded to the business which had brought him to
the office.
The result of Mr. Abraham Spiffard's inquiries was not so
favourable to the belief of his nephew's progress in the
acquisition
of that knowledge, necessary for the orator of the Bar,
the town house, the general assembly, or hall of congress. His
questions were answered with perfect frankness by Zeb, who
through life never lost his relish for truth or pure water. The
uncle was astonished that he had so long omitted those
inquiries
which now elicited the astounding fact that Treadwell
had long neglected both his business and his pupil; who knew
very little more of law, (particularly its practice,) than when he
entered the office. The answer to one inquiry led to another,
and the good old gentleman concluded his interrogatories by
asking mildly, Why, my son, did you not tell me all this?
Zeb stood silent for some moments, before answering. Not
that he wished to evade the question, but he wanted time to
arrange
his thoughts, like one of our Indians at a council-meeting;
one of those men whom we call our red brethren, and shoot
when they do not get out of our way, exactly at the time we
wish to improve their lands for our profit, and plough up the
bones of their forefathers, with as little ceremony as we do
those of our own. Zeb was conscious that he had not been
doing as his uncle intended; and that although he had not
planned to deceive the worthy man, yet he had suffered him to
deceive himself. After collecting his thoughts, Indian fashion,
he replied with perfect ingenuousness:
I take shame to myself, sir; I ought to have told you all
this, and not waited till you questioned me. I have reasoned
with myself repeatedly upon the subject, and my reason
always
told me that I was not employing my time as you
intended
that it should be employed. But this self-examination did
not take place until in consequence of my teacher's neglect and
the love I had imbibed for the study of general literature, a
secret
dislikeand afterwards to myself, an avowed
determination
had been formed not to devote myself to the profession of
the law. To form such a resolution without consulting you,
was wrong. Nay, I knew it to be wrong, at the time. But as
every other study became more delightful to me, so,
that
for
which I was placed here, became more and more disgusting.
You appeared to be proud of my acquirements in languages
7*
and literature, and I cheated myself into the belief, that, if I
became a good scholara well informed manand proved
myself by my conduct a moral man, I might be permitted to
choose some employment more congenial with my taste and
feelings, than the dry and formal, or the uncertain, intricate,
and oft-times disingenuous proceedings, connected with the
transactions in our courts of justice. And II hopedYes,
I will tell you allthat as you had avowed your determination
to consider me in all things as your son, that you would permit
me to travel, first in our country, and then in foreign lands,
and thus to cultivate a knowledge of men, as well as of books,
of manners, as well as science and literaturea knowledge
which would enable me on my return to my dear native
country
,
justly appreciating her institutions, to be an honour to you,
a comfort and support to my parents, and to enter the lists as
a candidate for office, with not only the desire, but the power
to serve my countrymena power which should produce such
effects as seemed to be the ultimate object you had in view for
mesuch effects as would meet your approbation, and justify
the partiality you had evinced towards me.
The old gentleman was evidently agitated while his nephew
poured forth this address. He took a chair, and sat down
during
its delivery with his eyes fixed on the floor, and his hat
pulled over his brow: at its close he looked up, with some
severity
of aspect, and replied in a tone of unusual asperity,
So! knowing that by a life of industry I had accumulated a
decent competency, you supposed that I would indulge you in
a life of idleness?
O no, sir
The uncle would not be interrupted. Your love of
ingenuousness
induced you to deceive me! You knew better,
likewise
,
what my wishes were than I did myself! You thought it
would be more to your advantage to visit France, Italy, and
Germany, and be presented at the courts of foreign princes
than to attend the courts of law in Massachusetts, and become
familiar with the institutions of the country you are to reside in:
now, I have served my country, and was supposed to be
qualified
to promote the happiness of those connected with me, or
whose welfare had been entrusted to me; and
that
without
foreign
travelling or any other travelling. I have been content
with this townand this town has been content with me. I
have lamented the deficiencies of my education, and hoped that
by making you a scholar and a scientific lawyer, you would
have been able to do more and better than I have done. I chose
a path for you, and supposed that you were following its course:
but you have chosen another for yourself. Now, suppose I
was to say, `I have been deceived,go! pursue your own
course: I have done with you?'
I cannot suppose it, sir.
Why not?
It is not like you. Besides, I did not plan to deceive you.
You saw me cherishing an error, and did not undeceive
me.
I was wrong, sirbut I deceived myself. I believed that
I was qualifying myself to become
that
which you most wished
me to become. I would willingly believe it still. I have
heard you complain of the drudgery you have gone through to
acquire wealth, and lament that you had not devoted more time
to the more ennobling studies. I never doubted that you
wished me to profit by the means in your possession, to enter
into a wider field of action and competition than you had
necessarily
been confined tothat you wished me to rise above the
professional technicalities and every-day labour of the court
and the office. I will believe still that my kind unclemy more
than father, will aid me in the path I shall choose, provided he
shall be convinced that it is the path of honour.
The path of the lawyer is a path of honour. He may
build for himself a reputation which shall stand the assaults of
envy or folly; but it must have its foundation in what you call
the technicalities of the office, and the habit of every-day
labour
.
That necessary habit you have not acquired. The
foundation
of honour is truth. If I should aid you to pursue the path
you have preferred, and continue still to be a father to you, it
will be after the conviction that you will not in future deceive
another, or suffer another to deceive himself; and then make
self-deception a plea, or an excuse for your conduct. I have
confided in youand I may say here the old man's voice
falteredI have loved you, because I thought I discovered
in you a rooted love of truthI thought it was habitual in act
as in wordI thought
The young man interrupted him, Next to my love of the
Author of all Good, is my love of truth. My fervent desire is
to be habitually frank and sincere in all my intercourse with my
fellow-creatures. I have now received a lesson never to be
forgotten.
Mr. Spiffard was silent for a moment: his tone was changed,
when he said: I believe in the sincerity of your desire. The
belief that such was ever your disposition, has made me a
confiding
father to you. But the love of God, and of truth, must
be shown by obedience to their laws in deed and word.
Here, sir, before heaven
No protestations, young man. Notwithstanding what has
passed, and my bitter disappointment, I
will
confide in youI
must
confide in you. If I thought that there had been a
deliberate
plan to deceive, confidence would have flown forever.
We cannot believe at will. I intend that you shall be my heir:
and as you have given me to know that you will not pursue the
law as a profession, I will, inasmuch as you have arrived at an
age beyond childhood, consult your wishes, and we will be
determined
as to the future by our cool consideration of the
matter.
Zeb attempted to speak, but his voice failed him. Tears
ran down his cheeks, and he sobbed aloud. Here ended this
momentous conference. Uncle Spiffard soon after had an
explanation with Mr. Thomas Treadwell, and Zeb was
withdrawn
from the
study of the law
.
CHAPTER X.
We return home.Medicine and Theology in Vermont
.
Let us sit and mock the good housewife, Fortune, from her wheel, that
her gifts may henceforth be bestowed equally.
Fortune reigns in gifts of the world, not in the lineaments of nature.
I never did repent of doing good, nor shall not now.
Shakspeare
.
One really does meet with characters that fiction would seem too
bold in portraying. This original had an aversion to liquor, which
amounted to abhorrence; being embittered by his regret at the mischiefs
resulting from it to his friends.
Mrs. Grant
.
Our
hero had been between two and three years from under
the paternal roof, and, strange as it may appear, had never
visited
the place of his nativity. One image, connected with
home, haunted him. He saw it in the streets, in various
shapes, and oft times followed its reeling and devious course,
as the bewildered traveller follows the meteor which leads into
the marsh or pool, its poisonous origin. This image banished
from his mind all pleasing associations belonging to the scenes
of his childhood. It was an image of mourning and desolation.
It amounted almost to a monomania, that literally grew with his
growth, for he comprehended more and more the degradation
of his mother, and the misery of his father, as his mind
expanded
.
He shrunk from a nearer contemplation of the scenes
his memory presented, or his imagination suggested. He
dreaded the consequences of those too well remembered
exhibitions
in all their hideousness. A visit to his father's house
when thought of, awakened an expectation of witnessing
realities
,
which fancy conjured up to view, and reason forced him to
anticipate. He even avoided speaking of home.
Zebediah Spiffard was now nearly nineteen years of age,
and as tall as nature or circumstances permitted him ever to
be. He had attained his growth sometime before, but had
been shook somewhat nearer the common length of man by the
fever and ague. His uncle in due time consented to his plan
of travelling, and, the notion once adopted, the old man became
anxious that his adopted son should be qualified to talk as loud
of London and Paris, Vesuvius and Pompeii, Apollo and
Venus
,
Raffaello and Corregio, and all the rest of it, as the sons
of his neighbours; but recommended, however, a short delay,
and a visit to his parents. Zeb felt and acknowledged the
propriety of his uncle's recommendation, but assented with
sad forebodings, and reluctantly prepared for a journey to
Vermont
,
although his heart felt the yearnings of affection towards
his unfortunate father.
Three winters and two summers had passed since leaving
home, and now, in the month of May, (so bright and warm in
Italy and Virginia, and so delightful in English poetry, although
so cold and dreary in both old and new England) young Mr.
Spiffard arrived safely at his native village of Spiffard-town, in
the beautiful valley of Long-pond.
Spiffard-town had grown faster than our Zeb. Two new
steeples decorated the hill, proving freedom, and, of course,
diversity of opinion. No old church claiming infallibility
and exclusive right of sway over the minds and actions of men,
because it could trace its origin to the times of mental
darkness
,
was here suffered to blast the seed or the growth of God's
word, and man's happiness.
The melancholy thoughts which were suggested to the mind
of our hero as he approached the place, were dissipated, by
the air of improvement, and vigorous youth, that new houses,
recently cleared fields, with all the signs of a thriving
community
presented to his eyes as he rode to the stage-house,
denominated
the United States Hotel, and Spiffard-town Coffee
House. Neither the house nor its master had ever been seen
by him before, and unknowing and unknown he passed on to
his father's residence, after seeing his baggage in the safe
custody
of the bar. As he approached the parental dwelling, he
was struck by the external marks of premature decay. This
strongly contrasted with the youthful freshness of the newly
erected houses he had passed. They were neat and tastefully
painted white, with green blinds. The neglect on his father's
premises told a tale of sorrow. The white paint had not been
renewed since he left the village, and the once cheerful face
of home was spotted like an Indian with the leprosy, as if
giving note of the diseased state of things within. The palings
of the court-yard fence were broken, and the gate hung by
one hinge. A pane of glass in one of the upper windows had
been broken, and its place was supplied by an old white hat.
Every heart-sinking thought that had occurred to the
sensitive
youth during his journey, was revived, and rushed upon
him with double force: the recollections of his boyhood came not
as bright visions of past joy, but as images of loathsome
realities
long
detested, and oft banishedever returning, and now
mingled with misgivings increased at every step and by every
object that met his view.
A cold rain added, (to the sufferings of his mind,) those
physical
achings, shiverings and chills, which must be taken into
the account of the estimate of all mortal woe or weal, whether
identified and specified or not; and as Spiffard-town was with
out pavements, the slippery rain-wet-clay, and occasional mud
pits in his path, by no means cheered his walk or alleviated the
gloom, within or without.
He passed through the disabled gate and pushed open the
house-door, which had never been garnished by lock, and now
had no latch. The old house-dog growled as he entered the
street door, but the next moment wagged his tail, tried to look
in his face with eyes covered by the film of old age, licked his
hand, and whined a mournful note of recognition. But poor
old Cato, like all that the youth had seen on his return to his
native place, bore the marks of neglect and decay; and
although
his greetings were meant to be cordial, they took
naught from the weight which oppressed the young man's heart.
He turned into the well-known keeping room, which appeared
as if diminished to half its former size. Here he found the first
human creature that had greeted him. In the first
apartment
that he enteredthe room where in days of yore he had
mingled with the family in all domestic appliances, he saw a
little girl, too young to be left unattended, who was sitting on
the floor by the hearth, and near to the remains of a fire:
she looked at him with a vacant stare, and said, whiningly,
Mama's in the bed-room.
This was his sisterhis mother's youngest child. He bent
down to kiss her, but was repulsed with an exclamation, Go
along! you are an ugly man! Don't come here again!
And where is your papa?
Gone for the doctor.
Poor Spiffard! he felt as though all his misgivings and
surmises
were realized. Hardly knowing what he did, the youth
again attempted to kiss his sister, although her neglected
appearance
little tempted him to the act; he wanted to touch, in
sympathy, some being to whom his blood had affinityhe could
have wept upon the bosom of the childbut she turned from
him with Go along! You are ugly! Don't come here any
more! They are all in the bed-room.
At this moment his father and the doctor entered. Spiffard
saw that in less than three years his father had become an old
man.
We will pass over the particulars of his reception by his
unfortunate
,
kind-hearted father, and his interview with his
wretched mother, who was sinking into the grave, mind and
body exhausted, conscious of the cause of her own and her
husband's
miserytortured by the fears of death, and an eternity
for which she was little prepared. But a scene had passed in
the young man's presence, previous to his meeting with the
unhappy
invalid, which we must briefly notice. Such scenes
would be often repeated, if the medical men of our country towns,
had, generally, the good sense and determined spirit of the
physician
who, as above mentioned, had been brought, by her
husband
,
to visit Mrs. Spiffard.
The usual medical attendant upon the sick woman, was a
young professor of the healing art, who dwelt in Spiffard-town,
and had to establish himself in the world of Long-pond, by
yielding to the whims of patients, nurses, and visiters, temporal
and spiritual; but the person now introduced to the house, and
not for the first time, was Dr. Woodward, a man of long
established
reputation for skill and knowledge, who lived near
twenty miles off, and only came thus far when called on
particular
occasions. He had long attended the family of Spiffard,
when the urgency of the case required his presence, and at all
times advised and directed the practice of the younger and
resident
physician.
Woodward was a rough-hewn yankee; a man of talents,
study, and experience. Soon after entering the house, he had
left the son and father together, and with the familiarity of an
old acquaintance and veteran practitioner, licensed
so to do
, had
gone into the chamber of the sick woman. Zeb and his father
had scarcely exchanged those greetings the occasion required,
and their feelings prompted; those inquiries on the son's part,
respecting his father's and his mother's condition, had been but
begun, (inquiries that were answered more fully by the son's
presentiments than by the father's words,) before Woodward
abruptly entered, and addressed Spiffard thus:
I have told you, squire, before this, that those cursed
varmint
of croaking men and canting women are killing your wife.
And now I tell you, once for all, that you needn't send for, or
come for me again, unless you give me absolute power over
the sick chamber and the patient.
Why, what's the matter, Doctor?
Murder's the matter! murder! You promised me that no
one should be allowed to disturb the poor critter. I told you
that all the chance she had from my medicine was by keeping
her mind quiet; and I told Dr. Chubs the same. But he's
young, and thinks he musen't forbid that fellow coming with his
bellows and furnace, because he has got a barn to preach in,
and fools to groan with him. If she wants a clergyman, you
have one at hand in Parson Wilford, who knows his duty to
God and man, as far as I know.
And have they taken advantage of my absence while going
to call you? I ordered the nurse to admit no one.
The room is full. That yellow-faced crow, Martin, who
couldn't live by goose and cabbage, as a tailor, is howling like
a wolf; and a wolf he is in sheep's clothing: and a dozen
women are groaning and sobbing like a camp-meeting; while
your wife lies frightened into hysterics, and will dieand
quickly too, if not rescued from the philistines.
I will be obeyed, said the husband; and was going
Stop! said Woodward; do you give me full powers?
Yes. Your orders
shall
be obeyed!
Then stay you here. I'll give them a touch of my
practice
.
Woodward again entered the sick woman's chamber.
Spiffard
stood like a statue, waiting the event. His father paced the
room. A noise, like the confusion of a miniature Babel,
assailed
their ears in every key (though not in every language,)
that the human voice can be screwed to by passion.
Woodward
re-entered, literally dragging the yellow-faced crowthe
preaching tailor, into the keeping-room, by the collar of his
coat, and followed by a mob of vociferous women. The
physician
,
the captured crow, the nurse, and every female, young
or old, protested, railed, exclaimed, squeaked, or shouted.
Every voice was exerted to the utmost, and they were of every
pitch and compass, from the commanding, deep-toned bass of
the doctor, and the hoarse croaking of the crow, to the cracked
treble of goody Stubs, the nurse. The tumult ceased a little,
as some of the out-criers saw that a stranger was present.
Have you no respect for my cloth? said the tailor.
Yes, said the physician, when you are stitching it in the
way of your vocation, and in your proper place, mounted on
your shop-board; but none for you, or your cloth, when stuck
up in a pulpit, you make it a covering for ignorance and
knavery
,
or intrude your noisy fanaticism where peace and restare
necessary to alleviate suffering.
I give you warning!
And I again warn you not to interfere with my practice.
When you spoiled my coat, I let it pass; but you shan't kill
my patients.
O, the blasphemous ruffian! exclaimed a squeaking
voice.
I will save her precious soul! cried the tailor.
I'll maul your onprecious body, you croaking cormorant,
if ever you intrude within my province again.
I'll do my duty.
And I'll do my duty, you carrion-crow, and prevent
murder
;
which the sight of your yellow face, and the sound of your
sepulchral voice has more than once caused, by terrifying the
weak, and bringing despair to the convalescent. If you knew
your duty, since you cannot cut the pattern of a pair of breeches
without spoiling them, you would make yourself useful by
cutting
down trees, and ploughing up new land with a team of
stout oxen; but you plough with other men's heifers, you
philistine
.
You find it more pleasant to manage a flock of geese,
whom you can pluck, than to wield one goose in the miserable
garret you have exchanged for that barn, you call a tabernacle.
While speaking, Woodward kept fast hold of Martin's
collar
,
and with a hand like a blacksmith's vice, and an arm of
iron, had by this time dragged him from the keeping-room into
the hall or entry; then thrusting him towards the street-door,
he continued, When I give over my patients, which is no
till death takes them out of my hands, then come and
catterwaul
over them if you like; but if I can prevent it, you shall
not help to kill themthat's my business. He then returned,
crying out to those who lagged, Come! clear out, all of you!
out! out with you! he said, as he pushed the tailor's admirers
to the door, follow your leader!
Mr. Spiffard, do you suffer us to be turned out of your
house?
Yes, neighbours, I desire you to leave the place for the
present. You know that I have requested that
No ceremony, said Woodward, it is life or death. I go,
or they go.
You will repent this in fire and brimstone; in the
bottomless
Any where, Goody Crank, out of your company. The
doctor having made a clear coast by putting the last of the
visiters
out, turned to the nurse, Look ye, Mrs. Stubs, I gave
you orders not to let that fellow and those women murder the
person entrusted to your care, by frightening her into her
coffin
before you and I have done with her; and I now tell you,
that if you permit any more of this infernal catterwauling where
I have a patient, I will present you to the grand jury as a
nuisance
,
if not an accessory in killing by tortureor murdering
under false pretences.
Mr. Doctor, I have too much feeling for the soul of
Hold your tongue, woman! You are employed to take
care of Mrs. Spiffard's body!what do you know about
people's
souls? Ah! here comes one to whom I am willing to
entrust my patients, body and soul.
At that moment a venerable man in a rusty black coat, over
the collar of which descended his silver-white hair, was seen
descending from one of those four-wheeled vehicles, since
called dearborns. He entered without knocking, and with the
courtesy of a gentleman, the bland air and cheerful
countenance
of an apostle of the religion of love, he saluted the
Doctor
and the elder Spiffard.
You have had a numerous company I see by the many
departing
guests. Has any thing new occurred?
No, Mr. Wilford, the old story! Murdering my patients
taking my trade out of my hands. I am legally authorized
to kill, and you have heaven's sanction and that of your own
conscience, to preach peace to those I dismiss to a better world,
if you find them fit for it; I am willing to practice with you, but
I am chafed when I see all I can do to help the sick, undone
by ignorant impudent hypocrites.
God only knows the heart, Doctor Woodward.
But man can judge of the heart by the actions, Mr.
Wilford
.
Now, there are no two critters on God's earth more
dissimilar in most things, than you and I are: yet no man ever
thought either of us a hypocrite. But whether that
stay-tape-and-buckram-fellow
,
who has half the women of the country at
his beck, is hypocrite or fanatic, he must not interfere with my
patients. I can do my own businessask the sexton, if you
doubt it.
You are severe upon neighbour Martin, Doctor. I fear
you are intolerant in your religious creed.
No, sir, I am in that, a disciple of Roger Williams and
Harry Vane. Let every man worship his own way; I object
not, provided he does not serve the devil. I call no one infidel
or heretic for believing more or less than I believe; but I
resist
the despotism of man over the conscience, whether he be a
tailor, a bishop, or a pope.
May I let Mr. Wilford into Mrs. Spiffard's chamber, sir?
asked the nurse.
Yes, Mrs. Stubs, he is a physician for the soul.
However
,
remember, he don't want any female apothecaries to
assist
him. But first I will visit my patient, and do you attend
me, and mind my directions.
Thus saying, the eccentric physician, attended by the nurse,
retired, leaving the two Spiffards, father and son, with the
venerable
minister of the gospel of peace.
In the infinite variety of contrasts which the human family
presents to view, no two characters can form a greater than we
see in the enlightened and benevolent disciple of the christian
religion, who sees in his God a father, and in his neighbour a
brother, and one of those ignorant egotistical men who represent
every one as an enemy to religion, and a child of perdition, who
does not believe that the Author of all Good is in a state of
eternal wrath with the creatures on whom he is showering
every blessing. Mr. Wilford nursed the sick, (if his personal
aid was needed,) soothed the suffering, instructed the ignorant,
and engaged the wise in active plans of benevolence; not to
promote an exclusive sect, or propagate exclusive doctrines,
(for he opposed no doctrines but those which prohibited liberty
of conscience,) but to spread that knowledge which teaches
charity and forbearance towards others, with doubts of self, and
confidence in God.
Happily truth must prevail. Those dangerous doctrines
which enslave men politically under the mask of religion, are
sinking into contempt and abhorrence with the tyrannies which
supported them, and are supported by them. The struggle
may yet be protracted, for with the tyrants of the earth, and
their emissaries, it is a struggle for existence: but neither force
nor art can prevail against knowledge which has gained the
sanction of experience. Those monstrous errors which claim
authority from an antiquity surrounded by the darkness of the
middle ages, and stained with the crimes of murder, havoc, and
massacre, inflicted upon those who saw a beam of light, and
held fast to opinion for conscience sakethose errors, will be
known hereafter only to raise the wonder of the hearer or
reader, that such fatal absurdity could have existed.
CHAPTER XI.
We go to England, and what we did there
.
Reason and love keep little company together now a days.
I can get no remedy against this consumption of the purse:
borrowing
only lingers and lingers it out; but the disease is incurable.
Consent upon a sure foundation;
know our own estate,
How able such a work to undergo,
or else we are
Like one who draws the model of a house
Beyond his power to build it; who half through
Gives o'er, and leaves his part created cost
A naked subject to the weeping clouds,
And waste for churlish winter's tyranny.
It is a figure in rhetoric, that drink being poured out of a cup into a
glass, by filling the one, doth empty the other.
Home-keeping youths have ever homely wits.
Now worth this, and now worth nothing.
Shakspeare
.
As we are writing the memoirs of Zebediah Spiffard, and
not of his mother, we will be as brief as possible in all that
remains
to be said respecting this weak and unhappy woman.
It is generally acknowledged that there is considerable
affinity
between a man and his mother: and Zeb was not an
exception
to the ruleif rule it be. He was not only the son of
his mother, but his mother's character and conduct propelled
him through lifethey were present to his imagination in
every situation, to the day of his death.
The thoughts and images that passed through our hero's
mind during the scene of his reception, were never erased. He
found the state of his father's family worse than he could have
imagined from any previous information that he had received.
Of three sisters and a brother, the two elder girls (feeble and
sickly) were at a distant school,the boy was a cripple, and
almost an idiot,and the youngest girl was such as we have
described above. During this visit, poor Spiffard received
impressions
,
or rather renewed and strengthened those already
received, which influenced his actions ever after.
Owing to the skill of Doctor Woodward, his mother became
convalescent; but it was only a flattering ray of light on the
darkness of her condition. Her constitution was undermined;
her feeble body and feeble mind could not be sustained.
There was no redeeming spring in either. However, it was
during the season of hope and re-establishment, that the young
man took leave of his father's house, and returned to Boston to
make preparations for his European tour. His indulgent uncle
furnished him with money and credit; and in due season, the
green-mountain boy found himself in the great metropolis of
the great nation which he claimed as the source from which
himself
and his ancestors issued. Relatives of his father, he knew
of none. No trace of the noble family of Spiffards existed;
but to his mother's father, residing in Lincolnshire, he bore
letters; and after seeing the lions of London, he took the
mailcoach
for Stamford, and there found the house of his
grandfather
a scene of mourning and desolation.
His mother's second sister, Sophia, the beauty of the family,
the pet and pride of her parents, had eloped with a titled
libertine
of fortune, one of the hereditary lawgivers of England,
and was living in splendour in the great city her nephew had
just left. In the lap of luxury, devoted to infamy, she was
flattered by being the admired of depravity, though condemned
to be the companion of libertinism and prostitution. Her fall
and flight had murdered her mother. Her father, sinking to
the grave, was supported in penurious gentility by the energy
and industry of the youngest daughter, (who was a child when
in America,) one who had been the neglected of her foolish
parents
,
because plain in person, and retiring in manners; but
who had cultivated a mind of quick perception so as to rear
the fruit of filial piety; and was adorned by that knowledge and
those virtues which shine brightest when the darkness of
adversity
falls on all around: like the good deed of the poet in a
naughty world. Such was Eliza Atherton.
Spiffard was not made acquainted with the fall of his aunt
Sophia. He was told in such a manner, that they had lost
Mrs. Atherton and Sophia, as to lead him to suppose both dead.
Eliza said nothing on the subject; and her father was confined
to a sick chamber. The young man felt that there was a
mystery
,
but did not feel authorized to pry into it; he saw that his
grandfather was in poverty; he admired his remaining aunt; and
he did his duty.
The first thing our yankee water-drinker did, after leaving
his grandfather and aunt, was to purchase a small annuity for
the two lives, and transmit the necessary papers to them from
London. This left him almost without funds, but he felt richer
and happier for the transaction. Before visiting the European
continent, he determined to await the answers he should receive
from his uncle, to whom he communicated the particulars of
his journey, and made him acquainted with the disposal of his
funds, and the paucity of the trifle which yet remained to his
credit, with the banker.
His passion for the theatre was indulged, and grew with
indulgence
.
It was connected with his love of literature. It
was a love for the drama, not for the playhouse. The desire
to become an actor was revived. He had leisure to acquire
those accomplishments so essential to the profession. He
studied
music, instrumental and vocal, assiduously; while the
practice
of the sword of every description, and of dancing, gave him
that ease of deportment so necessary to those who aspire to
please on the stage. Zeb's voice was powerful and of great
compass. He became a first-rate burletta singer, and his
accurate
ear, by cultivation, led to taste and execution which few
could rival. Always active and athletic, his skill in fencing
and every sword exercise, was uncommon. Grace as a
dancer
he could not acquire, and nature had denied him stature for
the heroic in tragedy, or beauty of form or face, to compensate
the deficiency.
There was, at the time of which we are writing, and perhaps
still is, a theatre for amateur performers, in the neighbourhood
of Soho Square, to which Spiffard had been invited. Here he
soon found a congenial spirit, in some respects, and became
intimate with him. This was Thomas Hilson, so well known
in America for his histrionic talents. To Hilson, Spiffard
communicated
his desire to tread the stage for amusement, and
Tom promised him a trial.
What part shall it be?
Alexander the Great.
Oh, no, no,you are not up to that by a foot.
Alexander was not tall.
Always six feet on the stage. Suppose you try Scrub?
Never was poor hero more cut down. By way of
compromise
,
it was at length decided that he should play Young
Norval
,
and appear as Caleb Quotem in the farce.
The important night came. Zeb exerted his heroics and
pathetics manfully; he was very serious, and the audience very
merry. At length he died, to the great relief of the company,
who applauded long and loud. The mist which besets young
actors on first appearances, and had enveloped Zeb's mental
faculties, during the tragedy, was not fully dispelled, but he had
an awkward kind of uncomfortable notion that all was not as it
ought to be in his reception. Hilson assisted to prepare him
for Caleb. The tragedians of the company complimented him
on his success in Norval, with as much sincerity as if they
belonged to a regular Theatre Royal. Hilson said nothing on
the subject. The farce began, and if the audience laughed
at
the tragedy, they laughed ten times more
with
the comedy of
the new performer. But when he gave the songs, the plaudits
were so dissimilar from those Young Norval had received, that
the mist was dispelled, and Zeb saw plainly that he was no
tragedian
at
least in the opinion of his auditors. He felt that
his powers for creating merriment and delighting by song, were
rapturously acknowledged by all. Hilson shook him by the
hand, and without any of that paltry feeling which rivalry is
supposed to generate among artists of all descriptions,
welcomed
the yankee as a brother, and true son of Thalia.
This was our hero's golden agehis days were
couleur de
rose
, and the intoxication of applause rendered his nights, it
not peaceful, yet pleasant. No other intoxication had charms
for him. He drank water, to the astonishment of his male
companions; and the ladies thought him utterly devoid of
feeling
.
He never saw the preparations for riot or revelry, or
witnessed
its effects, without thinking of his father's house; or
looked on the smiles which were meant to allure, but that the
desolation he had witnessed at Stamford, was shadowed to his
imagination. The egis of Minerva presented an image which
turned the beholder to stone. The images impressed upon
Spiffard at home, and in Lincolnshire, made memory an gis
against the assaults of vice. The conduct of his grandfather
and youngest aunt, in respect to the lost daughter and sister,
had appeared mysterious to him, and although he had not pryed
into that which they did not think fit to reveal, he, since, had
recollected circumstances and words, which to his quick mind,
told the tale of a sorrow worse than poverty or disease can
inflict
.
News from home was tardy in arriving. Spiffard's money
was exhausted. His uncle's banker would advance no more.
He found himself under the necessity of playing for bread,
instead
of playing for amusement. Once more he tried his
tragic
powers. He was permitted to appear at one of the great
Theatres Royal, (not yet like all royals, shorn of their beams,)
in Othello: but he was overwhelmed by an Iago of six feet. It
was remembered that Garrick had declined Othello, for fear of
being compared to a black pompey handing the tea-kettle, and
that he had refused to play to Barry's Iago, thinking he might
be said to bully the monument. Spiffard was condemned for
want of height, by those who were in raptures at the physical and
mental powers of the baby actors who wielded the broad-sword
or bullied the towering Palmers, Popes, and Barrymores of the
stage. Again the comic powers and the musical skill of our
hero rescued him from utter failure, and he went down to the
provincial theatres as a star, though not suffered to shine
permanently
in that heaven of the English theatrical system
London.
It is not my intention to follow our hero from Bath to
Bristol
,
from Manchester to Liverpool. We are principally
concerned
in his adventures and his fate in America. We only
wish to account for the uncommon success of a yankee
green-mountain
boy, on the metropolitan stage of New York, where
we found him one of the principal low comedians, at the
opening
of our story, which we now hasten to pursue for the
gratification
of our impatient readers. But we shall have to show
how his expected fortune vanished,how he became
permanently
an actor, and the husband of the lady who made him
as happy as he appeared to be at the commencement of our
memoir, by the gift of her hand.
The first is a very short story, and the second not much
longer. Most of my readers will remember how often hope
has been disappointed; and many a Benedict will bear me out
in the assertion that there are those who say they will live
bachelors
,
and only keep their promiseuntil they are married.
Our hero feared the fate of his father: but no person on earth
was less like his mother than Mrs. Trowbridge: the towering in
person and thought, the high-minded, fire-eyed, black-browed
Mrs. Trowbridge.
As to fortune, we Americans know that men become rich
or poor as quickly as a scene changes at a theatre from a
palace
to a prison at the slap of a Harlequin's sword. Zeb's
riches were only in expectancy; and such are of the least
substantial
kind. You, Mr. Broker, expected to make ten
thousand
dollars by the rise of stocks: they fell, and you lost what
you never had. You, young gentleman, expected a fortune at
the death of your father, and lo! he is a bankrupt. And you,
Madam, the lovely mother of those two fine boys, though your
husband possessed millions, you live to see them dependant
perhaps happilyon their own exertions for bread. Our heros'
fortune was lost to him by the simple circumstance, that his
good old uncle Abraham, who had deferred making that will
which was to make his nephew rich, died unexpectedly, like a
great many other old men, although every step he took might
have warned him that he was tottering to the tomb. He died
unexpectedly of apoplexy, though neither fat nor short-necked,
and his property devolved on his brother. This would have
been no source of grief to the right-minded Zebediah, if that
brother (his father) could have been made happier thereby;
but his mother, who had been partially restored to health by
the skilful Doctor Woodward, and the benevolent Mr. Wilford,
sunk under the loss of children who were the victims of her
misconduct; and her husband lived but two weeks after her
just long enough to make him the legal heir of his brother, and
thereby deprive his son of the inheritance. He had been
induced
to buy lands on credit, to a great amount, in a cold and
barren northern region of the State of New York; he had
borrowed
money to a large amount on interest; his property had
been so neglected of late years, that even the estate left by his
brother was insufficient to satisfy his creditors; and his son,
instead
of being a man of independent fortune, was only an
independent
man. Independent he was, as he possessed youth,
health, habits of temperance, and a profession for which he was
well qualified.
When Mr. Thomas Apthorpe Cooper went to England in
search of recruits for the New York theatre, his experienced
eye and ear determined him to engage Spiffard, whom he found
starring it
at Liverpool. The success of the comedian was
VOL. I. 8
great at New York, his love of tragedy led him to become an
admirer of Mrs. Trowbridge. Her talents in her profession,
her decided manner, her ready wit, added to her known
approbation
of his efforts as an actor, fixed him as a lover of the
lady, and then,but what need we say more, after saying that
he was a lover? He was blind, and his blindness, added to a
naturally confiding disposition, brought them to that precise
situation
in which we found them in the month of October, in the
year eighteen hundred and eleven, when we introduced them to
the reader.
Between the time of Spiffard's return to America, and his
marriage
,
the manager of the New York theatre had sent out George
Frederick Cooke, had come back to the United States himself,
had enriched the theatrical world with Hilsonand many other
events, in the real and mimic world, had occurred, of which we
say nothing, and perhaps know as little as we say. We gladly
return to the point at which we left the actors in our drama, and
now pursue our story with as few deviations as the nature of
the case (and the information necessary to be imparted to our
readers) will permit.
CHAPTER XII.
We come back to the starting placeA scene behind the
curtain
.
No epilogue, I pray you; for your play needs no excuse.
This palpable-gross play hath well beguiled the heavy gait of night.
As I do live by food, I met a fool.
Call me not fool till heaven hath sent me fortune.
Since the little wit that fools have, was silenced, the little foolery that
wise men have, makes a great noise.
O this learning, what a thing it is!
Shakspeare
.
A HOPELESS task is before us. We have a long tale to
tell, and no chance, that we yet see, of introducing any duke,
marquis, earl, baron, or even knight, into our pages. True,
even princes have travelled through our republican land, and
other worthies, from dukes to M. P's. but we never fell in with
them. We had no dinners to give, nor palaces to show. And
in truth, we felt ashamed of our fellow-citizens, when we saw
them running after, courting, and cringing, to creatures, merely
because exalted by institutions whose injustice they, (as well as
every other well-informed man,) abhor. We fear, gentle reader,
that our story must depend upon its moral worth, and the
interest it may create, without any showing-off of the higher
orders of European society. We have not even a colonel or a
captain to help us; that is, one who is a hireling in a monarch's
service. As to an officer who only serves God and his
country
pah!
we might as well talk of a police officer. We shall
speak of as many foreigners as natives, and represent them as
we find them; good and bad, like ourselves; but all untitled.
It is a curious fact, that the greatest and best foreigner that ever
visited America, abjured the title inherited from his ancestors:
keeping that, he had earned in defence of the rights of man.
It was in the evening of that same day, in October, 1811,
which we have chosen as the time of commencing this history,
and near upon the stroke of six, by the clock of St. Paul's
chapel, that two inferior actors in life's drama (and ours,) sat
earnestly conversing in the dressing-room appropriated to
George Frederick Cooke, up the stairs formerly described,
in the rear of the Park Theatre. These members of my
dramatis
person were, the one, a tall, raw-boned, pale, native of
Massachusetts, who having been in London and Paris, and often
speaking of his perils by land and water, was called by the
inmates
of the theatre, the Yankee travellerby himself, Mr.
Cooke's
valet de sham
. The other, a short, square, red-faced,
Hibernian, who had found his way from Dublin to the new
world, in the capacity of a hair-dresser, was at this time a
naturalized
citizen, and entertained no doubts but America would
soon, as it ought, be governed by the ould country folk from
Ireland.
We have slightly noticed these persons before, but they are
deserving of a more formal introduction to the reader of this
tragi-comic-historical-memoir: tragi-comic because natural;
for unmingled mirth or sorrow is not of this world.
The Yankee traveller had made a successful voyage to
the West Indies, and in the true spirit of enterprise, had
followed
up his success, by investing all the proceeds of his sales
(of wooden ware,) in oranges; and shipping them, with himself
as supercargo, for London. The venture failed.
Trustworthy
Davenport found himself, as he used to say,
tarnationly
swampt. The oranges having proved more liable to the
wet-rot, than any wooden vessel is to the dry. The oranges
were damaged irrecoverablyutterly spoiledand Trusty, as
we may call him for brevity, was left nearly pennyless in the
great money-craving world of London.
Nothing daunted, he found his way to the American consul,
where he fortunately met Thomas A. Cooper, the
then
American
Roscius. Cooper hearing him tell his story with all the real
straight-forwardness and apparent twistification of an
unsophisticated
Yankee, was pleased; and induced him to engage as his
waiter. Trusty asserting that he would not call himself any
man's
servant
, except at the bottom of a letter.
The young tragedian was at this time negotiating with
Cooke, the older hero of the buskin, who, by rare management,
he sent out to America; and he attached the Yankee
traveller
to George Frederick, as a safe-guard to the eccentric
histrion, and as an assistant in the plan of transporting him to a
new stage, for the exhibition of his rare talents.
There was one stipulation insisted upon by Trusty, before
closing his engagement with the manager, which caused some
delay. The Yankee traveller proposed that he should be
furnished with money in advance, and permitted to go to Paris,
before returning home. To this the manager objected.
Advance money to a stranger! no, no, Jonathan.
If you can't trust me, you'd better not employ me. I don't
want much. I'll walk all the way, after crossing the channel.
What do you want to go there for?
To see Bonaparte.
To this Cooper raised many objections, but Trusty vowed
and
swan'd
that he had not come so far for nothing; and he
might as well see nothing, as not see the man all the world was
talking about.
The whimsical character of Trusty so pleased the manager,
that after having examined, like a man of business, into the
traveller's former trading affairs, and found his story correct to
the letter, he struck the bargain, furnished him with money to
travel on foot to Paris, and back to London, with a little stock
to trade on; and, as Trusty was just now telling Dennis,
he made more by a speculation in teeth and hair, than he had
lost by his rotten oranges.
Dennis O'Dogherty was as little like Trustworthy
Davenport
,
as Ireland is to Massachusetts; but he had succeeded
admirably in gaining for himself the snug and profitable
occupation
of dressing the hair of the male actors, and
manufacturing
wigs for both sexes, (Trusty supplying the raw material;)
besides furnishing soap, candles, and flour, for cleansing and
fitting for public inspection, those important personages who
represent the reverend, grave, and potent signors, before
whom Othello pleads his cause; the masters of the world, as
Rome's senators; or the four and twenty champions of the red
rose and the white, who decide the fate of kings on the bloody
fields of Tewksbury, and Bosworth; those heroes on whose
marchings and countermarchings, crowns and thrones and
empires halt or hang.
Such were the two worthies who now occupied Mr. Cooke's
dressing-room, and wondered that he did not make his
appearance
,
as he had to
begin the play
, in the character of
Penruddock
,
and the time of
ringing up
had almost arrived.
Spiffard, who played Weazle, occupied a dressing-room in
common with Tyler, over that tenanted by Cooke, had just
been down, ready drest for his part, to enquire if Mr. Cooke
had come, or been heard from. The answer was in the
negative
;
and Spiffard, after despatching a messenger for the
manager
,
retired to his room, leaving the Yankee and Hibernian to
resume their colloquy.
I'm thinking, said Dennis, there's about to be a bother
to-night, Mr. Devilsport.
Davenportmy name's Davenport, Mr. Doghearty.
Sure, that's what I said: and I'm thinking there will be no
play to-night, if they can't play the play widout Mister Cooke
for here lies his wig, and there hangs his coat. May be, they
can play the play widout Penruddock?
That would be sufficiently difficult in my opinion.
Something
like enacting Richard the Third, without the Duke of
Gloster.
Why, what has the Duke of Gloster to do with it?
Mr. Doghearty, they are one and the same person.
Richard
is Duke of Gloster before he is King Richard the Third.
You seem to understand these things, Mr. Devilsport?
Davenport, if you please. I have been but too much
attached
to the Dramma. Trustworthy had not studied
Walker's
orthoepy.
That's jist my case; but fait it's a bad practice, any
how-But
suppose we send over the way for a little brandy; or as
we are alone, we will toss up which shall send t'other.
I never drink any thing stronger than switchel. I swan'd
it with a bible oath.
I thought you said you were fond of the dram?
Dram? O, the dramma! that's dramatic literatureplays
and actingpoets and histrions.
Sure I'm bother'd. I know nothing of history, only the
history of St. Patrick, and Bryan O'Neil.
You don't read much then?
It's not the fashion wid us. The priest reads for us, and
that saves a mighty deal of trouble; but I'm still bother'd
said Dennis, about your saying you loved the dram.
The dramma, Dennis, the dramma,the art dramatic and
histrionic; histrion means player or actor. I have talent for
the stage, myself,I could act, but somehow or another I don't
like to have such folks as I see in the gallery, or the pit
sometimes
,
and
always
in the upper boxes, put in power to hiss or
clap me, when I can't get at them to give them my hand in
return
,
if I think them saucy. But to please a friend, I can
enact
a tragedy-part to the life. Did you ever hear me take off
Mr. Cooke? Just give me his wig, and I'll put on his coat,
and give you Penruddock to a T. I'll show you that I could
be his substitute.
Dennis assisted the actor. By the powers, but the wig is
the thing, after all!
The wig fits very well, but the coat is not long enough,
especially
in the sleeves. Now for one of his grand croaks.
While the yankee traveller was exerting himself, to the great
edification of Dennis, braying in discordant tones, which he
thought an imitation of Cooke, Spiffard again descended from
his dressing-room, to inquire for the veteran tragedian, and met
Cooper ascending from the green-room, on the same quest.
Has he come?
I think I hear him;yes, he is rehearsing. Let us go in
and see what state the old man is in.
Bad enough, by the sound of his voice, said the manager.
They entered, much to the discomfiture of the traveller and
his hibernian admirer. Davenport stood towering, six feet two
inches, at his utmost height, with his enormous long arms
outstretched
,
his bony wrists, as well as fists, thrust several inches
beyond the cuffs of Penruddock's coat, which was ludicrously
projecting, its square skirts; not much below his hips the wig
but partly covering his stubborn bristly hair, gave as grotesque
an appearance to his sallow face, as the coat imparted to his
gigantic figure. The expression of the detected hero's
countenance
,
between surprise, shame, and archness, was so
comically
equivocal, that it produced an effect on Spiffard more
allied
to mirth, than any sensation he had felt for some days past.
The Manager's disappointment at not finding Cooke, and his
chagrin at the consequences which his imagination presented as
likely to occur from the absence of the veteran at this critical
moment, caused a burst of angry words on the traveller, whose
change from the heroic action, was a sheepish attempt to
crouch his long figure behind the short, square form, of the
Irishman.
What are you about, you awkward booby?
Trusty made no answer, but Dennis undertook his excuse,
O, Mister Cooper, sir, don't be angry with Mister
Devilsport
,
he's only preparing himself to be Mister Cooke's
prostitute
.
The ludicrous now prevailed. With another exclamation,
which was more than half smothered by a laugh, the Manager
abruptly turned from the place to go in search of the
incorrigible
truant. We need not say that the travelling yankee soon
doffed his borrowed feathers. Cooper found Cooke at
Hodgkinson's
public house, with an empty decanter before him, and
was received with, Ah, Tom!let's have another bottle.
With great difficulty, the intended representative of
Penruddock
was removed to the theatre, and prevailed upon to suffer
Dennis and Davenport to array him for the character which he
was utterly incompetent to perform. Cooper determined to
let him begin the play, as the time of commencement was
already
past, and retired to his room to dress for the part, and
wait the determination of the audience.
The play had been long delayed, the gallery had long been
uproarious, and the pit had become noisy. All the
time-out-of-mind
overtures had been played, and apologies offered, until
the house would hear no more. Cooke was conducted to the
scene of action, and mounted, by the aid of Trusty, Dennis,
and Concklin, the head-carpenter, upon a platform behind the
cottage scene, through the window of which he was first to
speak to Weazle.
Is all ready behind? asked Oliff, the unintelligible
prompter
.
No, sir! shouted Cooke. What do you mean by
placing
me here, with my back to the audience?
The audience are there, sir, said Concklin.
There, sir! Where, sir?
There, Mr. Cooke, in front.
In front, you yankee scoundrel, I know they are in front,
but the front is there, sir, pointing to Theatre Alley. Do
you pretend to tell me where the front is! Me! George
Frederick
Cooke,tell me, sir! that have fronted the audience of
the British metropolis, and the Majesty of Britain;would you
tell me when and where to face an audience? Change the
scene, sir, put it here! and he turned his back upon the
proscenium
.
But, Mr. Cooke
Don't speak to me, sir!
Mr. Cooke is right! said Trustworthy Davenport.
Ha! are you there, little goodfellow?
Mr. Cooke is right! repeated Davenport.
To be sure I am! Am I to be taught my O. P.'s and P.
S.'s by a block of a carpenter?
I'll change the scene, Mr. Concklin, said Trusty;
please, sir, to stand still, as the platform is unsteadysteady,
sir. And suddenly seizing Cooke in his long arms, he lifted
him from his feet, and whirling him round with the velocity of
a
teetotum
, replaced him on the platform as he was before; at
the same time shaking the scene, Trusty cried, There, sir,
now all is changed, the audience are where they ought to be.
Don't you hear them, sir?
To be sure I do. Very well, my good fellow,I know
they were there. Prompter! all's ready.
The curtain rose. The first scene passed off without any
disclosure of the grave Penruddock's most unsteady state, as
he spoke through a window, and was supported by his
aids
on
the platform; but as the play proceeded, Penruddock stuck.
Mr. Cooke's old complaint was pleaded, and the manager
being ready, was joyfully received by the audience as the
substitute
,
instead of Trustworthy Davenport.
In the course of this evening's entertainment at the theatre,
Spiffard, on going to the door of the dressing-room occupied
by his wife, and her mother, with intent to speak through the
key-hole to Mrs. Spiffard, (for such was the etiquette of the
house, and is, of course, the custom of all well-regulated
theatres
,)
as he approached the door, saw the female dresser
coming up stairs bearing something of most suspicious
appearance
.
The woman knocked at the door, and before she
could be answered, he asked Who is that for? Mrs.
Spiffard, sir.
This moment was decisive of his future peace. The first
impulse was to dash the hated object to the floor. The next
moment caused hesitation; and reason came to his aid. He
turned, sorrowing from the door, before the knock of the
dresser
could be answered, and supporting himself by the
ballusters
,
he slowly gained his room, and sunk in a chair, hopeless
and tortured by images, to him, of the most distressing nature.
We will not attempt to depict the misery of this ill-fated young
man, who felt himself the doomed victim of that vice in
another
,
which of all vices, he most abhorred.
He had previously engaged himself for the next day to a
dining party at Cato's, and had agreed to be the companion of
Cooke to the spot appointed. He willingly fulfilled the
engagement
it
took him from home. In the next chapter we
will accompany them.
CHAPTER XIII.
A walk out of town
.
I can easier teach twenty what were good to be done, than to be one
of the twenty to follow mine own teaching.
Shakspeare
.
Twenty more, kill them too.
Ben. Johnson
.
These lies are like the father that begets them.
I'll after him, and see the event of this.
Wit. and't be thy will, put me into good fooling.
I knew ye, as well as he that made ye.
Sack, two gallons, 5s. 8d.Bread, a halfpenny.
Shakspeare
.
Bring forth the amreeta cup!
Thus have I triumph'd over death and fate!
And to his lips he rais'd the fatal bowl.
The dreadful liquor works the will of fate.
Southey
.
Spiffard
found the veteran waiting for him, in full spirits,
and seemingly none the worse, at least to a casual observer,
for the excesses of yesterday. The colour of his cheeks was
8*
a little heightened, but his skin, otherwise gave no indication of
intemperance. There was, however, a something in the
expression
of his eye, that rivetted Spiffard's attention. He had
noted it before, and it brought to him recollections of his
childhood, but not of its joys. To-day, there was a
brilliancy
,
a sparkling lustre in the dark grey iris, (almost
converted
to black by the expansion of the pupil,) that arrested the eye
of Spiffard, and although it brought the sharpest pain to his
breast, by the mournful images recalled of what he had seen
at home, without understanding then the meaning of the
appearance
;
yet, even this pain and these reminiscences, attached
him the more to his aged companion by a species of
fascination
.
Cooke had slept a death-like sleep after the excess of the
preceding day, and the exertions of the evening at the theatre;
and although he awoke with feverish symptoms, they were only
such as seemed, to him, to require drink, and that of no feeble
character. He had taken a bottle of brown-stout with his
breakfast, or rather for his breakfast, it being in the toper's
creed both meat and drink, and bread was as little in demand
with him as with Falstaff.
Remembering his engagement to dine at Cato's, he had
been in good time dressed for the occasion, and then taking a
glass of
stiff
brandy and water, he awaited his young
companion
with all the gaiety of renewed youth. Thus is the path to
ruin strewed with seeming flowers.
It may be observed, of the unhappy subjects to habitual
ebriety, that they have intervals free from delusion, during
which rational conduct is continued, for a longer or shorter
period, according to the circumstances in which the person is
placed. When the desire for the unnatural excitement occurs,
and is yielded to, it grows by what it feeds on, for a time, and
the victim of depraved appetite, glorying in his shame, goes on
from one stage of disease to another, each one rising above the
preceding, in symptoms of madness;madness, hailed as
health, until nature fails, and the degraded being sinks, crying
for aid to the physician or the friend, to save him from the
yawning grave he suddenly sees open before him; or the
racking
pains which awakened reason, tells him are the fruits of
misconduct, and the precursors of death. Then comes that
pitiful repentance which knows not amendment, and that forced
abstinence, in which is no merit. Cooke was at this time
approaching
the pitiable state above described, and had attained
its immediate fore-runner, that stage of the self-inflicted
disease
,
when the physical powers are screwed up to an unnatural
height, and the victim, notwithstanding repeated experience,
seems to feel assured that the poisoned cup contains the
draught that secures bliss and immortalitythe amreeta cup
of eternal happiness.
Ha, my boy! Here I am! ready and waiting for you.
Have you sent for a coach sir?
A coach! No. We will walk. I delight in walking.
Many a time have I left my lodgings, and rambled down to
Wapping, enjoying the scenes of that lower world, and then
along the Thames to Greenwich, and back again on that side
of the river.
But do you know, sir, that it is four or five miles to Cato's?
That's nothing! Ha! Some of my pleasantest days have
been passed in walking from morning till night in the environs
of London, when I could escape from the accursed enchanted
castle of Covent Garden and its keeper, the giant `Black
Jack.' O, how I have enjoyed myself in a solitary walk up
Oxford street to Tyburn, through the Parks, or to Richmond
Hill! At other times, it has been my whim to ramble among
the sailors and watermen down the river, either holding myself
aloof, and scanning the creatures I passed or mingling with the
motley herd, and enjoying my obscurity. We great men, he
added, relish an incognito.
Thus commenced the walk to Cato's. The reader will
hold in mind, that at the time of which we write, this great city
of New York had no claim to that title from its size. None of
those magnificent streets, called avenues, existed. And
excepting
the great commercial highways of river and ocean,
there were but two outlets from the town. One of these,
and the most frequented, our pedestrians followed, passing up
Broadway, then turning into the Bowery, and taking the old
Boston road where it diverges to the right at what was then the
United States arsenal, now the House of Refuge, a blessed
institution
!
where a system of education and reform, for children
of both sexes, is in successful operation, by which hundreds are
restored to society as useful members, who had been abandoned
by ill fortune or bad parents, to vice and beggary. A more
touching exhibition than three hundred pretty and well-dressed
children rescued from destruction, and joining in hymns of
thankfulness to their Creator, seldom falls to the lot of any
one to see.
Without a cessation of interesting conversation or lively
chat, kept up by artificial excitement on one part, and on the
other by the animation which exercise in the open air imparts
to youth and health, they were passing Kip's Bay, when
Spiffard
called the attention of his companion to the scenery on
their right,to Long Island and the waters dividing it from
Manhattan,alluding to the history connected with the spot.
Kip's Bay, said the veteran. Ah! here we landed after
crossing from yonder shore. Ha! how the Yankee-doodles
scampered when they saw our boats approach. They
remembered
the day before, when they attempted to make a stand
upon the heights of Brooklyn. If Sir William Howe had
followed
up, as he ought, where would have been your republic
now?
I!
I myself, was in full pursuit of Washington when a
retreat was sounded. I should have
had
him, and then the war
would have been at an end! I should have been gazetted,
`Lieutenant Cooke, of the 55th, has put an end to the
American
rebellion, by seizing with his own hand, that arch rebel,
George Washington.' Georgenamed by his loyal father,
after
the royal house of Hanover. All the jacobites of England
called their sons Charles, and Charles Edward: the adherents
to the Hanoverian dynasty, named theirs George, and George
Frederick. My father, a captain of dragoons in the service of
his sacred majesty, George the Second, bestowed on me,
unworthy, the glorious appellation of George Frederick; and
I have served my royal master, George the Third, faithfully.
Accursed be General Sir William Howe, that I did not send
the traitor Washington to London, to be dealt with according
to his deserts, and the will of my gracious sovereign.
Thus did the excited romancer pour forth a stream of words
at the suggestion of his heated imagination.
The reader who is acquainted with the ground in the vicinity
of New-York, and the shores of that water which divides the
lesser island and its city, from the greater and more fertile,
stretching south to the ocean, and north to the land of steady
habits, will perhaps recollect that at the period of which we
speak, most of the houses standing between the old road and
the east river were not in existence. Still, as the road runs
through a hollow, the water was scarcely discernible from it.
Let us leave the road, and ascend those higher grounds,
said Cooke. Spiffard willingly assented, as he wished the
internal exciting causes, which existed with his companion,
diminished
by time and exercise, before they should join the
company
with whom they had engaged to dine.
They accordingly turned from the road toward the river;
passing into a meadow through a gap in the fence. After
crossing several enclosures, as they approached the water, they
gained an eminence crowned by a flat rock. From this point
they looked down upon the bay or cove, which takes its name
from the former owner of the land surrounding itKip's
Bay.
A more lovely landscape of the half marine kind is seldom
seen, than that our pedestrians might now enjoy. On their left,
the eye passing over a portion of a pleasure-ground, (whose
foliage glittered in all the colours of the rainbow,) fell on the
calm water of the river, scarcely moved but by the eddies of a
tide-propelled current, and divided in the midst, between the
two larger islands, by the point of the islet called Blackwell's,
and the rocks in which it terminates; black dots on the surface
of the stream, marking the division of the main channel to the
pilots, whose white sails were seen on either side. To the right
might be seen a portion of the city, (not as now encroaching on
the great bay; not as now stretching eastward beyond the
Navy Yard, with its towering masts and close-housed line of
battle-ships,) and the opposite fast growing town (now city) of
Brooklyn. Immediately opposite to the wayfarers, two
reaches
or bends of a small serpentine river were visible, dividing the
meadows and groves of Long Island, and flowing to the
sea-water
of the bay. The swelling hills with their gardens,
orchards, and cultivated fields, terminated the view.
Aha! cried Cooke, when he had mounted the rock;
Aha! I see the whole of it now. Yes, sirr, down there to the
right, beyond the rocky and precipitous shore, is the bottom of
the bay where we landed. The wharf which you see was not
there then. But that rock, further south, afforded us a fine
shelter, if we had wanted shelter; but your Yankees did not
even wait until we were with within gun-shot distance: and see
that causeythat, too, is recent; we had to charge through
that marsh, knee-deep in mud and water.
Thus, combining images which were before his eyes, with
historical recollections from his reading, and the creations of
his excited imagination, the old man indulged his romancing
vein, to the astonishment of his almost bewildered companion;
who, finding that he paused, remarked, It has always been
granted that General Washington displayed great skill in
bringing
off his undisciplined, discouraged, and defeated troops from
the opposite shore, and with so little loss landing them on this
island in the presence of a superior enemyan enemy boasting
the proud title of the mistress of the sea.
Yes, sirr! he showed as great alacrity in running as Fat
Jack did in sinking. Sir, I shot his horse, and was advancing
to seize him, but to my surprise he sprung on his feet, and with
his long legs he soon distanced me. Long legs are the
distinguishing
marks of a Yankee.
And long arms, added a voice close to the ear of the
actor. They turned, and saw a man of towering stature, who
had come from a field (by the side of, and below the rock on
which they stood,) where he had been digging potatoes. He
had approached unnoticed, with a well-filled basket hanging on
his arm, and his spade musket-wise on his right shoulder. It is
probable this personage would have passed on below the stand
our pedestrians had taken; but attracted by Cooke's loud
harsh voice, and without being kept aloof by any repelling sense
of decency, (or perhaps thinking that what was uttered aloud
in so public a place, belonged to, or was intended for the
public
,)
he heard the words without stopping to listen, and felt
disposed
to retort when the disparaging description of the
distinguishing
marks of a Yankee struck his ear.
This interloper was as much above the Englishman's height
as Spiffard was below it, and stood at least six feet two inches,
as erect as a hemlock tree. His age was about fifty-five; his
iron-grey locks peeped from under a slouched hat that had once
been white. He wore no coat. His cloth waistcoat was open
in front, and showed a clean coarse white homespun shirt
which, tucked up at the sleeves, and open at the collar,
displayed
arms and neck that might vie with a Grecian Hercules or an
Irish hod-carrier. His lower extremities were furnished forth
with woollen pantaloons and clumsy shoes, tied with strings of
black worsted. His whole appearance was that of an
independent
American yeoman.
There can be no doubt that our countrymen are a taller race
than the European family from which they sprung. They have
a national physiognomy, more resembling the English than any
other people, yet marked by a distinct character. This man's
face was long; the muscles full and strongly marked. His eyes
were small, and expressive of humour: his nose broad and
straight; his mouth large; his lips thick; teeth irregular, and
chin full. His complexion was a brown yellow, which only
glowed faintly with red when he laughed, and that was not
unfrequent
.
Cooke eyed this giant from top to toe, and then saidBut
at the battle of Brooklyn, if battle it may be called, they made
better use of their legs than their arms.
We had to learn how to use our arms then; our legs had
been taught their exercise before.
Were you among the rabble-rout who fled at the sight of
the Union flag of Britain, and scarlet livery of your king?
Spiffard, who although amused by the rhapsodies of his
companion
,
was pained by the consciousness of the cause, and had
constrainedly kept up his part in the colloquy, was glad to find
that he might now become merely a listener to a dialogue
between
two characters so opposite as the loyal representative of
Richard and Iago, on one part, and a rough republican tiller of
Indian corn and buckwheat, on the other.
I'll tell you what, said the yeoman, we found that the
red coats were getting between us and the town, and that our
Lord Sterling as they called him,what had we to do with
Lords?knew no more of manuvering than we did; so we
thought we had better save ourselves for another opportunity,
and learn to handle our tools before we commenced the
business
of fighting.
`The better part of valour is discretion.' You were right
to run when you were over
there
, at Brooklyn, but here at
Kip's Bay, you had nothing to do but stand fast and shoot our
men as they approached, cooped up in their boats, and exposed
where every shot must have told. What did you run for, then?
There was no manuvering here. Your hero, your
Washington
,
got you out of the scrape the night before, and very
cleverly
,
to give the devil his due,though, if Sir William Howe
had done his duty, you would all have been prisoners, and sent
home to be hanged as rebels; but your commander saved you
during the night, while Howe kept aloof,
why
, no one knows.
Perhaps discretion kept him at a distance;that `better
part of valour' you talked of.
What should have taught him that discretion, with regular
troops at his back, and raw yankees in front?
Mayhap he remembered that he and
them
same rig'lars had
been at Bunker's Hill a short time before.
Why, there is something in that, whispered Cooke,
looking
over his shoulder at Spiffard, who enjoyed the farmer's
retort
.
But, he continued, raising his voice, we showed no
discretion when we crossed here in open boats, huddled
together
,
so that you might have shot us like black birds, or
pigeons
,
or any other defenceless animals, who congregate in
crowds, and sit still to be murdered; but you trusted to your
legs again, and again Washington (and running) saved you.
My friend, you seem to know a considerable of that time;
where might you have been?
Lieutenant Cooke, of the fifty-fifth was in the foremost
boat, and the first to land. I am the man!
I never heard of you before; but you are not the only
hero who has been obliged to sound his own trumpet; and I
don't like you the less for having been one of the rigglars of
that day, especially as it's all over a long time, and as I know
that though you landed in the summer of seventy-six, those
that were left of you, embarked from the same little island in
the fall of eighty-three. So, if you, and this little quiet
gentleman
,
will jist turn in here, and he threw open the gate of a
fence a little below the height on which they had been
parleying
,
and go to my house, we'll fight over all our battles
again, while we wash down enmity with either cider or whiskey,
or brandy, as you like best,I don't keep wine, only currant,
home-made.
That I will, with all my heart! said the tragedian, and
down from the rock he hastened, by the side of the hospitable
farmer. Spiffard followed, mournfully, for he foresaw in the
invitation, an increase of mischief.
They entered a neat two-story wooden house, which fronted
the water, and had the hill as a shelter from the northern blasts.
All was comfortable within. The good woman sat knitting
yarn stockings for her long-legged husband; and two pretty
girls, her daughters, were busied in preparing habiliments of
finer material, and more urbanity, for themselves. The matron
was portly, and the household duties of the morning having
been performed, she was dressed, as if she expected company,
in the seemly sort befitting her age and station. Her round,
good-natured face was bordered by a neat cap, which was tied
under her chin. Her gown of calico, and apron of white linen,
pure as snow, new fallen, corresponded with the well-starched
kerchief that rose from the shoulder to the cheek. She looked
like the fitting wife of the substantial yeoman. The girls had
more pretension in dress and appearance, as might be expected
from their youth and the encroachments of the city. In fact,
they emulated the style of young ladies, and would, if they
dared, have protested against the rough guise, the basket,
spade, and naked arms of their father, who shouted on
entering
,
Mother! I have brought these gentlemen in, to take a
drink after a long walk.
I'm glad to see them. Chairs, girls! From town,
gentlemen
?
Yes, madam.
Come, stir your stumps, girls! said the father. Some
cool water from the well; put down your trinkum trankums,
and take the pitcher, bring tumblers, and mother, turn cut the
cider, the brandy, the whiskey, and your oldest currant wine.
All was soon before them. Cooke took his grog, nothing
loth, and Spiffard a glass of water. The farmer was pouring
out for himself, and without taking his eye from the glass,
Wife, said he, what do you think? This old gentleman
says he made me run in the year seventy-six, when I was
sodgering
over there at Brooklyn.
Like enough, said the dame, laughing, I never believed
half the stories you have told me of your fights with the red
coats.
Thank you for that, mistress.
Was this gentleman among the British then?
Yes. He was a gay young officer when I carried a
musket
in Sterling's brigade. He says we run like heroes.
Ay, that ye did, shouted Cooke, who had already
swallowed
a second glass of the stiffest brandy and water, that
ye did, and your General with you, your Washington, I was
close upon him, I had nearly caught him
But you
didn't
.
No, he was too quick at retreat.
You should have sprinkled some salt on himfresh salt,
the boys say. When you would catch an old bird, sprinkle some
fresh salt on his tail. My sarvice to you.
Cooke looked astounded. He drew himself up with all the
assumption of offended dignity, while he shot from his
overhanging
eyelids glances that were intended to awe the rustic.
Sir! he began, but the ludicrous image suggested by his
blunt host, with the consciousness that he was playing the
braggart, overcame his acting and the desire to continue it; he
suddenly changed from the heroic scowl to a look of arch good
humour, and stretching his hand out to the yeoman, You
have beat me, he said, give me your hand. I shall never
be able to fight the battle of Brooklyn again. That salt has
preserved Washington.
The yankee shook the outstretched hand with a hearty
laugh, and a grasp that made lieutenant Cooke flinch from the
encounter. Wife, said the farmer, you can give these
friends a dinner of bacon, eggs, and potatoes, can't you?
Yes, and chickens and greens, and a good apple dumpling,
with a hearty welcome.
I wish, said Cooke, we were not engaged. This is
new. This is fresh. This would not be believed t'other side
the water. Then in full apparent possession of his
gentlemanly
manner, which was eminently prepossessing, he seemed
by an effort to regain the entire command of his rational
faculties
,
explained the object of their walk, and took leave with
thanks for American hospitality, adding, Your fresh-salt
shall preserve the memory of the master, the mistress, and the
beauties of Kip's Bay as long as George Frederick Cooke
lives to tell a story of `yankee land.'
He bowed, and followed by the laughing girls, and smiling
matron to the door, the Thespians departed. The farmer
accompanied
his guests until he saw them, by a shorter route,
gain the high road to Cato's; and then returned home, saying as
he left them, I shall be glad to fight the battle of Kip's Bay
over again with you any day you have a mind for it.
CHAPTER XIV.
The difference between a tavern and horse-shed
.
The beasts of the field know when to return home from their pasture,
but the appetite of man is insatiable.
Eddic poem
.
But that the poor monster's in drink, an abominable monster.
This can sack and drinking do.
I told you, sir, they were red hot with drinking;
So full of valour that they smote the air
For breathing in their faces.
This drinking and quaffing will be the ruin of you.
He will lie, sir, with such volubility that you would think truth were a
fool: drunkenness is his best virtue.
Shakspeare
.
Hell always weaves its strongest web, not out of the conflict of
pussions
themselves, but out of the powerless exhaustion which follows upon
it.
Enk
.
Who
has not heard of Cato Alexander's? Not to know
Cato's, is not to know the world. At least so it was
thought twenty-five or thirty years ago. But as all our readers
are not supposed to be acquainted with the world, we must
point out the situation, and describe the localities of
Cato's
that our tale may be duly understood, and its incidents
appreciated
.
Between four and five miles north-east from the building
called in New-York the City Hall, in front of which we first met
our readers, and introduced them to our hero, and other
personages
of note, yet to be made more intimately knownbetween
four and five miles from this building, on the west side of the
old Boston-road, stands this celebrated tavern, owned and kept
by Cato Alexander, and called, from the landlord,
Calo's
.
Cato, the keeper of a road tavern! Alexander the bearer
of gin-toddy to a whiskered shop-boy on a Sunday! Cato
Alexanderwhat awful names! How full of associations!
each singly denoting the conqueror of self, or the conqueror of
the world; now united to designate a servant of vicious and
pampered appetites!
Do not let us be mistaken. Cato of Cato's was no worse a
man than the tens of thousands with whiter faces, who
administer
to the pride, passions, and vices of the multitude. He
was neither more nor less than the keeper of an eating and
drinking house; one whose
lawful
trade is to tempt to excess,
and who may legally live by administering poison.
It would puzzle any but a philosopher to find a reason for
that preference Cato's has enjoyed for many years over all
the many receptacles of idleness and intemperance which
stand invitingly open on the roads and avenues leading to and
from our moral and religious city.
We
, being a philosopher,
have found it, and can communicate. It is preferred to other
houses of refuge from temperance, that are known under the
appellation of
retreats
, (such as Citizen's Retreat,
Fireman's
Retreat, Mechanic's Retreat, Old Countryman's
Retreat, and a hundred other retreats from public notice,
or domestic duties,) not because its situation has more of rural
retirementfor it stands full in view of the traveller or
wayfarer
.
It is not a retreat from noise, for
that
resounds within;
nor from dust, for
that
it invites and receives from every wheel
and hoof that passes. It is not preferred because it enjoys or
gives its visiters better or more extensive prospects than its
rivals
,
for it commands no view but of the dirty high-road, a
cabbage-garden
,
a horse-shed, and a sigh-post; nor is it chosen
for that, the breezes of either land or sea bear health or
refreshment
to its admirers; for the land rises on every side,
barring every wind that blows from visiting it too roughly.
Neither is it the spacious apartments or elegant furniture that
gives it preference, for its inmates are cabined cribbed, and
confined
in cells like acorn-cups, compared with the halls and
saloons
of the town hotels and gambling-houses. But, Mrs.
Cato is a notable cook. The cabin is convenient. There
are none but black faces belonging to the establishment. We
feel that we are right worshipful. All around is
subserviency
.
Desdemona saw Othello's visage in his mind; it is
to
some
, pleasing to see the badge of subserviency in the visage.
To this convenient court of conviviality our pedestrains
approached
,
somewhat fatigued, but more heated, by the long
walk under a clear October sun. The breezes from the
magnificent
sheet of water which ebbs and flows between the
islands of the city, and the harbour, would have been welcome
to the glowing faces of the veteran, and his young companion;
but they never visited Cato's. Iced punch was seized, to
supply the deficiency by
one
, water from the pump refreshed
the other.
Why, Spiffard, what put it into your head to make Mr.
Cooke walk this infernal distance? Such was the salutation
from a fat and heavy figure who had approached to meet them.
He chose to walk, and I chose to please him.
By-the-by
,
I thought he would be the better for it. It has dissipated
some alcohol. This Spiffard spoke in a low tone, while
Cooke took another draught from the hands of Cato.
Master Cato! neither Rome nor Utica ever could boast
such a bowl of iced punch as this! You are the Cato of
Cato's! `Blush not, thou flower of modesty.' What do you
laugh at? A flower may be dingy. Who calls you black?
See how the red blood mantles in his cheeks! The
orange-tawny
and the crimson streaks, shine through the glossy ebony
like northern lights through the darkness of a polar-sky,
cheering
a six months night. Cato of Utica! thou pride of Africa!
Give me the bowl again. `I'm a horse, if I have wet my lips
these three hours.'
`These lies are like the father that begot them.'
Ah! Tom!hah, are you there. Take away the
temptation
,
Satan. Well, lads! what's the sport?
Sport? We waited for you.
True, there is no sport till I come; as the thief said on his
way to Tyburn.
We have waited dinner for you. What put it into your
heads to walk?
Lusty youth, vigorous limbs, active minds, hot blood, ha!
Was it not so, comrade?
More of the last than the first, said Spiffard.
Envy, by the gods! thou water drinker!if I could find
epithet of more contempt, I would bestow it on thee,in thy
abject taste, thou likest thyself to the beasts of the field.
Who are guided by unerring instinct to avoid poison.
said Spiffard. Water drinker! it is my title of honour.
So be it then. Spiffard, the water-drinker!
Dinner, gentlemen!
Hold to the practice, said Cooke to Spiffard, as he took
his arm and walked to the dining-room. Hold fast the
practice
,
my young friend, and deserve the title. Long may you
keep it, and you may laugh when you see us make wry faces
as we hobble and limp with gouty limbs, or pant for lack of
breath, our livers like sieves or gridirons, and our noses like
hot pokers. Sieves and gridirons, hot coals and pokers,I
am a Cook, you know, and here's dinner!
Leave we the company of thought-drowners, and meet them
again by-and-by. Some hours had passed. Spiffard had
tired of the noise of the table, wearied with flashes of
merriment
not inspired by wit, but by wine; not the genuine and
healthy progeny of the reasoning faculty when indulging in
sportive recreation, but the mere empty ebullition of excited
animal spirits, without the guidance or control of reason. He
had walked up and down the road in search of a pleasant
place for retirement, but finding none, seated himself upon a
bench under a building erected for the reception of
water-drinkers
,it
was the horse-shed in front of the house. The
tavern has a piazza, but the noise of the revellers made it
almost
as disagreeable as the smoke-incumbered dining-room.
The tumult increased so as to reach the place of refuge he had
chosen. Discordant sounds commingled in confusion, the
monotomy of which was broken by the high, harsh,
screeching
and croaking of Cooke's notes of inebriation.
I'm your man, sir!a dead shot, sirr! George Frederick
is the name to
cow
a yankee!
The whole party now issued to the piazza, and after a
preliminary
discussion of the mode in which wounded honour was
to be cured by the
duello
, (a discussion of which Spiffard only
heard pieces or snatches of sentences, as ten pacesfive
paces,yankee actor,dead shot, they descended, and took
a station between the tavern and the horse-shed.
It now appeared that Cooke and Cooper were to be
pitted
,
not as actors, but as duellists. The seconds were busy
loading
the pistols, (an implement of death or amusement always
kept in readiness at Cato's.) Cooke became silent and
dignified
,
only showing by increased energy in his step, (not always
properly applied,) and increased colour in his face, the increase
of his ebriety. His antagonist was all politenessthe
established
etiquette with those who meet to murder. The seconds
and witnesses displayed to the eye of the water-drinker, or any
other rational animal, that they were all so far blinded
themselves
,
that they could not see how plainly they were exposing
their supposedly deep-hidden hoax, to any clear-sighted
spectator
.
The word was given. The two tragedians fired at the
same moment, or nearly so. Cooke's second took advantage
of the smoke and noise to thrust a stick through his principal's
coat, to produce a bullet-hole, at the same time he threw his
left arm around him, as if for support, crying, He has hit you,
sir.
But Cooke was in one of those half-mad, half-cunning
paroxysms
,
which enabled him to act as the subject of the hoax,
while he in reality hoaxed the hoaxers; and enjoyed all the
pleasure of acting the part of the dupe, with the assurance of
duping those who thought they were playing upon him. He
was assuming the madman, and sufficiently mad to enjoy all
the pleasure which only madmen know. Pretending to
believe
that he was hit by his opponent's ball, he, with a force
which only madness could give, threw out his left arm, and
hurled his officiously designing second several paces from him,
reeling until the cow-yard (the court-yard of the establishment)
received him at full length. As the smoke evaporated, Cooper
was seen extended in mock agonies; his second and others of
the party, leaning over him in pretended mourning.
Mr. Cooke, your ball has passed through the lungs of poor
Cooper, I'm afraid. The surgeon is examining the wound.
There is little hope
None, sirr! I never miss. He is the tenth. I am sorry
for him. He stalked up to the pretended hurt man with due
gravity. This was a precious opportunity, for the veteran to
mingle sarcasm and mock regrets, and to pay the hoaxers in
their own coin, stampt anew in the mint of his brains, and he
did not let it escape him.
Poor Tom, poor `Tom's acold!' I'm sorry for him. I'm
sorry that his farthing-candle-life was extinguished by my hand,
although he deserved death from none more. `This
even-handed
justice commends the ingredients of' our murderous
pistols
to our own breasts. I warned him of my unerring aim;
but the `thief will seek the halter.' How do you find his
wound sirr?
I am examining it, sir; I am torturing him.
It is no more than he has done to hundreds of hearers.
I am afraid, sirr, he will never play again.
Then by murdering him honourably, I have prevented
many dishonourable murders. Shade of Shakspeare, applaud
me! He will never again murder Macbeth instead of Duncan,
or throttle Othello instead of Desdemona. I am a second
Mahomet overthrowing idolatry! The wooden god of the
Yankee-doodles lies prostrate! Fie, George Frederick to
triumph
over a block. Farewell, poor Tom! poor enough.
This was said over his shoulder. I could have better spared
a better actorbut let that pass, while we pass to our pious
meditations. Who takes order for the funeral? Bear the
body in! When sober none did more justice to his rival's
merit.
He revives, sir. There is hope yet, said the surgeon.
Then may the poets mourn.
While the pretended dead duellist was removed into the
house, Cooke's second approached him, exclaiming, The
horses are ready, sir; we must fly.
We
, sirr! when I fly `or creep,' I choose my company.
George Frederick Cooke never flies from danger. Fly, sirr,
if the idol of Yankee-land lives, there is nothing to apprehend
from his worshippers, nothing to fly from, except when he acts;
and if he dies, and by
my
hand, I have honoured
him
, and
benefited
the world. So saying, the hero strutted most sturdily
to the steps of the piazza, where, feeling the difficulty of ascent,
he recollected his wound, called for assistance, and was
supported
to the table, at which sat, like another Banquo, the man
whose fall he triumphed over.
Spiffard had looked on unmoved at this farce: unmoved
except by feelings peculiarly his own. He had been
spell-bound
.
Although suffering, he had been unable to move or
turn his eyes from the objects that caused his pain. He was
fascinated. He gazed upon the scene as the bird fixes her
eyes on the serpent who approaches to destroy her young; and
like the bird, he could not fly or withdraw his attention from that
which distressed him. His eyes followed the retiring company,
until they were again within the walls accustomed to revelry,
riot, and brawling. He then turned his head, and perceived for
the first time, that he had a companion.
Sitting on the same bench, under the horse-shed, and within
a few feet of him, he saw an old gentlemen in a brown suit of
clothes, coat, waistcoat, and breeches, (an article of clothing
even then rarely seen,) his cotton stockings, and well
polished shoes, only soiled by recent dust, denoted him a
pedestrian. He supported both hands on his silver mounted
cane, and his eyes were fixed on his young companion. You
appeared to be interested in the scene that has just passed.
Do you know any of the sportive gentlemen who have been
playing such strange gambols?
I know them all. I am one of the party.
But you have not joined in their frolicsome foolery.
Perhaps because I did not partake of the exciting cause.
I understand, was the stranger's brief reply.
Spiffard was pleased with both the appearance and the
address
of the senior, whose manner, and a something
independent
of dress, indicated good breeding and philanthropy,
mingled with eccentricity. Is it too much to say that all this
may be seen at a glance? If not seen, it may be imagined.
Imagination is rapid in conclusions.
This person had walked into the horse-shed, and seated
himself
,
while Spiffard's attention had been so occupied that he was
unconscious of his approach. The old gentleman had marked
both the scene, and the absorbing interest the young man took
in it.
There was a pause in the conversation of these
chance-connected
and dissimilar interlocutors, during which, Spiffard took
note of the figure, dress, and attitude of the person to whom he
felt himself attracted by something stronger than mere curiosity.
In his sitting posture, the tall, thin person of the stranger was
supported, as he bent forward, by a cane, with a plain round
silver head, on which both hands, ungloved, rested, and a
mourning ring was displayed upon a finger of one. As his head
was projected, his gray locks, not time-thinned, fell on either
side of a face, pale, and marked by the furrows of at least fifty
years. His eyes were black as jet, and as brilliant as the most
vigorous intellect, or the most robust health and youth could
display. They were piercing; but the bland tranquillity of the
surrounding features prevented the appearance of severity.
You are one of the party, said the stranger; but you
give as a reason for not joining in their anties, that you had not
partaken of the exciting cause; that is, as I understand
Drinking madeira and champagne.
And you?
Never drink any liquor but water.
Is it possible!
Here followed another pause. The old man seemed
surprised
.
He repeated his last words several times, in a low
tone, as to himself.
The reader must recollect that I record events of five and
twenty years ago. There were then no
temperance societies
.
Gentlemenyes,
gentlemen
, did not think themselves degraded
by drunkenness.
At length the stranger resumed, You dislike wine or
spirituous
liquors, perhaps?
No, on the contrary, I remember, as a child, being
delighted
by the taste, and eagerly desiring wine.
And you deny yourself the gratification! Why?
I have seen the misery caused by indulgence.
Have you, so young, seen enough to produce such a
resolution
;
such a determined abstinence? If you had seen what
I have seenfelt what I have felt! you would curse the poison
that scatters shame and sorrow among so many victims of
intemperance, and their unhappy relatives!
The colour had rushed to the old man's cheeks, and his
eyes, before bright, now shone with a brilliancy almost
supernatural
.
If I have made myself understood in the previous delineation
of Spiffard's character, and the circumstances which had formed
it, I need not say that the words and looks of the stranger had
on him the effect of magic. Those chords of the memory,
feeling, imagination, which, too strongly touched, tended to
intellectual derangement, were violently assailed. His
excitement
rose with the old man's voice, and the fire of his eyes
maddened him. My curses join with yours; I have seen and
felt all you speak of.
Oh, no! you have not looked on a face beloved, and seen
it distorted.
I have!
You have not seen one justly beloved, flying from the
proud eminence his virtues had gained; the beloved shepherd
of a Christian flock driven to despondency by admitting doubts;
a despondency, the result of severe application upon a delicate
frame; doubts, the effects of disease; and beheld the victim
of overstrained research seeking a refuge from doubt in certain
destruction, until his only asylum was in a mad-house!
Spiffard's feelings had so long been pushed beyond the
healthful medium, that his monomaniacal propensities had
gained full power over him. The images of his father and
mother rushed before his imagination so vividly, that he
appeared
to see them with his bodily eyes; and the form and
VOL. I. 9
lineaments of the latter were strangely commingled with those
of his own wife: he uttered an exclamation that attracted the
attention of the old gentleman, and his feelings were no longer
absorbed in self.
Admiration, produced by the conduct of a youth who
appeared
so strongly to sympathize with him in a sorrow happily not
common, took possession of the stranger, and changed his
expressive
countenance from its wildness, to a softer and calmer
appearance. His voice faltered as he attempted to utter words
intended to soothe the agitation he had so unaccountably
caused. At this moment the noisy bacchanalian rout issued
from the house, and the imaginary gave place to reality. The
shades of evening were closing in. Carriages and saddled
horses were brought to the door, and several voices shouted
Spiffard! Skulker! Where are you? Where is the
water-drinker
?
Cooke insisted upon having his pedestrian companion as an
attendant in the carriage into which he was lifted; for now, in
consequence of the additional cups taken in token of
reconciliation
with his late antagonist, (who had miraculously recovered
from his mortal wound,) and a parting glass, or stirrup-cup,
drank with Cato, who had been dubbed Emperor of Morocco,
and king of Utopia, instead of Utica, he could no longer
obtain command over any member but his tongue, which
incessantly
demanded Spiffard.
But Spiffard had, for the present, a stronger attraction in the
aged stranger; who, refusing to take a place in one of the hacks
had turned his steps to the road, as if determining to walk to
the city.
The young man resolved not to leave him, and seeing that his
former pedestrian companion was safely stowed in a carriage
with one of the youngest of the revellers, who promised to
deposite
him at his lodgings and with trusty Trustworthy, the water
drinker followed his new-made acquaintance, and soon overtook
him, although he was walking with strides and vigour
unpromised
by his grey hairs and attenuated form.
Joining the old gentleman, Spiffard asked permission to
accompany
him, which was readily granted, with an expression
of gratification that one so young should prefer walking with
him to the easier mode of accomplishing the journey. There
was a sympathetic attraction felt by these two dissimilar
individuals
not commonly experienced by two of the male sex at
first sight.
You pay me a compliment by preferring my company to
that of your friends.
After a silence of a moment, Spiffard ejaculated, friends.
Perhaps companions would have been a more suitable
word.
For most of them, sir: but there are some even in that
riotous company, who, I have reason to believe, are my
friends.
Not any engaged in the farce of the duel?
Yes, both the principal actors in that farce; one intended
by the authors as the
butt
even the long-erring eccentric
George Frederick Cooke: the other, the frank and liberal
minded Cooper.
Can such a man as Mr. Cooke be the friend of any one?
Yes, sir, if that one has shown an interest in his welfare
that could not be suspected to arise from selfishness. I may
be mistaken; but I think he is attached to me because I have
opposed his mad career, and have rejected firmly his excuses
while I endeavored to strengthen his (hitherto fruitless) resolves
to amend, and to give effect to his penitence. O, how truly,
in one of his comedies, Holcroft has called repentance a
sneaking
,
snivelling fellow, when not accompanied by amendment.
I don't quote his words.
The words of a play are seldom worth quoting.
The words of truth are as acceptable from a play as from
a homilyfrom a stage as from a pulpitfalsehood is always
detestable and truth always to be reverenced.
I spoke hastilyI was occupied by my feelings respecting
that grey-haired actor whose folly I had been witnessing. I
felt that plays were worthless, viewing the conduct of players.
I was wrong.
You do injustice now to players, as then to plays. You
forget that men of every profession play the fool. Even in the
fools-play which you have witnessed, and which boys might be
ashamed of, there were only two players to ten men of other
denominations; men with more fixed occupations and
connexions
;
more generally esteemed in society; but all as eager in
the childish game and as deeply involved in the guilt of
intemperance
,
as the man you stigmatize as the grey-haired-actor.
Folly is doubly despicable connected with grey hairs.
True, sir, but not more in an actor than in a merchant,
physician or lawyer.
Your remark is just. But
you
have excited my curiosity.
What could have induced one so young and so firmly attached
to habits of temperance, to seek the company of an old
inveterate
,
irreclaimable debauchee?
Old, inveterate, but perhaps not irreclaimable. While life
remains, there is hope. We do not despair of returning reason
for the lunatic or the maniac.
True,true,thank God! thank God!
The pedestrians were by this time walking in that imperfect,
though oft times pleasant, light, which the stars alone shed over
an American landscape in autumn; and Spiffard did not observe
the change his words had produced upon his companion; the
convulsive expression of feature with which he uttered the few
last words.
Such being the nature of man, the youth proceeded,
and the power of truth, persuasively employed, being great
beyond our knowledge, surely we ought not to abandon as
irreclaimable
any of our fellow-creatures who are not
permanently
deprived of reason. Mr. Cooke has a powerful mind,
and although perverted and debased by the
second nature
of
habit, perhaps the inclinations implanted in the
first
, may be
restored, and the patient saved. I am influenced by motives
flowing from circumstances touching me nearly, as has been
already hinted.
Yes! said the old man. Yes, I can understand. You
have witnessed the mental alienation of some one dear to you.
You are a stranger to me, and I have already spoken to you as
men of the world do not often speak to strangers, but it is
evident
that we, however dissimilar in other respects, are alike
sufferers
from the same cause, and
that
is a source of sympathy
with minds under the governance of reason. The loss of
reason
in one dear to me has caused the greatest suffering I have
ever experienced. I have to-day, within a few hours,
witnessed
his deplorable condition; and seeing, as I did in your
presence, such voluntary relinquishment of the greatest
blessing
bestowed on man, I lose my self-command, and utter that
which had better, perhaps, have been locked in the breast, and
guarded with close lips.
There was a long pause in the colloquy of the two
pedestrians
.
We will not continue to report in detail any more of
the conversation touching this subject. Our hero's return
walk from Cato's was a perfect contrast to that which
carried
him thither. His companion was equally an opposite,
in all but age, and in an alacrity for walking. The old
gentleman
was an habitual pedestrian, and could talk, although
walking at a good round pace. His feelings had been excited
by circumstances; his confidence was gained by the open
manner, and the truth-stamped physiognomy of our homely
hero.
They reciprocally imparted their names, and Mr. Littlejohn
(such was the stranger's appellation) made known many
circumstances
relative to his domestic griefs, which were drawn
from him by the conversation we have related. He said that
he was returning from a visit to his unhappy son, (who was
confined in the lunatic asylum,) when he stopped at Cato's,
attracted by the scene he had there witnessed.
We will dedicate another chapter to the character and
conversation
of Mr. Littlejohn and his companion, by which the
reader will find, or may suspect, that the old gentleman will
perform no unimportant part in our drama.
CHAPTER XV.
The walk back to town
.
I could wish courtesy would invent some other custom of
entertainment
.
One draught above heat, makes him a fool; the second mads him, and
the third drowns him.
I * * * never was forsworn;
Scarcely have coveted what was mine own;
At no time broke my faith; * * * and delight
No less in truth than life.
Shakspeare
.
A dramatic exhibition is a book recited with concomitants that
increase
or diminish its effect.
It was said of Euripides, that every verse was a precept, and it may be
said of Shakspeare, that from his works may be collected a system of civil
and economical prudence.
Johnson
.
He (Shakspeare) needed not the spectacles of books to read nature; he
looked inwards, and found her there.
Dryden
.
Spiffard
had a predilection for aged companions. Old
age is reverenced for its supposed concomitants; as, perhaps,
Doctor Johnson would have said. If they are absent, old age
is poor, indeed. Our hero generally found age enriched by
experience, and sometimes by a well-stored memory, where
characters and events are recorded, that had escaped the
historian
or biographer; and he found that the old, for the most
part, were pleased by his attentions, and rewarded them by
confidence. Age is garrulous; but this, if the memory is
perfect
and the love of truth strong, may be a source of great
profit to youth. A selfish, dogmatical, egotistical old man is a
nuisance,he is always, regardless of truth. Such was not
the character of Spiffards present companion.
James Littlejohn was a merchant, and a successful one. He
had imbibed a taste for books before he was confined to the
counting-house, and his knowledge was not limited to the
accumulation
of dollars and cents, or his conversation to the
market, or the value of stock. He was a rich and prosperous
merchant. A good man off and on 'change: beloved by his
friends, and trusted to any extent on the Rialto of Wall-street.
Was he happy? No. He had lost his wife. He loved her
more than rupees. She left him two sons; the oldest a severe
student, lost health in seeking knowledge, and died at his desk;
the youngest likewise an ardent student, had devoted himself
to theology, and had been admitted to sacerdotal power, by
ordination
.
The fair promise of his usefulness had been blasted
by an unhappy attachment to a beautiful girl, who, after
encouraging
his addresses, threw herself away upon a worthless
foreigner
,
an impostor, with an assumed title, who deserted her
to mortified pride, fruitless repentance, and early death. The
young man was changed, he shunned society, devoted himself
to abstruse metaphysical reading, and after a short career as a
preacher, admitted doubts and opinions which he honestly
expressed
,
and in consequence was obliged to retire from the
pulpit. The conflicts in his mind, with the disappointments
ambition and love had received, ended in his becoming a
desponding
maniac, and as such he was now an inmate of the
lunatic
asylum. During the earlier progress of this disease of
the mind, he, for a short time, sought refuge from his perturbed
thoughts, his doubts and misgivings, in stimulants; but his
better
feelings caused him to reject this miserable resource, which
only hastened the prostration of intellect, and he sunk into
hopeless melancholy, with occasional paroxysms of violence;
during which he cursed existence, and accused the justice of
heaven. Many of these circumstances were imparted by the
afflicted father during this evening walk, and Spiffard frankly
made known the history of his brief life, and explained the
cause of his abhorrence of that particular vice, the
contemplation
of whose effects had temporarily united him and his
companion, and seemed to indicate further intimacy.
Various topics were discussed, in a walk of several miles;
and Mr. Littlejohn was struck with surprise at the clearness
with which Spiffard spoke on many subjects not usually made
familiar to young men. He could not likewise but observe
the confidence Spiffard evinced in the kindly disposition of his
fellow-creatures, an absence of suspicion which bordered on
infantile
simplicity. He had no art to find the mind's
construction
in the face. The seeming good, were, to his eyes,
truly good.
After one of those pauses, which must occur even when
dialogists
are prone to communicativeness, Mr. Littlejohn broke
silence by saying, I was surprised when you told me that
you are a player by profession, for it is long since I have
thought of the theatre, or noticed a play-house placard. Your
appearance, manner, conversation, are all at variance with my
former knowledge of actors, and with my preconceived opinions
of that class of men. I must consider you as an exception to
a general rule. You have more acquaintance with literature,
more knowledge of history, and of the relative situations and
interests of the nations of Europe: you are better acquainted
with the laws and institutions of this country than belongs to
one whose pursuits are those necessarily connected with a
profession
so superficial.
The profession does not deserve the epithet, sir, and as to
my knowledge of American affairs, you must suppose that as
an American I am bound to know more of them than
foreigners
do: I certainly should be ashamed of myself if I did not.
A good actor must make himself acquainted with so many
things, that he can hardly be considered a superficial man, at
least when compared with the generality of mankind. The old
gentleman whose mock duel and bacchanalian behaviour
attracted
your attention, is no superficial man. He has read
much, thought much.
Not to much purpose, or he would not pervert the gifts of
God in the manner he does. But in
that
he is not singular. I
do not charge this vice on your profession exclusively, but I
fear that those who are devoted to the stage are more in the way
of temptation than most men.
Then sir, said the actor, the stage must be an evil.
As it has been, and is conducted in most countries, and
especially in England and America, I believe it is, rejoined
the merchant.
Yet, sir, said Spiffard, good men have advocated
theatrical
establishments.
In the abstract. The theory is beautiful. Moral lessons,
rendered as indelible as they are delightful. But if the
manager
or director aims at pleasing rather than instructing, at filling
his purse rather than other men's minds, he seeks that which
will please the idle and profligate, because they are the
majority
of mankind.
Garrick has said, sir, `those who live to please, must
please to live.'
So the unhappy victim of seduction may excuse her
flaunting
finery and painted face. It is the plea of the meretricious.
If it is necessary to flatter vice, and encourage folly for the
support of an institution,
that institution is wrong
, and must be
abandoned. I can conceive of a theatre which would be a
school of morality, but it must be directed by a wise
government
,
or academical institution, and not by those who live to
please, and `must please to live.' Temperance has not
hitherto
been encouraged by theatrical institutions.
Intemperance
and its attendant vices prevail within and around
theatres
;
and the lessons of dramatists are little calculated to
eradicate
the evil. Sheridan exhibits his hero and his
companions
revelling in bacchanalian licentiousness, and makes vice
glory in her deformity. Who can calculate the mischief
produced
and propagated by that one scene of revelry in the School
for Scandal, or of the one song, `let the toast pass?'
Or of any other drinking song, sir, of which we have so
many not connected with the drama.
True, but from the stage it is conveyed to thousands, in
its thousand-times repetition, who would otherwise never have
heard of it. Besides, sir, it comes recommended by the
wit of the author personified in the profligate Charles, who
is held up as the object of admiration and imitation. It
is recommended to assembled thousands, who thoughtlessly
applaud
while poisoned by the cup they commend to the lips of
others. Who shall say that this very song did not cause its
author to live a scoffer at prudence, and die a bloated
pauper
?
But, sir, the stage presents many of the finest lessons in
favour of temperance, and in the most impressive language.
Its lessons are rendered of no avail by the frequency of
exhibiting
ebriety merely as a venial vice, and its subjects as
pardonable objects, to be laughed at merely, if not
commended
.
Whereas the dramatist who should do his duty, would
show the vice as leading to all evil, and its subject such as he
truly is, disgusting, loathsome, and a cowardly suicide.
You forget, sir, that men will not congregate to see the
disgusting and the loathsome, said Spiffard.
The merchant replied.The skilful dramatist has shown
the misery consequent upon the practice of gaming, and might
exhibit the sufferings which flow from the disgusting and
destructive
vice of which we speak; and he should contrast
them with the strength, health, cheerfulness, and power of doing
good, which are the result of temperance.
And so he has. The passages are numberless to that
effect
,
especially in Shakspeare's plays. How beautiful is the
picture of the faithful old servant in `As You Like It,' whose
temperance has given him the power to protect the oppressed
son of his deceased master!
Beautiful!but I fear that the picture of the guzzling,
bragging, lying, contemptible (yet favourite) Falstaff, is longer
remembered, and more often copied, than that of good old
Adam.
Then the lesson given by the evils Cassio experiences in
consequence of yielding to temptation. His deep sense of
his own degradation. His bitter exclamation, that he is `hurt
past all surgery.'
I remember the scene well, and have often meditated on
it; but common auditors see in Cassio's fall from duty, only a
subject for laughter; while Iago's `wine is a good creature,'
makes a more lasting impression than Cassio's disgrace and
repentance. Why cannot some dramatist show the wife
weeping
over her children the live-long night, heart-sick at the
anticipation
,
from experience, of a husband and father, returning
to his home brutalized, to insult her he had sworn to love and
cherish; to mislead those who look to him for precept and
example
.
The public would not receive the piece, said the actor.
I will not believe so meanly of the public.
Why, sir, persisted Spiffard, even a novelist would not
dare to make so low and despicable a vice the theme of his
story.
Then, resumed Littlejohn, the momentous moral
lesson
must not be given for fear of shocking the ears or eyes of
the polite? Or, perhaps the poor author might write in vain,
as no publisher could be found to
patronize
his work.
Then I think, sir, it must be because the publisher thought
it would not sell, said Spiffard.
9*
True, said the old gentleman, I believe that is the only
criterion, for I have known publishers who made the strongest
professions of religion and morality, giving to the world the
seducing scenes of `Tom Jones,' without scruple; scenes in
which obscenity is only veiled sufficiently to be made more
dangerous.
I think, sir, you can scarcely say it is veiled.
While thus conversing, an incident occurred which was a
commentary on the subject of discussion. Our pedestrians
had left at Cato's a set of revellers who were distinct from
those they had seen and moralized upon. And their
conversation
was interrupted by shouts, cracking of whips, clattering
of hoofs, and the rushing sound of wheels. Two gigs rapidly
passed them, and the same moment, while striving for the glory
of precedence, came in collision. While yet the air resounded
with riotous shouts, one of the youths who had uttered them, lay
senseless and mangled by a rock which had received him
upon the overturning of the carriage. His skull was fractured.
The reasoning faculty which had been bestowed by the
Creator
,
to preserve life, with life had fled, after having been driven
from its post by the enemy of life and reason. The
pedestrians
hastened to the spot, and found the youth dead. That
frame which a minute before was rioting in pulsation, and spurred
to madness by wine, was senseless;irretrievably
self-murdered
.
His immediate companion lay groaning at a short
distance
,
unable to rise, but reserved, perhaps, to profit by the
dreadful lesson. The hack horse had gladly stopped by the
overturned gig. The votaries of reason and temperance busied
themselves with endeavours to remedy the ills produced by the
folly they detested.
And where were the companions of the dead, the rivals in
the race?
On they went, shouting in triumph! With the recklessness
of irrational beings. On they passed, either careless of their
late associates in revelry, (for nothing hardens the heart so much
as the practice of what is called goodfellowship,) or thinking
lightly of the overturn, as of a frequent occurrence, in which
they had no part.
One of the youths was dead, the other stunned by the fall.
When assisted and led to the spot where the first lay a
mangled
corse; the full sense of his situation rushed with
returning
consciousness upon the survivor. The fumes of wine
were dissipated, he recollected the past, saw the horrors of the
present, and anticipated the scene that must ensue when the
parents should see a son brought into their presence a corpse,
who had last been seen in all the pride of opening manhood.
When the unhappy youth was thus suddenly restored to
reason
,
he uttered with a cry of agony, My brother! and fell
on the corse, senseless.
We pass over particulars. The brothers were placed in the
carriage, late so triumphantly mounted and impelled. One
brother supported the inanimate body of the other, while Mr.
Littlejohn walked by the side of the gig, and Spiffard led the
horse. They stopped at the first house on the road, and were
received with kindness, but no assistance could be rendered,
and in the same order they proceeded to town.
Our pedestrians left their charge at the house of the parents.
It was not for them to intrude, and they retired unnoticed
during
a scene of confusion and misery too profound for us to
attempt
a description of.
Late in the evening, Mr. Littlejohn and his young friend,
now united in intimacy by these chance circumstances,
separated
for their several places of rest. The rich merchant,
after
giving his card, and a hearty shake of the hand, to his
young companion, wended his way to a towering house, (at a
distance from his store-houses and compting-room,) where he
found every comfort and luxury but those of domestic society:
the poor player directed his steps to an humble dwelling, not
far from the theatre which he enriched by his talents. He
found society, but not such as was suited to him. That
portion
most immediately connected with his happiness had
undergone
a change in his eyes, and was daily deteriorating from
that alluring appearance which had caused him to become one
of the household.
CHAPTER XVI.
The Lunatic Asylum
.
There's rue for you, and here's some for me.
As the morning steals upon the night
Melting the darkness, so their rising senses
Begin to chase the ignorant fumes that mantle
Their clear reason.
Shakspeare
.
The praise of those who sleep in earth,
The pleasant memory of their worth,
The hope to meet when life is past,
Shall heal the tortured mind at last.
But ye, who for the living lost
That agony in secret bear,
Who shall with soothing words accost
The strength of your despair?
Bryant
.
One sees more devils than all hell can hold,
That is the madman.
Prithee, nuncle, tell me, whether a madman be a gentleman or
yeoman.
Shakspeare
.
The
attachment felt by the two individuals who had been
thrown together by what is called chance, at Cato's, was
increased
during their walk home, and each felt the desire to
know more of the other. They were drawn to this first
meeting
by an inscrutable succession of links, (a chain unknown to
themselves,) and although in most respects dissimilar, there
was one point which, after being brought in contact united
them; and caused a determination in both, although separated
by diverse occupations and the numerous bars that society places
between the rich and poor, to seek each other; and to
commune
freely on that subject which occupied their secret
thoughts. A subject on which they could notwould not
speak to the crowds with whom they mingled in common
worldly intercourse.
Spiffard had his feelings strongly interested in all that
concerned
Mr. Littlejohn; but particularly in the fate of his son.
The father was habitually a visiter to the asylum. He had
treasures on the sea and on the land; on every sea and every
shore; but, where his greatest treasure was, there was his
heart also; and that was in a small room surrounded by
keepers
,
and bolts, locks and bars, the maniac's shriek, the idiot's
laugh, and the unmeaning gabble of unfortunate creatures,
once rational. It was not difficult for Mr. Littlejohn to
induce
Spiffard, who cultivated the intimacy so strangely
commenced
,
to accompany him on a visit to the place where the
(not yet hopeless) wreck of his hopesthe ruins not
irretrievable
,
as he thought, of his beloved son, were deposited.
They met the amiable physician of the institution at the
door.
How is he to-day?
Perfectly composed.
They found the unfortunate man reading his bible. He
appeared
between thirty and forty years of age. He looked up,
but scarce noticed their presence, resuming his studies as if no
one had entered the apartment. His fine features were
colourless
.
His black, strait, thin hair, was smoothed on his
forehead
,
and he repeatedly passed his hand over it, from the crown
of the head nearly to the eyes, seemingly unconscious of the
action. His left hand supported his head, or occasionally
turned a leaf, as he appeared to seek a text. His tall and finely
formed frame was clothed in sables. His bright, jet-black eyes
had rested a moment on his father, and then glanced vacantly
at Spiffard. No other motion indicated his knowledge of their
presence.
They unasked, took chairs; and had been seated several
minutes, (the father's eye fixed on the son, and Spiffard
earnestly
observing both) when Mr. Littlejohn drew his chair
nearer
to the studentbut the approach was not heeded.
My son,
I do not wish to be interrupted, sir.
Is that all you have to say to your father?
By no means,
all
. But I do not wish to discuss the subject
now. I have been earnestly engaged for some time past in
this particular study; and have been examining many texts.
But although I do not feel that I owe any thing to you as a
father, I owe to myself, to you, and to society, the attentions
due from one gentleman to another.
So saying he paused and shut the book. He then fixed his
penetrating eyes on the eyes of Spiffard for a moment; after
which they wandered restlessly, and he burst forth wildly
You have brought a stranger with you to witness the havoc
that you and I have made upon one of God's creatures. Why
is it? You have caged me here like a wild-beast, and now
bring the idle or curious to see the monster. Fine sport!
Fine sport!
This gentleman, my son
I want no apologies sir.
He
is excusablelet him go
home and triumph in his own superior intellectlet him thank
Heaven that
he
is not like others.I am aware of the cause
which
did
render it expedient to restrain me by bolts, and bars,
and keepers
did?
Perhaps
does
. But I am, as I think,
capable
of judging for myself, and have determined how long that
restraint shall last. You have exerted an authority founded
upon the supposed rights of a father: I have been inquiring
into those rights and find them null, and the authority an
usurpation
.
I owe you no obedience. I renounce what is
miscalled
filial duty. You are the cause of my existing in this
world of folly and miseryI do not thank you for it.
This was said with more calm bitterness than might have
been expected from his state, or than the words indicate. He
had ceased the action of his right hand at the time that with his
left, he closed the book; and clasping both, he now rested them
on the Bible, and looked full in his father's face.
The book on which you lean, bodily, and I hope mentally,
bids you honour your father and your mother.
`That my days may be long in the land.' True. The
promised reward is earthly. All the promises to the Jews
were so. Warburton is right in that. That my days may be
long. Is that a blessing?or a curse?
That depends upon ourselves, said Spiffard, seeing that
the afflicted father remained silent.
No sir! `it is the cause my soulit is the cause'it is the
hidden cause that controls all. I sought not this existenceI
sought not any existencehere, I amandmiserable!
My son, the book on which you rest, and on which our
hopes rest, has not inspired thoughts like these. They are
suggested by that which would lead to thanklessness towards
your God, as well as undutiful thoughts of your father and your
mother.
My poor mother!
Happily she has been spared The father checked
himself
,
and the son proceeded.
I did love her. Surely not because she was my mother.
That was no more her choice than mine. I loved her because
she was good, kind, affectionateas I ought to love all my
fellow-creaturesallallallGod's creatures placed here
by his will, not their own: enjoying and sufferingallall
filled with life, and doomed to death by an unavoidable
sentence
,
passed upon them before birth. A death they must as
certainly undergo as though they had been arraigned before an
earthly judge, convicted of the most deadly crimes, and
assigned
to the tender mercies of the jailer and the hangman. They
are reprieved from day to day, only to be told by-and-by, `to
night you must surely die.' His father interrupted him.
After the free gift of life, health, enjoyment
The insane man continuedAll! yes, all! before the
moment
in which they breathe, are doomed to sickness, sorrow,
death, the grave and the worm; `to lie in cold obstruction and
to rot.'
And rise to light and life and immortality!
The death is certain; but
Hold! I command you. Your father commands you to
forbear such language, and dismiss such thoughts.
Here there was a long pause. The agitated father sat erect,
and with a flushed countenance, darted a look of authority upon
his son, who momentarily quailed under it. He lifted his arms
from the bible on which he had been leaning, and, as if
surprised
,
threw himself back in his chair, opening his large and
brilliant eyes with a confused expression; but another train of
thought and feeling soon came over his mind, and his face
assumed
an expression of irony, bordering on contempt.
Command! That's well enough said. Command! As
if one man could control the thoughts of another. Thought,
that is set in motion by circumstances unforseen and
uncontrollable
.
Words may be commanded; that it is which makes
hypocrisy so easydamnable hypocrisy! Words ought to be
controlled, so as not to injure the hearer. I will be silent if my
words offend you, but for my thoughts they are uncontrollable.
You have come hither unbidden by me; contrary to my wish
or will have you come hither and broken in upon my studies,
as, without wish or will of mine, you were an agent in bringing
me into existenoe; for both, or either, I owe you neither thanks
nor ill-will. My good will towards you is founded on my
knowledge that you are a creature like myself, with like
passions
,
like sufferings, and doomed to a like end.
And is that all, my son?
No, no, not all. We have been thrown together so
intimately
,
that the joys and sorrows of life have appeared to flow
from one to the other, sometimes; and sometimes to both from
the same source. Remembrance of the past, gives more power
to your will, than to the wishes of anotherso far, so far, and
no farther, no farther. I can see no farther, no fartherso
you have confused me, sir. I wish you would depart.
He arose to his utmost height, and frowned.
God bless you, my son. I will see you soon again.
Well, well, well; good by! Come
alone
. Good by! He
looked scowlingly on Spiffard; and as his visiters withdrew,
resumed his seat. His eyes were fixed upon the door, until it
closed after them.
Mr. Littlejohn was sometime silent as they descended the
stairs, and his companion felt no disposition to intrude upon
his thoughts. At length the afflicted father exclaimedIt is
awful to witness the aberration of intellect; but cheering to see
that reason is making advances to her throne.
It is a blessed hope. You see amendment, sir?
I do.
The worthy physician of the institution now met them, and
confirmed the father's hopes. It happened that the committee
of directors who, in turn, visited the institution, to see that the
benevolent intentions of the founders were duly carried into
effect, at this moment arrived; and the physician politely
invited
Mr. Littlejohn and his companion, to join them in their
progress through the various departments. The merchant was
but too well acquainted with every thing relative to the place;
but to Spiffard all was new, and intensely interesting.
Their first visit was paid to that part of the building which is
assigned to the most outrageous, or the most hopeless cases of
insanity. Spiffard here found a few whose deranged intellects
and enfeebled bodies were the consequences of intemperance;
and these were of course the most attractive subjects of his
curiosity. The physician told him that in the apartments
appropriated
to convalescents, more of this class were to be found;
for generally, when debarred this fatal indulgence, (the
unnatural
cause of their malady,) health and reason were restored.
How interesting! how humiliating! is the spectacle which
a mad-house presents. Our fellow-creatures, in form like
ourselves
,
deprived of the portion of man which distinguishes him
from the brute creation. The senses, those inlets of ideas to
the mind, so diseased or perverted as to give false impressions;
or the mental faculty itself so disordered, as to combine all
impressions
and recollectious erroneously. The varied forms and
degrees of the malady; its suspended operation and renewed
action; its various causes, and the varied effect of those causes;
what constitution of body, what mode of life, most tends to
produce
mental alienation: what subjects are these for inquiry!
All these and their remedies were familiar to the urbane
physician
who accompanied the visiters, and who was accosted by
the patients in a manner that proved their confidence in his
humanity
,
and reliance upon his skill. He appeared among them
as an acknowledged friend. Have we, when deprived of
reason
,
an instinct that acknowledges worth?
Yells, more dreadful than ever struck the ear of traveller in
desert or wilderness, from wolf or hyena; sounds more
heart-rending
,
because, though not resembling any thing human, they
were known to proceed from human organs; shrieks, unlike
the cries of man or woman, were heard from one of the
apartments
,
and a keeper, at the bidding of the superior, unlocked
the door. The naked wretch within ceased his yells, turned
his eyes on the intruders, then quickly averted them, and pulled
the straw on which he lay partly over his body, covering his
nakedness, as if conscious of his degraded condition.
Strange as it may appear, the physician addressed him as if
speaking to one possessed of reason, and kindly inquired,
How do you feel to-day, Burford?
Better, better, was the answer.
If you will keep your clothes on, you may come out
to-morrow
.
The spectators turned away. The door was locked and the
most heart-piercing yells succeeded instantly on turning the key.
During these paroxysms, he will neither suffer bed,
bed-clothes
,
or clothing to touch him, but rends every thing to
pieces.
Such are the changes in this unhappy young man's
disease
,
remarked Mr. Littlejohn, that a few days past I saw
and conversed with him in the visiters' parlour, quietly and
cheerfully. I found him there, well-dressed, and looking in
health; he was in attendance upon a female relative, who had
come to see him.
Were there no symptoms of derangement about him?
inquired Spiffard.
To an observer, there
were
. His attentions to the lady
were over-done. But I have seen an awkward youth, many
miles from a mad-house, behave in much the same manner.
Then, when excited by conversation, he began to talk of
purchasing
large tracts of waste lands, and laying out towns in the
wilderness; but that being the common talk of our country, I
should have thought nothing of it, if I had not heard it within
these walls. What we know to be madness here, passes
elsewhere
for common sense; and when we hear wisdom among
worldlings, we say `surely the man's mad.'
Although this gallery, and its suite of neat, airy, and
comfortable
apartments, was but too well filled with the most
ungovernable
patients of the institution, there was but one other
who appeared to be under restraint. This was a man of
middle
age, and vulgar appearance. He had the liberty of the
gallery in common with others; but his arms were secured by
a leathern belt, passed around his body, which left the hands
only a partial and circumscribed liberty. This person appeared
ashamed of the addition to his equipage, and followed the
doctor with importunities, uttered in whispers.
When you are better your arms shall be liberated. You
know that you attempted to strike your friend. You will soon
be well, and then you will go home.
I am very well, very well. But he averted his eyes from
the steadfast examination of the physician, and silently turned
away.
A few of the inmates of this hall or gallery, were silent,
dejected
,
melancholy. One was sunk into perfect idiocy, a more
hopeless state, a more humiliating spectacle to the sane, than
even the raving maniac. Generally, the patients were lively
and talkative. A genteel appearing man addressed Spiffard;
and with a manner little denoting insanity, requested him to
note the physiognomy of a person at a little distance from them.
Spiffard, who was deceived by the manner and appearance of
the lunatic, and thought him either a visiter, like himself, or
perhaps, an assistant to the physician, followed where he led.
You will say he has the finest face in the world, and a head
like an antique statue.
They stopt before a figure who stood to be gazed at, with an
unmeaning smile; and whose countenance, head, or person,
had neither expression, form, nor proportion, but of the most
ordinary description.
Behold that face; what a contour! what symmetry!
there's a head of intellectual indications! and the sprightly
lunatic placed his hand on the head of his silent brother;
treating
it as familiarly as a phrenologist does a skull or a block,
submitted to his fingers. He's an Indian to be sure, or a
half-breed, but Greece nor Rome never produced such a
forehead
:
putting back the coarse black hair of the tall, swarthy,
stupidly-passive subject. There's a face! It is more than
human! The countenance of a god, rather than of a man!
Spiffard had, befere this, perceived his mistake, and
notwithstanding
the morbid melancholy which all appearance of
intellectual
aberration caused in him, he could not but smile, as he
bowed assent, and hastened to join his companions. He soon
after saw this lively admirer of beauty showing a small japaned
tin box to the visiters, and expatiating upon the form,
brilliancy
,
and immense value of a collection of pebbles, which it
contained. Jewels of the first water.
Perhaps the most extraordinary character in this portion of
the building, was an insane man, who had been tried for
murder
,
and found guilty; but as insanity as well as murder had
been proved by the trial, he was sentenced to perpetual
confinement
,
instead of the mosaic penalty which still holds a
place in modern codes of justice. This person appeared to be
about fifty years of age, and was indulged in the whim of
wearing
his beard uncut, which floated in waves of iron-grey over
his breast. His scanty hair corresponded in hue, but was
trimmed short. His figure was athletic, of moderate height,
and his dress a grey suit of coarse texture, furnished by the
institution, well suited to his condition, but by no means
corresponding
with the oriental condition of his beard. He
appeared
to recognize the directors, and to be pleased by their
salutations. He answered some ordinary questions rationally,
but soon commenced talking with a volubility, rapidity, and
wildness, that were astonishing to Spiffard.
The wretched man we have attempted to describe, imagined
himself to be gifted with power more than human; and to be
likewise one of the crowned and anointed rulers over the earth.
He consequently appeared to delight in the destruction of life.
But, unlike his brethren of the sceptre, he made no pretence of
shedding blood for the sake of religion, peace, mercy, charity,
or even honour; he seemed content to have it thought that he
destroyed, to show his power to destroy. A murderer, he was,
like other sanctioned murderers, inclined to talk of death
inflicted
,
and atrocities committed by his orders; although he di
not pretend that his murders were perpetrated for the good of
the human race.
One of the visiting directors asked if he would be glad to see
the governor.
No. He is my enemy; and you are my enemy.
Would you know him, if he should be present?
How should I know him, when I never saw him?
Is this gentleman the governor? pointing to Spiffard.
No. How do you do, sir? shaking hands with the
comedian, without any assumption of regal dignity; or, as
appeared by his subsequent words, without having the idea of
his royal worth suggested, until that of blood had preceded it.
Do you live in New-York?
Yes.
You have but just come here. Are you mad?
Not more than most folks.
That's what most people think. I like your looks. But
you are mad. You do not know me; but I have a power
which enables me to see; a poweryou must have heard that
a man was shot at Claverick yesterday. I shot him. I killed
that man. My orders are obeyed promptlyon the instant. I
say shoot that man, and it is done. They fire when I give the
word of command, as a regiment obeys the order of its colonel.
I say it, and they are dead. When the powder-mill blew up in
Rhode-Island, and all the workmen were torn to pieces,
scattered
limb from limb, tossed in the clouds and smoke, mangled
by the beams and rafters, I did it! Talk of power! There's
the Emperor of China, and the Emperor of Russia. Talk of
holy alliance! There's an alliance more than holy. The
Emperor
of Morocco's sister is to be married to the Emperor of
Austria, and the Autocrat of all the Russias, whose present
wife, you know, is sister to the Grand Turkbut the pope will
absolve Prince Metternich, and then
His bald, disjointed talk, became each moment more
incoherent
;
but occasionally reverted to his own destructive
power, and his delight in human misery; always connecting
these with his kingly condition, which, very naturally,
sanctioned
his desires. He was, in fancy, an Emperor; and
doubtless
,
as such, an appointed scourge of the human race. Yet
his imperial majesty very submissively filled the station of
scullion in the kitchen of the hospital; and while his
will
dealt
destruction as a king or an autocrat, his hands very
mechanically
washed dishes.
After an examination of the comforts which enlightened
benevolence bestows upon the afflicted, the visiters were
conducted
to an open place, or enclosure, where, the day being
fine, the convalescent or tractable patients, took exercise.
Some were amusing themselves, or basking in the rays of the
sun. Some walking or lounging under a long shed, or covered
way, erected for their accommodation. They had all dined,
for the insane dine at mid-day, the reasoning and refined
at night.
A young gentleman was walking under the shed, and intently
engaged with a book. One of the directors asked, What
are you reading?
Freneau's poems. There is much good in them.
Poor Phillip! He is almost forgotten, like some other of
our literary pioneers, said the director.
Sir, he deserves better of Americans, was the reply.
This patient entered freely into conversation, in a connected,
but rather hurried manner. He appeared cheerful, inquiring
after friends in the city, but did not appear to regret his
confinement
,
though he indirectly alluded to it. The director, to
whom he spoke to as a friend, he was well acquainted with,
asking him if he was not coming to town.
No.
Mrs. Tourberville and her daughters often inquire after
you.
Do they live in Pearl-street still?
In the same place. One of the daughters is lately married.
Which? He was told, smiled, and resumed his reading
and walking, as one content with his condition.
Several of the patients importuned the physician for
permission
to go home; assuring him that they were perfectly well.
He, with great address and amenity, evaded their requests, and
they gave up the point, seemingly impressed with the idea of
complete restraint upon their will. One man very sportively
invited each person who approached him to play at tossing
coppers or cents.
Come doctor! head or tail? I want to win some silver.
What do you want with silver?
To buy cigars.
There are none to be bought here.
I'll toss, heads or tails for a box, and send to town for
them. Here goes! I cry head, no, tail. I've won, I've won!
You must win if you take both sides.
Ha! ha! ha! well said. But I'm staunch for Jefferson!
No Jay's treaty for me.
The doctor told Spiffard that electioneering and drinking, so
fatally common at the houses in which the polls were held, had
brought this person to the state in which he saw him. This
touched our hero's sympathetic string, and he eagerly inquired
into his case, and the probabilities of cure.
He is recovering; and if he refrains from ardent spirits
after his return home, as he is obliged to do here, he will be
again a sane and useful citizen. They left him shouting,
Jefferson forever! Ten to one on our candidate.
Returned to the house, they passed through several
galleries
,
looked in upon the convenient and airy sleeping
apartments
,
and visited a room where there was a small library.
At a table several of the inmates were reading. One was
writing. His letter he willingly exhibited, requesting that it
might be put in the post office. It was filled with offers to
purchase vast tracts of soil, and addressed to a well known
land-speculator, who had rested upon a very small territory in
the church-yard some years before. This patient had lost
both fortune and reason in schemes, which still with delusive
hope bewildered him.
Without the aid of alcohol? asked Spiffard.
Yes. Cupiditythe inordinate desire to possess, is
sufficient
of itself to turn the brainand the madness is
incurable
.
Among these patients, Spiffard recognised a man of the
name of Knox, whose insanity had been produced by extreme
intemperance. He was subject to outbreakings even here,
although debarred from alcohol in any shape. He was at this
time calm and appeared well; indeed much better than when
he was at liberty, and engaged at the theatre, (for he was an
English actor,) where he was seldom free from the tyranny of
the appetite he served. His great desire was to obtain his
discharge. This is the same person of whom it is recorded
in Cooke's memoirs, that being as usual imperfect in his part,
and playing Gloster to Cooke's Lear, when he uttered the
words Ye gods, give Gloster his discharge; the old
tragedian
said in an under tone, wait till Saturday, and the
manager
will give you your discharge, you black-guard. He was
discharged; and Cooke in pity for a time supported him.
Their last visit was to the gallery, and to its adjoining
apartments
,
appropriated to the female patients. As they
approached
,
a confused, but not discordant, sound of many voices was
heard. Loud but cheerful and silver tones, mingled with
playful laughter. As the attendant opened the door of the
gallery while the inmates, (owing to their own merriment,)
were unconscious of the approach of intruders, several of the
ladies were surprised in the midst of their unrestrained,
infantile
playfulness. The mask was off. For the insane carry
the social mask even into the madhouse.
One ladyfor such her dress and manners spoke herwas
sitting on the floor, as if at a game of romps with her
companions
who stood laughing near. On the entrance of the
visiters
,
she jumped upsmiledblushedand as though
ashamed of being caught romping, ran into a side apartment:
she soon however returned, and addressing Littlejohn by the
appellation of Grand-papa, asked him to take a walk with
her, at the same time placing her arm within his. Before he
could answer, one of her companions cried Fy, fy! Mary
Ann, and the playful challenger looking at the doctor, who
shook his head, withdrew her white and slender arm, laughed,
and again vanished.
One of these apartments was devoted to female occupation
of a graver kind; reading and needle-work; and several well
dressed women were happily employed, patients and their
attendants
,
in orderly work and cheerful conversation.
On the return of the visiters from this quiet scene, some
objects presented themselves that were more or less
distressing
to their feelings. A very pretty, delicately formed and
tastefully dressed lady, who had been conversing with one of
the visiting committee, approached gracefully to Spiffard, and
accosted him.
I am told sir, that you are the celebrated actor, Mr.
Spiffard
.
Spiffard is my name, madam.
You don't look like an actor.
How so, madam?
I hardly know. I thought you were old.
Actors assume all agestake all shapes.
So do all men. But you look very serious as well as
very young. I declare I should almost think you had been
crying, and that I saw tears still in your eyes.
Such had been and was the fact, although unobserved by
Spiffard's sane companions. He smiled and said, I am
a poor actor, madam.
Don't say so: I have heard of you. Do you think I
should make a figure on the stage?
A most interesting one.
Pshaw! I don't mean sobut you men are ever ready
to flatter. But I do think I could play Ophelia. `There's
rue for you'O, no! not for youfor you, naughty man,
and she turned playfully to the doctor. You are the king,
you know.
But not a murderer.
I don't know that. Then addressing Spiffard again she
added Ophelia must be played by a singer and I can sing,
and with wild and sweet expression, and a voice such as Mrs.
Merry possessed, she sung
He is dead and gone, lady,
He is dead and gone;
At his head a grass-green turf,
At his heels a stone.
But I won't sing if it makes you sad. I thought actors were
always merry.
Spiffard turned away to hide his emotion; and the physician
led the songstress off, whispering in her ear, You see it makes
him weep.
Their inspection of this noble building terminated with a
view from the roof, which presented one of the most
magnificent
panoramic pictures the eye of man is ever permitted to
behold. Cheerful, thriving villages, fields rich in culture, roads
thronged with carriages, cities, and their glittering pinacles,
only
divided from each other by the waters and ships that enriched
them. The greater of these cities, like the proud mistress of
the east, projects a garden, (unpolluted by the crimes of a
seraglic
,)
into her own Bosphorus and Marmora; and receives in
her golden horn, the flags and the wealth of every land and
sea, while she smiles on a Galata and Pera, where the same
laws and interests prevail among the same free and happy
people
.
From these sublime prospects, our friends descended,
to be reminded of what immediately surrounded them, and of
their own personal and physical wants.
By invitation, Mr. Littlejohn and his companion partook of
the dinner provided for the visiting committee. Spiffard
remarked
that the philanthropic physician had, previous to taking
his place at the board, employed himself in persuading a
gentleman
,
who paced up and down the hall, to join the company.
He succeeded in placing the melancholy man at the table, and
induced him to eat, and even to take one glass of wine; for
wine was not banished from the temperate board of the asylum;
neither was it ever abused.
This person, who now attracted Spiffard's special attention,
was a patient whose malady permitted that he should have the
freedom of the house and garden. After dinner, Spiffard learned
that this gentleman's insanity is what is called a religious
madness
!
He had been a merchantbecame a preacherand
finally, under the oppression of bodily disease, came to the
maniacal conclusion, that he was selected from all mankind to
suffer a state of hopeless reprobation; that no redemption
availed, nor repentance could save him.
While talking with his informant, the unhappy gentleman
approached, and Spiffard had an opportunity of hearing him on
the subject of his misery.
You are better, Mr. Treffil, for joining us, and taking a
glass of wine.
Yes; for an instant. But the sense of my condition
returns
with redoubled force the next moment.
Sir, instead of avoiding cheerful company, you must seek
it. You are labouring under a mistake; and when restored to
bodily health, you will be convinced of the falacy of these
tormenting
phantasies.
The sufferer shook his head. It is vain for me to tell you
of the communications I have had with the world of spirits. I
know you cannot conceive of them, or believe me. My doom
is fixed irretrievably.
God is good beyond our conception, and infinitely
merciful
.
I know what you would say; I have, myself, talked thus
to others. To others the words may apply. I have heard
reasons for my condemnation that are incontrovertible. My
sins are unpardonable. I know that there is
no hope
for me.
I have heard it proclaimed to all the worlds of the universe. I
have been transported from planet to planet bodily. I know
that you do not believe it. From star to star, through the
immensity of space, filled with. What I have seen and
heard, I am forbid to tell.
Before Spiffard and his friend left the asylum, the latter
paid another visit to his son. He went unaccompanied. On
his re-appearance, Spiffard asked, How did you find him
sir?
In tears. He seemed to be conscious that his former
reception
of me had been harsh. He took my hand, and
tenderly
pressed it at my departure, begging me to see him soon.
As the evening approached, our pedestrians, notwithstanding
kind invitations to ride, returned as they came, on foot; musing
and conversing on the scenes they had witnessed, this being
to Spiffard, a most instructive day.
VOL. I. 10
CHAPTER XVII.
The result of intemperance, and a sick chamber
.
Show not thy valiantness in wine, for wine hath destroyed many.
Ecclesiasticus
.
Is man no more than this?
They are as sick that surfeit with too much, as they that slave with
nothing.
Shakspeare
.
Honour a physician with the honours due unto him, for the uses which
ye may have of him.
Ecclesiasticus
.
`
Bardolph
.Why, sir, for my part, I say the gentleman had drunk
himself
out of his five sentences.'
`
Slender
.I'll ne'er be drunk whilst I live again, but in honest, civil,
godly company.'
Shakspeare
.
A wise sentence shall be rejected when it comes out of a fool's mouth,
for he will not speak it in due season.
Ecclesiasticus
.
I would rather have a fool to make me merry, than experience to make
me sad.
Our remedies oft in ourselves do lie.
Cease to lament for that thou canst not help;
And study help for that which thou lamentest.
Shakspeare
.
We
will now return to George Frederick Cooke. Among
the many who have placed themselves aloft, as beacons on the
hill-top, to warn mankind of the evils that threaten them; or who
serve as buoys, to mark the hidden rocks and sands, where the
gallant argosei of life, (freighted with youth and health, and all
the ingredients of happiness, and onward borne, her bellying
sails filled with the gales of hope,) must sink if not avoided:
among these warnings, buoys, and beacons, few have been
more conspicuous than this highly-gifted man.
While Spiffard and Littlejohn pursued their walk from
Cato's, as we have seen, Cooke, under the care of one of the
younger revellers, who was either more prudent or more
hardheaded
than his companions, returned to town in a hack coach,
which had been in attendance on the party. The young man,
who although but too conversant with scenes of dissipation, had
never been confined with such a companion, was occasionally
amused by his extravagance, shocked at his profane vulgarity,
and puzzled by his loud demands to be set down, and orders
to the coachman to stop.
It seemed as if every vile image or word which had been
presented to the eye or ear of the unhappy man during a long
life, (a life partly passed among the licentious and frequently
among the vilest of the vile) were called into existence and
action by the demon who possessed him. The young man
tired out by insolent repetitions, finally thought of governing
by force, or at least threats. He had fallen on the remedy.
For the tragic hero was never so far lost as to forget what was
due to self-preservation when danger appeared. He could
distinguish real from mock threatenings; and although he
braved, as in the recent duel, the one, he shrunk from the
other upon instinct.
Tedious the ride to the young man, ere they arrived at the
Tontine Coffee House: but arrive they did, and found
Trustworthy
Davenport ready to receive the man he faithfully
served
,
and even deigned to call master. Cooke, who had been for
some time in a quiescent state, was roused by the stopping of
the carriage and the ceasing of the rumbling noise which
seemed to soothe him. He now vociferated his orders to the
coachman to drive on, as loudly as he before commanded him
to stop. His young companion gladly made his escape,
resigning
his charge to Trusty, who, presenting himself at the
coach-door, solicited his patron to take his arm and alight.
Coachman! Drive on! Stand out of the way and shut
the door, you thrice three times elongated yankee son of a
puritan
praise-god-bare-bones! Coachman! Drive on!
This coachman says he can go no further, but I'll find a
carriage for you in a jiffy, or I'll be swampt. Where shall I
order your carrier to go?
To church, sirr! To church!
Jist git out of
this
coach, sir, and I'll see that you go,
where you ought to gowhere you want to goI meanso,
sir, softly!
The yankee traveller needed not to have changed his
phraseology, for his patron was incapable of making nice
distinctions
.
He made an effort to leave the carriage, but fell
headlong into the grasp of his long-limbed valet, who in less
than five minutes deposited him in the easy-chair by his bed
side.
Nature, abused, and struggling against the abuse,
notwithstanding
uncommon physical powers, at length gave way. A
helpless, senseless mass, the admired of thousands, was
deposited
in that bed where he could only awake to regrets for the
past, loathings of the present, and dread of the future.
Before morning, Davenport, who slumbered in the chair by
the bedside, was awakened by the groans of the tortured man.
He found him almost suffocated. By changing his position
he saved him from immediate death, and then hastened for one
of his physicians. The nearest of the many who gladly
endeavoured
to prolong the life of this infatuated man, was
doctor
McLean; and happily he was brought in time to afford
relief.
Such was the termination of the excesses at Cato'sor
rather
of that series of excesses, which had been rising from
stage to stage, until the fabric which supported them broke
down. With some constitutions this termination is a hopeless
state of despair, madness and death. With Cooke it brought
on severe pains, difficulty of breathing, which if relieved by
blood-letting, left him a miserable penitent as long as
weakness
and sickness continuedand no longer.
The symptoms which at this time marked his disease were
the same that ultimately in a more aggravated form, preceded
immediate dissolution. Two of the best physicians of the
city attended him; and although restored to comparative ease,
he was confined to his bed for several days.
During this state of pain and sober reflection, he was
attended
by Spiffard with the assiduity of an affectionate son.
Occasionally
he brought Mr. Littlejohn with him, at that
gentleman's
request, and when the tragedian was sufficiently
recovered
to converse, both his guests were delighted with his
stores of anecdote, sketches of character, and sallies of
humour
.
One day that Cooke and Spiffard were alone, the old man
expressed his desire to know by what train of extraordinary
circumstances his young yankee friend had become a member
and a distinguished member of the profession to which he
had devoted his own extraordinary powers.
You are the strangest young man that ever I met with
young
man?young or old, you are unlike any thing that
ever fell in my way. You tell me that you are a yankee from
Vermont, yet you are a finished English actor, fit for Drury or
Covent Garden. You are a very young man, yet you attach
yourself to an old worn out fellow like me: you are a tea-sot
and a water-drinker, yet you delight in the company of a
veteran
knownproclaimedshameless
votary of the bottle!
Why is this? Come tell me what induced you to try the
profession
you have chosenhow you obtained your knowledge
and skill in it, and how you have escaped the vices that hang
about it.
Spiffard recounted his story, omitting some circumstances
with which we have made the reader acquainted, and dwelling
upon many theatrical adventures and characters with anecdotes
more interesting to an actor than to any other person. He
gave his reasons for embarking in an English ship for Quebec
rather than the direct route and better sailors to New-York.
He had no inducement to be in that city until late in the
theatrical
season, as such suited the manager's arrangements, and
the desire to visit the British provinces whose history is so
intimately
connected with that of his own country, caused him
gladly
to seize the opportunity. Besides that, he wished to linger on
the shores of Lake Champlain, and visit the Green Mountain
spot where his father had flourished, decayed and died.
I will not recount, he said, the events of a passage across
the Atlantic, though I might speak of clouds and winds, and
dolphins, and whales, and the hopes and fears in meeting
another
storm-tossed bundle of planks and ropes on the ocean, and
all the other pretty occurrences, from the common-place book,
which occupy so many pages of modern prose namby pamby.
Three times the number of days were wasted on the voyage
that are sufficient to waft one of our passenger-packet-ships
from Liverpool to this port. We escaped the hazards of the
gulf, and in November were gladdened by the sight of the
stupendous
banks of the St. Lawrence, that majestic stream
pouring
the waters of so many inland seas into the fathomless ocean.
As we approached Quebec and I saw the towering battlements
of the upper town and castle, bristling with cannon, tier above
tier, overhanging the houses and shipping which lay dim and
dark in the shades of evening, while the sun yet played on the
glittering spires and waving colours floating over them, I felt
repaid for all the tedious hours I had passed on the weary
weary sea. As I gazed, the eventful struggles of the bravo
men who fought and fell on this once important spot, rushed
upon my mind with a pleasing soul-elevating melancholy.
Early the next morning I landed, and found my way to the
plains of Abraham. I sat on the stone which pillowed the head
of the dying conqueror. I stood on the spot where one
master-spirit
decided the fate of the western world. I thought of Wolfe
and the glorious day of his triumph and death. That day
which broke the power of despotic France in the west,
overthrew
at a blow her mighty plans of empire, and secured to the
sons of English republicans the immense region from the
Atlantic
to the Pacific oceans,from the north pole to the
tableland
of Mexicoa region destined for the propagation of
innumerable
free states, bound together by the same institutions,
the same languages, the same interestsand a religious
freedom
,
as dear as allwhich rejects the dogmas of any usurping
hierarchy.
As the young man spoke, his tone had become elevated, his
cheeks were flushed, his eyes sparkled, and Cooke, who had
raised himself in his bed, could scarcely believe that it was the
low comedian who talked of states and empires in terms so
lofty, and so little suited to his usual style. Spiffard observed
the veteran's surprise, and said, I have ever been an
enthusiastic
admirer of the institutions of my country, Mr. Cooke, and
feel the attachment of a grateful heart to your native land, from
which they are partly derived. I am proud that my forefathers
sprung from England, that I can claim part with Englishmen in
the glories of Shakspeare and Milton, Locke, Bacon, Newton,
Hampden, Sydney, Pym, and Vane, and hundreds more, whose
minds have enlighted the world, and continue, to this day, to
roll off the clouds with which tyranny and superstition would
envelope us. I am proud that my ancestors were among the
puritans of New-England, who abandoned their lovely country,
that they might be free to live as republicans, and worship their
Creator as their consciences dictated; and I am happy that my
grandfather served with Shirley at Louisburg, and bled with
Wolfe on the plains of Abraham, by the side of gallant
Englishmen
,
in opposition to those powers who then, and now, would
enslave the souls and bodies of mankind.
I see you are a thorough Yankee; and I suppose as you
travel this way from Quebec, you will treat me to a dissertation
on Saratoga and Bunker hill.
No. The sympathetic chord that made Englishmen and
Americans
one
, was severed before the seventeenth of June,
seventeen hundred and seventy-five; and you are an
Englishman
.
Cooke looked up with his peculiar side-long glance, and
said, Thank you, thank you! Do you know that I have been
thinking, while you were speaking, that if your head, by any
chance, had been raised twelve inches higher, it might have
been a head of eminence, and looked down on little men with
the frown, or the condescension, of a heroa leader of senates
or armiesat least on the stage.
This touched a string in our hero's composition, which totally
changed, not alone the current of his ideas, but the very nature
of them.
Yes, sir, he replied, (with that simplicity which rendered
him so remarkable, and so obnoxious to be played upon by
those of inferior intellect or acquirement.) Yes, sir, I have
thought that my face might, with the aid of histrionic art,
represent
a mimic hero, however unfit I may be to lead real senates
or armies. My features are as boldly marked as John
Kembles
;
my nose as prominent; my eye as capable of expressing
passion. I have as great power over my countenance. I have
studied the dramatic authors as assiduously, though not for so
long a time as he has. But because, according to certain arbitrary
rules, it is found that my face is too long for the height of my
person, it is concluded that I cannot rise to the pitch of tragic
dignity required for the stage, or give effect to the precepts or
pathos of the poet.
Did you ever try?
Yes.
What was the result; how did the audience receive you?
The fools laughed.
Well, well, never mind; punish them as you have done
ever since, by making them laugh whenever you show your
tragic
phiz on the stage; leave strutting, roaring, and scowling to
me and black Jack.
So saying, the old man laid his head on his pillow with a
good-humoured laugh, in which Spiffard could not but join,
though at his own expense.
I had got no further in the story of my homeward travel
Spiffard recommenced, and might probably have given a
tolerably
correct picture of Canadian manners, customs, costumes,
rivalries, jealousies, and contrasts; and the conflicting interests
of a conquered province, where ignorance and superstition is
cherished as the precious reserved rights of the conquered; but
at this moment his rival traveller and actor, Trustworthy
Davenport
,
ushered Dr. Hosack into the apartment.
After the first salutations, the physician inquired if
Cadwallader
,
McLean, or Francis, his coadjutors in the task of
repairing the injuries nature had received, had visited the
patient, and then remarked that he looked better.
I always feel better, Doctor, when this tea-sot, this
water-drinker
,
is with me; but I am puzzled to know what he can
find attractive in the bed-side conversation of an old worn-out
winebibber like me.
His admiration of your talents as an actor, is sufficient to
account for Mr. Spiffard preferring your company to that of
men of less experience and knowledge.
No, no, that's not it. He has seen Sarah, and Black Jack,
and all the rest of them. No, I will tell you what I suspect.
He is studying the effect of wine on the human constitution;
and when he sees me snug under the sod, he will give lectures
on temperance, making old Cooke the foundation on which to
establish his theory, and build his fortune. But I'll cheat the
water-drinker by out-living him. I'll play Shylock at ninety,
as Macklin did.
May you live to ninety, and I live to see it! But what says
the doctor to the question of wine or water?
Pooh, pooh, what signifies what he
says
. Look at his face,
and then turn to the mirror and look at your own pale visage.
There's a complexion where madeiraalways meaning in
moderationsparkles
Let me see your tongue.
That's by way of stopping its motion. As much as to say,
`hold your tongue.' But a tongue is not a member to be looked
at, but listened to.
Yet to the physician, even its appearance can tell tales.
There, that will do. Mr. Spiffard, I must prohibit my patient
from further exertion, or even attention to the conversation of
his friends to-day. His tongue speaks of fever. Let me feel
your pulse, sir. That will do. Let me place my handso,
sir. Are your ankles swelled?
The doctor proceeded with his examination. Cooke was
silent, but appeared less concerned than either Spiffard or
Davenport
;
for the last-mentioned of our actors stood anxiously
listening and looking on, evidently taking great interest in the
fate of the patient.
The symptoms are decided. There is water in the
abdomen
.
Cooke turned his head away, and cast a look from the
corners
of his eyes on the physician, at the same time holding his
face close to the pillow, and repeated the word water, in a
tone of surprise.
Yes, sir, said the doctor, and was going on seriously to
prescribe certain remedies, when all gravity was set at defiance
by the patient exclaimingHow should water find its way
there? No, no, doctor, never risk your reputation by telling
the world that you found water in the stomach of George
Frederick
Cooke! What say you, you long-visaged, lank-sided
yankee philosopher? Did ever water approach these premises
since they were in your keeping?
Davenport, thus addressed, and finding the eyes of the
company
turned upon him, answered with a drawling tone, and
great deliberationIf I might venture to propound an opinion
upon sich a deep and profound subject
As my stomach! Both deep and profound, ha? I have
sometimes thought it had a double profundity. Well, Mr.
wise man of the east, go onyour opinion?
I have a notion, (without pretending to give an opinion;) I
have a notion that that critter man, is a compound of the
elements
of arth, air, fire, and water; and
that
, for one thing,
makes him sich a contrarious animal; and for another thing, it
makes it necessary for his bodily health, that all these elements
should be replenished as fast as they evaporate, or are
exhausted
.
Now, if I may be permitted
Go onpropoundthou learned Theban.
If a man denies admittance to water through the proper
and natural door, by which it brings health and strength, it will
find another inlet, and then it causes diseases and weakness:
and in Mr. Cooke's case, it being always refused entrance
above, it has taken advantage of the warm bath ordered for his
feet, and has crept up through his toes.
He has hit it, Doctor. The philosopher has found the
cause. The disease has outwitted the physician. Most learned
Doctor Davenport, see who knocks.
I prohibit any more company this day. Mr. Cooke is not
well enough to see any of his friends until to-morrow.
Spiffard
followed Trustworthy; and the doctor enjoining quiet for
his excited patient, soon after left him to the care of the faithful,
eccentric philosopher.
10*
CHAPTER XVIII.
A little mystery, and an old acquaintance
.
Of what incalculable influence, then, for good, or for evil, upon the
dearest
interests of society, must be the estimate entertained for the character of
this great body of teachers, and the consequent respectability of the
individuals
who compose it.
Verplanck
.
You have often begun to tell me what I am, but stop'd,
And left me to a bootless inquisition.
Is there no pity sitting in the clouds,
That sees into the bottom of my grief.
It is the show and seal of nature's truth,
Where love's strong passion is impressed in youth.
Shakspeare
.
Whose power hath a true consent,
With planet, or with element.
Milton
.
truth shall nurse her,
Holy and heavenly thoughts still counsel her.
my mother you wot well,
My hazards still have been your solace.
If that thy father live, let him repent.
Lepidus is high-coloured. They have made him drink.
Faster than spring-time showers, comes thought on thought.
Shakspeare
.
I WILL introduce my reader to another sick chamber of a
very different aspect from the last. Indeed, a greater contrast
to the commodious apartments and assiduous attendants which
surrounded and administered to George Frederick Cooke,
could not well be imagined, than the mean and scantily
furnished
hovel-like house of Mrs. Johnson, and the feeble
assistance
which could be rendered to her, (suffering and sick as
she was,) by her only permanent attendant, a poor little
negress. True, she had the occasional consolation of her son's
presence, and that of Emma Portland: the consolation of
duteous affection, sympathy, charity, and love. When those
occupations which enabled him to procure the scanty sum
necessary for his mother's support, would permit, she had the
attendance of the best of sons. But his days were passed in
laborious preparation for his mother's future welfare, and even
his nights were devoted to gaining the pittance required by their
necessitous condition for present support; especially since a
chronic disease had rendered his beloved parent incapable of
those exertions which once had made their situation
comfortable
,
and enabled her to give him the education of an enlightened,
efficient citizen. She had frequently another attendant, (as
noticed above,) whose sex made her more competent to know,
and more skilful to perform, the offices which the sick require.
Emma devoted to Mrs. Johnson as much of her time as she
could; but she was wanted at home to assist her aunt and
cousin; and abroad, by others who were sick and poor.
Mrs. Johnson had one attendant in common with Mr. Cooke.
Of the many physicians who exerted their skill for him, one
had been led to the house of poverty, and administered that
relief which his professional skill and benevolent disposition,
enabled him to give. Emma Portland had a tie stronger
than pity and charity, or even sympathy toward a person so
like herself in disposition, and so like her lost mother in
sentiments
,
accomplishments, knowledge, and resignation to the will
ofheaven. Emma had become acquainted with Henry
Johnson
before his mother's illness, when she, by her industry, aided
by strict economy, had supported her little establishment, while
her son was obtaining that knowledge in a merchant's
counting-house
,
which might lead to a competency for her future
comfort.
This young couple, (for they were already united in the
purest bonds of affection) had become acquainted in a manner
and in a place, of all others, most likely to create a pure union
of hearts, because the employment which brought them in the
presence of each other evinced the congeniality of their
dispositions
and the kindred feelings of well regulated minds. They
were both teachers in the same sunday school: both employed
in the diffusion of knowledge to those whose condition in life
rendered it most difficult of attainment: both endeavouring to
rescue from vice those most exposed to become its victims
the children of the ignorant and vicious. Sunday was the only
day that Henry Johnson was free from the labours of the
counting house; and until his mother's illness required his
presence in attendance on her, he had devoted it to the
instruction
of those whose avocations or situations prevented or
prohibited other modes or opportunities of acquiring
knowledge
.
The form, the face, the general appearance of Emma
Portland, were sufficient to attract the admiration of Henry;
but he was captivated by her demeanor while bestowing
instruction
on the little ones around her; who soon learned to
look upon her as a friend, and to love the lessons she bestowed,
for the love they bore their beautiful and kind instructress.
Some of the same causes operated to produce the same
effects in the breast of Emma Portland. She observed the
punctuality with which Henry attended to his voluntary duties,
and the patience he exhibited in performing them. His manly
form and expressive face might have passed unnoticed; but
his suavity of manners, his devoted attention to the welfare of
those who were entrusted him, attracted her attention and
gained her approbation. They had occasion to commune in
this their benevolent employment. They mutually made
inquiries
respecting each other. The interchange of civility and
words led to the interchange of esteem, and finally of love.
The situation of Emma, with her aunt and cousin, was by no
means agreeable to Henry, and it was not until he knew
the refined and just sentiments, and had learned the
history
of the lovely orphan, that he suffered love to lead his
hopes on to the anticipation of happiness with such a partner.
Love, with minds well regulated and accustomed to
self-control
,
is not that blind and irresistible passion which poets and
novelists have described. Once convinced of the worth of the
object of his admiration, the youth felt resolved to remove her
from her present situation, and doubted not that his resources
were equal to the task. Before sickness had reduced his
mother
to the helpless state in which we now find her, Henry had
communicated his views of future domestic happiness, and had
obtained her approbation of his choice: those views were at
present obscured; but youth can see beyond the clouds.
They were no common clouds that enveloped the Johnsons.
Loss of health had caused the gradual approach of that
extreme
penury which threatened to render the remnant of this
unfortunate lady's days peculiarly cheerless. The little shop
she had attended to, and in part supplied with needle-worked
articles for sale by her own industry and ingenuity, had
dwindled away, had been closed, and its remaining stock sold
at auction. Henry had discharged all debts, paid the rent of
the house they had occupied, and removed, with his parent, to
the hovel they took refuge in, there to meet the winter's storms
and hide from the cold looks of worldlings. All the poor
were not yet thrust into the suburbs of the city or the adjoining
villages, and this mean habitation was in the way of Emma
Portland in her walks of duty, she seldom passed the house of
Mrs. Johnson without paying the tribute of affection to
suffering
merit. She seldom saw Henry there; and, indeed, his
absence
sometimes appeared to her mysterious. We need not
say that the attentions of Emma to the invalid increased the
attachment of the son, and caused the mother to place her
hopes of that son's future happiness on the prospect of his
union with a creature of such rare virtues.
It was noon on SundayHenry, who at this period, passed
that day in attendance upon his mother, had been reading to
her in the family bible. He had ceased, and a few minutes of
silence had elapsed. He turned to the leaf on which is usually
recorded those important events in domestic history, the
marriage
of the father and mother, and the day and hour on which
it took place: this, in most cases, is happily followed by the
dates of the birth of each child. Henry looked, as he had
often before done, mournfully upon this leaf in his mother's
bible. It was mutilated. The top of the leaf on which the
date of the marriage of his father and mother had been, as it
would appear, written in the accustomed manner, had been cut
off. There was no record on the leaf, save of the birth of a
son on the 16th of June, 1791, baptized in
blank
church, (the
name of the church carefully erased,) Manchester, by the
name of Henry.
Mother, it is long since you promised me, that, in due
time, you would tell me who and what my father was. You
know that I look often at every part of this book; but, since I
first could read, this leaf has fixed my attention more than any
other. I know your worth too well to entertain a thought to
your disadvantage; but it sometimes occurs painfully to my
mind, that only some act committed by my father, either
disgraceful
or criminal, could induce you to permit me to arrive
at man's estate ignorant of even the name of one of the authors
of my being. Relieve my mind from this impression, and say,
at least, that my father's name is not dishonoured in his native
country.
I am sorry that you recur to this subject, Henry.
It grieves me to cause you sorrow; but, believe me, dear
mother, if you should be taken from me, and leave me in this
incertitude, I would not rest until I had searched the records of
every church in Manchester, with this leaf in my hand; if by
no other means this mystery could be cleared and my curiosity
satisfied. I pain you, madam, but forgive me. For your
sake I have deferred pressing this question, although it is
seldom
absent from my thoughtsfor your sake I would still
defer itbut another is now interested in it. Emma Portland
is entitled to ask, and should know, that the father of the man
she looks forward to honour, was not one whose name shall
hereafter cause a blush on that face which was never suffused
with the livery of shame. If your strength does not suffice to
enter into a full explanation of the meaning of this mutilated
leaf in the sacred volume, at least say that my father's name is
not a reproach and a by-word in his native land.
Henry, I cannot now enter into a painful storybut I
repeat
my promiseyou shall know alleven if I should die
this dayyou will know all.
And my father's name is not pronounced, (when he is
spoken of) with epithets of contumely attached to it?
On the contraryin terms of admiration.
And yetyou are in a foreign landand his son is
ignorant
of that name. Mother! you are as pure as the mind of
man can imagine, or the heart of a son can desire. You have
bred me in the love of truth, and abhorrence of mysteryand
yet
And yetmy son, I cannot willingly pronounce the name
of your father. ForbearI entreat youyou cannot long
remain
in ignorance. It is my wish to inform you of every
circumstance
before my death, and that must be in a few weeks
perhaps daysI am illgive me that glass of water
quick
With affright and contrition her son obeyed her. And
while tenderly supporting his parent's head and in broken
accents
asking her forgiveness, Emma, who with the little black
girl had been at St. Paul's chapel, entered and flew to his
assistance
.
In such hands the fainting woman soon revived. With
such a nurse sickness and sorrow were soothed to serenity.
The mother banished the recollections of former woe, and
blessing the virtuous pair who revived her hopes of happiness
in an earthly futurity, though not for herself, she sunk sobbing
on her pillow, her overcharged heart relieved by a shower of
salutary tears.
Such was the scene at the bedside of the poor unknown.
We have seen what was passing by the sick-bed of the rich,
the famous, the idolized George Frederick Cookemore of
both, anon. We will return to Zebediah Spiffard.
About this time the comedian's recollections of Boston
were revived by an accidental meeting with a person whose
conduct had materially affected the course of those events
which we have recorded, and of course those yet to follow in
our story. The chain of the past, the present, and the future,
is never broken.
As Spiffard passed through Nassau-street, he was accosted
by a man who came at the moment from a public house,
notorious
as the resort of those who, like Bardolph, carry faces
that might be mistaken for my landlady's red petticoat. This
person stopping directly in the footway, cried, sure it is
Mr. Spiffard!
That is my name, sir.
Why, Zeb, have you forgotten your old master?
The truth flashed upon Spiffard, and with it a pang shot to
his hearta pang only to be accounted for by the
circumstances
of his childhood, the last scenes in his father's house,
his present doubts and fears, and the peculiar susceptibility of
his character, on the subject of the species of moral degradation
which he at once perceived written on the countenance of this
unhappy man. He gasped for breath as he exclaimed, Mr.
Treadwell!
Ay! I am very glad to see you my boy! Come income
in, and he turned to the door he had just left. Come in
I have been inquiring for you, and was going to see you
come inyou can help meyou can give me the information
I want.
He led him, though reluctant, first into the bar room of the
tavern, and then into a private apartment. He loathed the
sight and smell of the place, but he could not refuse to follow
one who revived recollections of a happy period of his youth,
and who he had once been accustomed to respect and obey.
He was urged on likewise by the feeling of shame at being
seen in the street with a man whose appearance denoted the
effect both of past and present excess.
In despite of Spiffard's remonstrances Treadwell ordered
brandy; and talking with rapidity soon made known the cause
of his journey to New-York. He displayed his own turpitude
with an assurance which nothing but his present excitement,
and a belief in the laxity of morals attached to the profession
his quondam pupil had chosen, could account for.
Mrs. Tomlinson, a favourite actress, had been engaged
for the New-York theatre, after a separation from her
husband
,
an event which had taken place in Boston, and Spiffard
now learned that his former legal instructor, although married
and the father of a family, had been the cause of the divorce.
With the recklessness which the progress in guilt naturally
induces
,
he had come on to effect a re-union with the
unhappy
woman, by inducing her to return to the place of his
residence. She had, however, formed another attachment in
New-York, and, hearing of Treadwell's arrival, secreted
herself
from his pursuit.
Little doubting but that Spiffard could give him the desired
information, he concluded his communication withyou
will tell me where she is to be found.
I do not know, sir.
My dear fellow, that is impossible. She is of too much
importance in the theatrical world to allow me to believe that.
You may as well tell me, for I will know. Thomson, to
whom I gave her letters when she left Boston, shuns meand
I suspectbut I have come here to see her, and I will see
her.
I know nothing of her, except as I have seen her on the
stage; and her character is such that I wish no nearer
acquaintance
.
That's too good! Your wife does not associate with her?
Certainly not, sir.
That's very well! very well, indeed! When all the world
knows how her character stood before
Stop, sir!
Mrs. Spiffard, or Mrs. Trowbridge
Stop, sir! and Spiffard's eyes flashed fire, his face was
flushed, and his limbs were braced to the tension of the tiger's,
before he springs on his prey. Stop, sir, one word spoken
disrespectfully of my wife, will be resented on the instant.
Contrary to my wishes, you have told me your own infamy,
and that of the person you seek; yet you have dared to ask
me if she is the companion of my wife. I despise your
insinuations
,
but I will not suffer them to be repeated.
Why, why, why, my dear fellow, why do you fly out in this
manner? We all knowthat iscome, come, take some
brandy and water.
Mr. Treadwell, you have already taken too much. If you
had not deprived yourself of the sense of shame, as well as the
power of reasoning, you would not have exposed yourself and
the unhappy woman, who, perhaps, but for you, would have
been a respectable wife and mother. I must leave you, sir.
What? Why, Zeb? Don't you ask your old friend to
come and see you? What! cut me!
I am obliged to believe your own account of yourself.
When I heard your story from others, I tried to disbelieve it.
Our acquaintance ends here.
Spiffard did not listen to his reply, but left the house abruptly.
He left the house, but another arrow had entered his inmost
soul, his heart's heart, and was borne away with him. The
words he had heard in the Park, when we first met him; the
mystery which hung over some passages of the life of one
whose fame and welfare he had rashly united to his own; the
consciousness of precipitancy in contracting an engagement
for life, so vitally important to his peace; all rushed upon his
tortured mind as he left the tavern; and the unhappy
Treadwell's
looks, as well as the inuendos he had given, continued
to haunt him with horrid recollections. He passed through the
bar-room to gain the street. When on the pavement, he heard
from within a shout of laughter from those who surrounded the
bar; and his imagination pictured a crowd of bloated fiends,
sitting in the clouds, and rejoicing at his misery.
Treadwell sought to drown the voice of conscience, and the
sense of humiliation, on the spot. A few words will terminate
his story. While unsuccessfully seeking the woman for whom
he had deserted his home, and whose infamy he was
proclaiming
by the search, her husband arrived in New-York, on his
way from south to east, and hearing of Treadwell's presence,
and avowed object, he sought him, and in a public place
inflicted
the chastisement of the most contumacious words,
accompanied
by blows. The wretch returned to his native place; he
had no home; he died neglected by all but the wife he had
deserted.
The unfortunate husband whose domestic peace had been
invaded, his wife, and the friend of the seducer, who
appropriated
the guilty consignment to his own use, all perished
early and miserably. Such things have been; and, perhaps,
if mankind knew that their deeds of evil would not be covered
by the veil of charity, but proclaimed for the truth's sake, many
might be checked in the downward course, and brought to
real repentance; which is amendment.
CHAPTER XIX.
A dinner parly in
1811.
Your reasons at dinner have been sharp and sententious; pleasant
without scurrility, witty without affectation, audacious without impudence,
learned without opinion, and strange without heresy.
Some sports are painful; but their labour,
Delight in them sets off.
The rich wine first must rise in these fair cheeks, my lord, then we shall
have them talk us to silence.
Shakspeare
When a rich man hath fallen, he hath many helpers; he speaketh
things not to be spoken, and yet men justify him. The poor man slipped,
and yet they rebuked him too; he spake wisely, and could have no place.
Ecclesiasticus
.
Time is the old justice that examines all such offenders; and let Time
try.
Shakspeare
.
Experience, though none authorite
Were in this worlde, is ryght ynowe for me.
Chaucer
.
Time
rolled on, or flew, or crept, or limped, according to the
circumstances or the feelings of his children; those children
who murder him, and whom he, though murdered, never dying,
devours.
Winter had arrived, and the many-coloured leaves of autumn
had been scattered to the winds, or fallen to the earth, as a
covering for the roots from which they had derived their
summer
nourishment; the long protracted rain-storms of
November
had given place to the freezing blasts of the north-west,
before George Frederick Cooke had so far recovered, as to be
permitted by his physicians to resume his place at the festive
boards of his numerous admirers.
Doctor Cadwallader, (who had attended the old tragedian,
in conjunction with Doctors Hosack, McLean, and Francis,)
had long promised his friends the pleasure of dining with the
eccentric thespian; accordingly, having stipulated that the
bottle should be under the control of two medical attendants,
a day was fixed when Cooke was to be the lion of the party;
and exhibited in the evening, to the female acquaintance of Mrs.
Cadwallader, and as many of the
elite
of the city as the
drawing-rooms
might accommodate.
Spiffard was invited to the dinner and tea party in due form;
for he had become acquainted with all Cooke's physicians, from
the circumstance of being found so frequently at the bed-side
of their histrionic patient. As we have said, Cooke was
attended
by no less than four of the faculty, of the highest grade; but
Cadwallader took the lead as the senior, although Hosack,
McLean, and Francis were all consulted: all separately visited
the invalid at times, and sometimes altogether.
The young comedian declined the invitation. He had
determined
not to make one in parties from which his wife was
excluded. Mrs. Spiffard was one of the acknowledged heroines
of the stage at this time, but as utterly shut out from female
society as if she had been infected with the most deadly
contagion
.
Spiffard had thought little of this before marriage; it
was one of the after-thoughts that tormented him.
Actresses have never been received into society, in this
country, on a footing of equality. Some are visited, sought
after, and invited into the circles of the rich and fashionable,
when they have recently arrived from Europe, under particular
circumstances; but even then, they are rather considered as
objects to gaze at, and show off, than as persons belonging to
the class who pay them these attentions. This class consider
themselves as patrons. The patronized are generally superior,
both in talents and accomplishments, to their patronizing
entertainers
;
yet are they never considered as other than inferior
to those who show them off, and pride themselves upon their
liberality in so doing.
It is in vain to deny, or endeavour to conceal from the actress,
that the very circumstance of publicly exhibiting for hire, that
person, and those talents, so admired and applauded, has
degraded
her in the eyes of the world. Be it just or unjust,
so it
is;
and, perhaps, so it ought to be.
That this is unjust, in some instances, is certain. We have
known ladies of superior talents and education, who have
made the stage their profession, under the immediate
guardianship
of their parents, that they might retrieve the fortunes of
their fathers, and support the younger branches of their family
in a necessary course of education. The tribute to these ladies
from justice, ought to be reverential respect and praise.
The knowledge we all have of the character of an audience at
a theatrethe mingled character, in which so much of the baser
material preponderatesthe conviction that the plaudits of a play
house are sought with avidityalmost valued as the supreme
good by many, and boasted of by the individuals, as I got
three roundsthe pit rose to me. The certainty that the
actress must come in contact with (and the world knows not
how intimately) those of the same profession of both sexes
known to be impure, although of equal or superior talent to
herselfon the same stagebehind those mysterious curtains
and scenesin those dark recesses, of which the secluded
matron
,
or even the dashing woman of fashion, knows no more
than she does of the world beyond the gravethe knowledge
of these circumstances, and the considerations and impressions
flowing from this knowledgeall these
items
ever did, and still
do, make the world pause and hesitate and feel shy and queer,
when required to associate with an actress, however much it
may admire the skill or talents of the individual.
Spiffard had not thought of all this before his marriage. As
a boy, in Boston, he only saw the stage to admire; in
England
,
he had only seen the bright side of the picture which the
drama exhibits. He was pure himself, and void of suspicion
in a degree that exposed him to ridicule. He knew nothing of
the higher class of English society, except as represented in
books, and he knew that actresses were admitted amongst the
nobles of the land, and even united in marriage with them.
Now that he was married to an actress of talents, he was at
first surprised to find, that his wife was considered of an
inferior
caste by those who applauded
her;
and that, although
they invited
him
to their parties, his domestic partner was not
thought of as his and their companion. He had made other
discoveries not less inimical to his peace; and although he had
no wish to lead Mrs. Spiffard into the drawing-room of Doctor
Cadwallader, or any other magnate of the city, he felt that
where his wife was doomed to linger, he ought to remain; and
that, content or not, he must rest
with
her. They were united
for better for worse. It was worse than he expectedit will
happen so sometimeshe hoped to make it better. He had
chosen, and chose to abide by his choice.
Such was the ground Spiffard took in respect to receiving
the invitations of those who admired his talents and those of
his wifeinvited
him
and neglected
her
. He therefore accepted
no invitations. But in the present instance, Cooke prevailed
upon him to go with
him
, as his protector from himself. The
physicians urged him to comply. The tragedian at length
refused
to go without him, calling him his mentor, his guardian,
and promising to be guided by him. The water-drinker was
persuaded to waive all objections (the objections, as may be
supposed, were neither stated nor discussed), and finally to
yield.
The party at the dinner-table was large. The physicians
of the theatrical lion made a part. Mr. Littlejohn and his
friend Governor Tompkins sat near Spiffard and Cooke.
Opposite
to them was a gentleman Spiffard had never seen
before
:
a man far past the meridian of life, tall, above the usual
height of Americans (and that exceeds the European standard):
this height was reduced, however, by a habit of courteous
bowing
.
His face remarkable for symmetry; his complexion fair,
but rather ruddy; and his full blue eyes were half closed with
smiles while attending to the words of every speaker. The
dinner was good, ample, and served with taste. When I speak
of a good dinner, I mean such as might have been thought
good in England fifty years ago, before gastronomy was a
science
,
or cooks,
artistes
. The wine was good, and of every
choice kind. The host was a man who knew how to welcome
his guests and make them at home, by freeing them from
superfluous
attentions. The ladies of the family, Mrs.
Cadwallader
and daughters, with a favoured few, graced the table, and
according to the custom of those days, soon withdrew after
the dessert, taking with them several other nymphs related to
them, called Temperance, Sobriety, Moderation, and
sometimes
Decency.
Cooke, who was, to use a green-room phrase, the great
pan of the dairy, had great attention paid to him, and it was
evident that much was expected from him; but nothing came.
He was courteous, reserved, not quite silent, but very cautious.
When challenged to a glass of wine, he touched the brim or
sipped. The master of the feast observed his caution, and
deferred
any attempt to draw him out for the present. Spiffard,
who had been introduced to Governor Tompkins by his friend
Littlejohn, was by far the most of a star: for he shone upon
every topic which he touched in the course of conversation,
without any of the affectation of the theatre, or the forwardness
of the traveller; and displayed a knowledge of subjects so
foreign
to what is generally considered the train of study a
comedian
would pursue, that he excited the admiration and fixed
the attention of all who were in his vicinity.
A subject happened to be started which gave Mr. Littlejohn
an opportunity of entertaining those near him, and especially
Spiffard, by detailing circumstances connected with a scene
dear to every American of right feeling. It is one of the
privileges
of age to be sometimes interesting, merely as witnesses
of by-gone events, if a habit of observation has charadterized
the youth of the witness, and a love of truth accompanies the
decline of life.
A difference respecting the date existed between governor
Tompkins and the remarkably handsome tall gentleman who
sat opposite to him. Few men, for beauty or courtesy, could
compete with the governor; but his present opponent, though
older, was more dignified in appearance, and would in most
eyes pass for the handsomer man. The general, for that was
the title by which he was accosted, was a more fashionably
dressed man than the governor, or perhaps any person present;
his fine formed face showed little mark of age, except about
the eyes and brows, and the brilliancy of his florid complexion
the smoothness of his skin, as well as demeanor, turned away
all suspicion, which times' powder-puff or crows-feet might
have excited. As we have said, he was tall above the average,
of even American height, and might be said to be a very
handsome
as well as very well dressed gentleman.
Such were the courteous disputants.
Mr. Littlejohn, I dare say, can tell us, said the governor.
His knowledge, said the referree, is at all times at the
service of the man of the people's choice.
We were at a loss for the date (that is, the day, for no one
can forget the year) of a very important transaction; no less
than that which put a seal to the federal union and the
constitution
of the United States.
The doctor's library would resolve that question, but to
save trouble I will be your authority. It was the thirtieth day
of April, 1789. I believe you, governor, are too young to have
been present, but the general might have witnessed the scene.
Littlejohn looked at the general with an expression which
Spiffard noticed, but which was mysterious, and at the time, to
him, inexplicable.
I was in France at the time, said the general.
Were you present at the ceremony? asked Spiffard with
enthusiasm, addressing the merchant.
I was, and assisted, in the capacity of grenadier; standing
in front of the building erected on the site of the old provincial
town-house, for the accommodation of Congress, and which
was called Federal Hall after the adoption of the
constitution
.
My dear sir, said Cadwallader, whose attention was
attracted
by the subject, as well as by reverence for the speaker,
as the building you mention has been long swept from the
face of the earth, and the place where Washington pledged
himself to support that constitution his wisdom aided in
forming
,
has been devoted to the children of mammon, and to the
strife between cupidity and tax-gathering, your description of
a place, the memory of which is hallowed in my mind, would
be very interesting to us men of these utilitarian days.
And a description of the ceremony, said Governor
Tompkins
;
for though I was old enough to have seen it, I was at
Westchester, probably playing the idler at the time, for I was
on a visit to my father, and glad to escape from my master's
office, and the study of Coke upon Littleton.
Federal Hall, as well as the building which gave place to
it, projected into Wall-street where Broad-street terminates,
on the one side, and Nassau on the other. A covered way
accommodated foot-passengers; over it was a balcony, the
pediment surmounting which was supported by massive
pillars
,
swelling fancifully in the centre, rather according with the
architect's whim than with any known order.
Who was the architect, sir? asked the general.
Major L'Enfant.
Aha! a Frenchman. How infinitely are Americans
indebted
to France. She stepped forward in the cause of
freedom
,
and with unexampled liberality sent her fleets and armies
to rescue America from oppression.
When I hear of the liberality of Louis the Sixteenth's
government
in the cause of liberty, and of the debt we owe to
France for seizing a favourable opportunity to cripple the
power of England, I can only express my dissent by one word
a very expressive old English word, though not perhaps
classical.
What is that, Mr. Littlejohn? asked the governor.
Fudge!
Ha! ha! But we must not lose Federal Hall and the
first presidential inauguration. You have described the
pediment
and its pillars or columns.
These pillars divided the open space within which the
inauguration
took place into three parts, making a picture to
those in front of the building, like Raphael's apostles at the
beautiful gate of the temple. As Broad-street terminated at
this spot, forming an open space, the persons on the balcony
were in full view of the populace. The volunteer companies
of militia, in full uniform, paraded in front of the Hall, on
Wall-street
.
Some troops of horse, well mounted and equipped,
two companies of grenadiers that might have pleased old
Frederick
,
the one filled by the tallest youth of the city, the other
composed of Germans; many of them men who had found
means to remain, as citizens and freemen, among the people
their masters had sent them to reduce to the condition of
slaves. These, with a company in the garb and military
equipment
of Scotch Highlanders, were drawn in line with several
bodies of artillery and infantry. My good friends, Generals
Morgan Lewis, and Jacob Morton, were both active officers
on the glorious day, and could give you many interesting
details
which may have escaped me, a private, and confined to the
ranks. Both houses of Congress being assembled, they, with
foreign ambassadors and other distinguished persons, filled the
balcony and the space behind it. From this elevation, the view
of Broad-street was of one living mass, a silent and expectant
mass; with faces upturned, they gazed upon the man of their
hearts as he walked from the interior of the building, and took
his place in the centre of the balcony, between two pillars
which bounded the compartment, and formed the principal
group of this great historic picture.
Mr. Spiffard, said Cadwallader, precious as youth is,
one would almost consent to be old, to have seen such a
day!
Not only almost, but quite, sir! replied Spiffard.
Cooke listened without appearing to attend. The handsome
general bowed, saying, You have an excellent memory, Mr.
Littlejohn. It is a great blessing.
That depends upon circumstances, sir, was the reply,
accompanied
by a glance such as he seemed to keep in store for
the general. It is sometimes convenient to forgetand
memory may be a curse.
Cadwallader appeared to notice the look and the reply,
although
the general's face gave no symptoms of any movement
within; and the doctor adroitly said, It was indeed a great
historic picture! You can, perhaps, not only remember the
persons present, the figures of the price, but their situation on
the canvas.
As though it were yesterday.
Pray give us the picture, said the doctor.
In a painting, costume is essential to truth; and if I paint,
truth shall be my first object.
Cooke observed in a whisper, Then you will be the first
historian (writer or painter) that ever paid her ladyship such a
compliment.
The merchant proceeded. The president elect made his
appearance, that day, in a plain suit of brown cloth; coat,
waistcoat
,
and breeches; the dress was homespun
home-manufactured
,
even to the buttons; which my old friend Rollinson, the
engraver, takes pride in saying, displayed the arms of the
United States, chased by his graver. White silk stockings
showed the contour of a manly leg; and his shoes, according
to the fashion of the time, were ornamented with buckles. His
head was uncovered, and his hair dressed and powdered; for
such was the universal custom of the day. Thus was his tall,
fine figure presented to our view, at the moment which forms
an epoch in the history of nations. John Adams, a shorter
figure, in a similarly plain dress, but with the (even then)
old-fashioned
Massachusetts wig, stood at Washington's right
hand; and opposite to the president elect stood Chancellor
Livingston, in a full suit of black, ready to administer the
prescribed
oath of office. Between them was placed Mr. Otis,
the clerk of the senate, a small man, bearing the bible on a
cushion. In the back-ground of this picture, and in the right
and left compartments formed by the pillars, stood the warriors
and sages of the revolution. The men who forgot self for the
sake of their country.
O, for a painter! cried Spiffard.
Go on with the accessories to your picture, said the
doctor.
The man on whom all eyes were fixed, and on whom all
hearts rested, stretched forth his hand with that simplicity
and dignity which characterized all his actions, and placed it
on the open book. The oath of office was read. The bible
was raised, and he bowed his head upon it. The chancellor
announced that `
it was done
'that George Washington was
the President of the United States of America. The silence
of thousands was at an end; and the air was rent with
acclamations
,
bursting simultaneously from the hearts and tongues
of men who felt that the happiness of themselves and their
posterity
was secured.
[2]
[2]
This is the description of an eye-witness of the scene.
Thank you, sir, said the doctor.
O, what a contrast is this simple picture, to the impious
mockery and insulting pageantry which attends the coronations
VOL. I. 11
of European potentates, was the exclamation of the
Vermonter
.
Those imposing ceremonies, sanctioned by religion, and
made sacred by time, have their effect, remarked the general.
Imposing ceremonies! Yes, they have their effect on
those who are kept in ignorance by impostors. Then turning
from the general (who bowed, but could not smile) to Spiffard,
the merchant continued. My young friend, every American
must feel proud when contemplating the simplicity and
wisdom
of our institutions.
Will they not last forever?
Forever is a long day, whispered Cooke.
That is a question not for us to answer. It is certain that
they will be imitated, and as certain that they will be looked
upon with jealousy and enmitymisrepresented and plotted
against by those who will be interested to destroy them, and
perpetuate their own power.
Doctor Cadwallader seeing that many of his guests were
evidently disappointed in not finding the entertainment they
expected from the eccentricities of George Frederick, and
concluding that it was only when the wine was in, that the
humour
would come out, addressed the tragedian in a tone, and
with the intent, to attract the attention of the company. I
have had my professional and guardian glances unceasingly
directed to you, my patient, knowing how long you have
suffered
from your late illness, and I perceive that you are more
afraid of madeira than I think necessary.
Doctor, said Cooke, with a glance from the corner of his
eyes over his shoulder, I need not tell a man of your
experience
,
that `a burnt child dreads the fire.' I believe I shall
for the future follow the example of this venerable gentleman
at my elbow, Mr. Spiffard, who has, like myself, in early life
drank so freely of wine, that now, to qualify it, he takes nothing
but water.
But, as you have not yet attained his venerable age, or
had either opportunity or inclination to injure yourself in that
way, I advise, as your physician, that the water-drinking be
put off until to-morrow.
`To-morrow, and to-morrow, and to-morrow.'
So, here's a bumper toast. The first cultivator of the vine.
I prescribe a bumper of madeira to you, and one of Manhattan
water to your venerable neighbourunless he returns to his
former ways, and takes wine for the remainder of the day
come, fill! Here's to the memory of the first cultivator of the
vine, and inventor of the exhilarating liquor pressed from its
fruit.
Every glass was filled with madeira, except that of the
water-drinker. Every one repeated the toast literally, except
Cooke, who added the name of Bacchus, as the inventor of
the liquor he loved.
Another bumper for Mr. Cooke, as a punishment for
altering
the toast, cried out one of the company who had not been
so cautious in his libations during the feast.
I submit to the punishment. I have generally found it
easier to receive than to pay. I am bound to take what my
physician prescribes. And having drank a second bumper,
he added, This is better than any prescription I have
swallowed
of your ordering of late, my dear doctor. Call you this
punishment?
I think, sir, said Spiffard, addressing Cadwallader, that
Mr. Cooke ought to be enjoined to take a tumbler of the
medicine
Doctor Davenport prescribed when called in at the late
consultation.
That would be punishment.
And you deserve it for robbing the inventor of wine of his
due, and giving it to another.
What, sirr, what! Would you transfer the worship from
Bacchus to any other hero or divinity? Who, sirr, who?
Who but the jolly god invented this heart-cheerer?
Cassio says, the devil.
False reading; he called the invisible spirit of wine by
that namenot this visible and beautiful creature, nor its
creator
.
Besides, sirr, that was when his head ached.
But, sir, I appeal to Doctor Cadwallader. Who did you
mean, sir, by the first cultivator of the vine and inventor of the
wine-press?
Noah, to be sure.
What, old Captain Noah? said Cooke.
Surely.
Then, Mr. Cooke, said the governor, I fill your glass
again, and drink with you to Captain Noah.
With all my heart. I will do him all the justice in my
power, and endeavour to make up for my unintentional
disrespect
.
`O, thou invisible spirit of wine!' slyly whispered
Spiffard
.
I do not wonder, Cooke continued, that the old
gentleman
exerted his wits to invent wine after being so long
water-drenched
.
A good rule should work both ways. `Mix water
with your wine,' says the philosopher; if the rule is good, then
it is good to mix wine with your water.
Good, good!
Most assuredly I am not an admirer of that word `mix;'
but these grave and learned doctors, who are `my very worthy
and approved good masters,' say (and I doubt them not, though
I cannot account for the fact) that I have too much water in
my system. What, then, is the remedy? Captain Noah's, to
be sure. Wine! generous wine!
The visible wine and the invisible spirit of wine, had
produced
very visible effect; and but for the interference of the
young Mentor at his elbow, the convalescent tragedian would
have soon shown symptoms of his old complaint. Spiffard,
assisted by one of the physicians, contrived to substitute a
decanter
of wine-and-water for that of wine which was at his
side, and by filling for his friend, kept him in that moderate
state of excitement which merely exhibited him to advantage.
A few songs were introduced; and in this part of the
entertainment
Spiffard amply contributed; for his knowledge of
music, and stores of the best songs of every description, made
him an invaluable guest at any musical or convivial party, and
rendered it easy for him to prescribe his own course, and
persevere
in it, in respect to his water-drinking. `Nor numbers,
nor examples, with him wrought to swerve' from his resolves.
The conversation turned naturally upon actors and acting.
Cooke's remarks on his contemporaries of the stage, were
always
liberalwhen he was himself. He gave Kemble all the
praise he deserved, although it was evident that he placed him
far below Mrs. Siddons, in the scale of histrionic excellence.
Garrick and Henderson he had only seen, but never played
with. He professed to aim at the one in Richard, and the other
in Falstaff. In Sir Archy and Sir Pertinax, he remembered
their author, old Macklin; but he played them even better.
When descanting on the merits of others, he undesignedly
impressed
upon his hearers a conviction of his own pre-eminent
talents in his profession.
Surely actors should avoid the appearance of slighting those
who preceded them. The fame of an actor only lives in the
praise of those who follow him. He leaves no impress of
himself
,
but as he is imitated by others. We are apt to bestow our
admiration on those who strut their hour on the stage before
us, and doubt the testimony of writers who have recorded the
merits of their contemporaries. This was not a failing of
Cooke's. Happily this day was one of his brightest. He
exerted
himself to please, and was successful.
CHAPTER XX.
Conversation and coffeePoliteness and harmony
.
Black spirits and white, blue spirits and gray,
Mingle, mingle, mingle; ye who mingle may.
It is certain that either wise bearing, or ignorant carriage; is caught as
men take diseases, of one another: therefore let men take care of their
company.
Let me see wherein
My tongue hath wronged him: if it do him right,
Then hath he wronged himself; if he be free,
Why then, my taxing like a wild goose flies,
Unclaimed by any man.
How blest are we that are not simple men!
Yet nature might have made me as these are,
Therefore I will not disdain.
Their own hard dealings teaches them to suspect
The thoughts of others.
Of government the properties to unfold
Would seem in me to affect speech and discourse.
* * * * The nature of our peopleour city's institutions
You are pregnant in.
Sour-eyed disdain and discord shall bestrew
The union of your bed with weeds so loathly
That you shall hate it both.
Who can come in and say that I mean her,
When such as she is, such is her neighbour.
My face is visor-like, unchanging.
Shakspeare
.
The
company removed early from the dinner-table and the
wine, exchanging the fumes of the cigar for those of the
fragrant
berry, the exhilarations of the decanter and the song for
those of the tea-pot and the music of female conversation.
The handsome general left the dining-room before the
company
broke up, and was not found in the drawing room. This
gentleman had not been introduced to Spiffard; and although
he most courteously addressed the young man with smiles and
a manner intended to be condescendingly encouraging, the
water-drinker shrunk from him with a sensation approaching
to something between dread and loathing. He answered his
questions politely, but with great brevity, and withdrew his
eyes from the fine features and mild glances as soon as his
unwilling reply to the superficial remark would in decency
permit. Yet, by a strange anomaly of feeling, he looked for
this man in the drawing-room, and seemed to be relieved when
he discovered his absence. Cooke was
here
really the lion of
the evening. He was fully alive to the pleasures of society,
and in that happy state of confidence and self-possession, which
prompted to eccentric sallies, and enabled him to meet on
equal ground the opposition of those who did not choose to
submit
to his occasional dogmatism. The water-drinker was
always
the same, when not assailed on his weak side: and he
was at this time in unusual spirits. His musical powers and his
conversation had produced their full effect, and he was pleased
to see that the man, in whom he took so great interest, had
escaped unscathed from the dangers of his recent situation.
Doctor Cadwallader, one of the oldest and most popular
physicians of the city, well known and highly esteemed in every
literary as well as fashionable circle, had issued invitations
very generally for this evening, and Mrs. Cadwallader had
done the same; consequently the suite of apartments were filled
by the young of both sexes, companions or admirers of the
young ladies, and with professional men of every description,
some of whom were expressly invited for the purpose of
meeting
the famous tragedian: the females of the doctor's family
alone formed a brilliant circle; but, in addition, the rooms were
almost crowded by belles and their mamas, who wished to see
Richard and Sir Pertinax surrounded by a dramatis person of
every-day life.
Cooke went through the forms of introduction with all the
easy ceremony of the old school, and by the suavity of his
manners, softness of his voice, good humoured smiles, and
occasional archness, won the hearts of the old ladies, and the
admiration of the young.
I never will believe, whispered Mrs. Temple in the ear
of Mrs. Cadwallader, I never will believe that such a
pleasant
old gentleman can be guilty of the acts which have been
attributed to him.
My dear, said the elegant Mrs. Cadwallader, these
men are strange deceitful creatures. Even
our
husbands are
not always the same amiable pieces of perfection they once
were, or as we wish them to be.
Mrs. Temple's husband seldom came home sober, and
never in tolerable humour unless fortune had favoured him at
the pharoah or brag table.
Cooke was at this moment examining a miniature picture (by
the accomplished and amiable Malbone) that Miss
Cadwallader
had asked his opinion of. He immediately saw that it
was the portrait of the lovely girl herself.
My dear young lady, I can only say that it is extremely
beautiful and extremely like. I must confess my ignorance
of all that relates to this delightful art. Likeness I can see.
I peer at those soft eyes and almost imagine that through the
long lashes they are peeping at meI look at these swelling
ruby lips and think they are breathing odours, and just opening
to accost mebut when I turn to the original, I spy a thousand
faults in the copy.
What are they, Mr. Cooke?
I cannot perceive the laugh that lurks between the
eyelids
,
and about the dimpling cheeks or curling lipsthere
nowit is less and less like. I cannot find the rows of pearl
that should be hereor the blush that spreads and deepens
every momenttruly the artist's colours have no life in them!
What do you think, madam? addressing Mrs. Cadwallader,
who then joined them.
You do the artist injustice, and flatter Louisa at his
expense
.
Nay, mama, I think Mr. Cooke is a very good judge of
painting, said the laughing Louisa.
If my friend Pope were here, said Cooke, he could
talk learnedly on painting, as he is not only actor but painter,
and in this same style. He would point out the merits and
demerits of this very beautiful portraitfor such I can see
that it isalthough I can see that nature possesses many more
beauties than art has portrayed. He could descant on colour
and keeping, on tint and touch, and tell you why this eye does
not sparkle like that, and he archly turned his own up to the
laughing eyes of the lovely girlbut I have no skill in these
thingsI can paint no face but my own, and burnt cork and
brick-dust are the principal colours I require.
But, Mr. Cooke, said Mrs. Temple, is not every actor
necessarily a painter? Is he not obliged to conceive an image
of the figure, costume, expression, of the character he wishes
to represent, and to make his own appearance conform
thereto?
He ought to do all this, madam, and he ought to
understand
grouping, that himself and those acting with him may
present true and graceful pictures to the spectators; but he is
generally content to leave the first to the wardrobe-keeper or
tailor, and the last to the stage-manager or prompter.
I feel confident, said Dr. Hosack, who with Cadwallader
joined the group, that you, and your friends Cooper and
Kemble, do not trust for stage grouping, or dressing, to the
prompter or the tailor.
Why Tom and black Jack are generalissimoes: they
command
by virtue of proprietorship.
And you, said Mrs. Cadwallader, by talent. When
you call up the image of Richard, Iago, Falstaff, or Sir
Pertinax
,
you see in imagination a countenance and costume
conforming
to the character, in the same manner that the painter
who wishes to represent on his canvass a madonna or a saint.
I understand you, madam; so far the actor is a painter.
Both must be imaginative; or steal, as both do, from those
who went before them. But the actor must paint, as the savage
does, on his proper person.
Or as we do, said Louisa, when preparing for a party
or ball.
No, no: your care is, only, that grace and beauty may
have fair play; and nature appear in her true loveliness,
accompanied
by art, not disguised by it. But the actor must
be himself the mere board on which to daub the character he
is to exhibita walking piece of paste-board or bundle of
rags. He bears his own work about with him on his own
person, and is exposed, with it, to be hissed, or hooted, or
pelted
,
by the congregated mob of a playhouse.
Or to see the effects of his skill, said Cadwallader,
reflected
in the eyes of beauty, and hear the enthusiastic plaudits
of the thousands attracted by his celebrity.
Spiffard was in another part of the room with Littlejohn;
well pleased that his aged friend could give him the characters
of the various individuals who were grouped in the apartments
or occasionally entering. Mr. Littlejohn did not appear averse
to playing the part of Asmodeus for the gratification of his
young acquaintance.
Who is that tall and heavy moulded stupid looking man,
who is gazing around him with an inquiring and sinister eye,
and an air of vulgar confidence?
Bless me, said Asmodeus, what brings him here? He
has mistaken the doctor's house for a political tavern-hall, or
this congregated assembly for a ward meeting. He is out of
place here.
Nature has been bountiful to him in bulk.
And extremely parsimonious in every intellectual quality,
except cunning; but the deficiency is supplied by dollars and
cents;brawn, cunning, and impudence, qualify him as a
brawler at an election, or an intriguer in the lobbies of the
legislature
;
consequently he is a man of no small influence. Aha!
I see now what has brought him here. He has found the
governor
and has taken him aside.
Has he influence with him?
Yes. Because he can serve him: and our democratic
governor knows, that in our democratic government the work
of the ruler must be performed by tools of forms as various as
their worth.
Do you not apply the term democracy and democratic
government incorrectly?
In my opinion, said the merchant, a democratic
government
is one in which the people rule, whether by elected
representatives or in their own persons. In the latter case it
may be, and has been, an odious tyranny; in the former it is
the perfection of government by law. Both are, in my
acceptation
of the term, democracies; because the people govern,
and there are no hereditary rulers, and no privileged class.
When I speak of democrat, I mean one who opposes all
usurpations upon the people's rights, and submits himself to
the laws.
Ha! exclaimed Spiffard, there is our friend the manager.
Who is that with him?
That, said Littlejohn, is, in my opinion, the best painter
in the United States.
You forget Stuart, sir,
Every man has his taste: I like that young man's
pictures
better than Stuart's.
You do not tell us his name.
Sully. Did you never hear Mr. Cooper, your manager,
speak of him.
Not that I remember. They appear intimate.
Did the manager never mention any particulars of the
painter's life?
No, sir.
That is because he must have been the hero of his own
tale. Sir, one of the first acts of his management was to exert
his influence and advance funds to bring forward the young
painter by an opportunity of exerting his talents.
11*
Bravo! But, sir, when you speak of our best painters,
you forget that we have West, Copley, Trumbull.
West and Copley have abandoned us, and Trumbull has
been many years a resident of London. If I had thought of
the beautiful pictures painted by him, which I saw in this city
ten or twelve years ago, representing, in small historical
painting
,
some scenes of our revolution, I should not have placed
any one before him.
There is another American, said Spiffard, now painting
in London, that, I think, excels them all.
Indeed! Who?
Allston.
And when I visited Philadelphia, I saw the works of a
boyI think his name was Lesliewho, in scenes of delicate
humour, promises to stand unrivalled.
This conversation was interrupted, very much to Spiffard's
surprise, by the approach of Mrs. Cadwallader, Mrs. Temple,
and four or five young ladies, with as many laughing girls,
whose sparkling eyes were fixed on the comedian.
Mr. Spiffard, said the matron, your friend Cooke has
assured these girls, and given us all assurance, (for we are
equally interested,) that you will favour us with a specimen of
your skill on the harpsichord, and some of your songs. I have
been appointed to make the request.
What he has promised, I will endeavour to perform,
madam. His assurance of my will is correct, and of that he is
a judge; of my skill, I disclaim his judgment. He cannot tell
the difference between a street-ballad-bawler and a Billington
or Mara. You shall judge of the worth of his commendation,
by the precipitate retreat he will make as soon as he hears the
sound of the instrument.
So saying, the young actor, attended by the group of females,
and by his friend Littlejohn, moved towards the harpsichord.
Cooke walked into the adjoining apartment, which was farthest
from the common door of entrance for the company. The
instrument
at which Spiffard prepared to place himself, was
opposite
to this door, and his back, of course, turned to it; but
unfortunately, he cast his eyes upon a mirror, suspended over
the harpsichord, and saw an apparition which deprived him of
the power of motion, as though he had been transformed to a
statue of marble. The chord was struck which shook his
reason
.
His eyes were fixed ou the mirror; his face was
colourless
;
his hands fell upon the keys of the instrument, which
emitted a discordant sound, and his pale lips were opened as
he gasped for breath. The gay party who surrounded him,
stood a moment, as if petrified: their eyes followed his to the
mirror, and they instantly turned them to the door; there the
cause of his strange conduct was in some measure accounted
for, by what they saw.
The remarkably tall, well dressed, and handsome gentleman,
who had been placed opposite Spiffard at the dinner-table, and
who had been addressed as general, but whose name he had
not heard, entered the room with a female hanging on his arm,
whose rich and splendid attire, tall, slender figure, as well as
the wild expression of her countenance, were sufficient to
attract a stranger's attention, but not to account for the young
man's extraordinary emotion.
The general advanced, bowing courteously, with the same
unchangeable face, that seemed, at table, to defy scrutiny, and
only express a desire to please. His companion saluted Mrs.
Cadwallader, who received her as if taken by surprise. The
younger ladies withdrew, and the general's consort, quitting his
arm, followed them.
The attention of those who were near the musician was again
attracted to him by the exclamation of My mother! and by
his falling senseless on the floor.
Here was confusion worse confounded. Doctor
Cadwallader
,
who was advancing to meet the newly arrived guests,
had his attention called to Spiffard, and, with Mr. Littlejohn,
ran to his assistance. Cooke, as we have seen, had retired to
the next room.
Spiffard having recovered sufficiently, was led by the
gentlemen
into a private apartment; but the doctor was called away
by a messenger from his wife, and left the young man with the
merchant.
After a few words interchanged between Mrs. Cadwallader
and her husband, he sought the lady whose appearance had
produced this strange effect on Spiffard. He found her seated
on a sofa with three of his daughters, and apparently
reproving
them. The girls willingly gave place to their father, who,
after a few minutes, left her, proceeded to the general, and
appeared
to speak to him very earnestly.
I wish, doctor, you would persuade her to return home;
she is very nervous. The coach is still at the door. You have
great influence over her. And he turned to a gentleman near
him with exquisite
nonchalance
, and continued a conversation
he had been previously engaged in, respecting the want of
refinement
in American society.
The doctor cast a scornful glance at himseemed to
hesitate
,
as if debating internally how to proceedthen returned to
the lady, and a few minutes after, they were seen leaving the
room together.
The general had continued to address his neighbour, without
appearing to notice the conduct or departure of Cadwallader.
You, Mr. Transcript, not having resided any time abroad,
are not conscious of the infinite distance that the people of this
country are behind those of Europe in all that pertains to
politeness
,
and, I may say, civilization in general. But as I have
passed most of my life in Paris, I am incessantly shocked; it
plays the devil with my wife's nerves, to find a coarseness of
manners in the best society, and a vulgar imitation of what she
has been used to at home, that is sometimes ridiculous, and
always disgusting.
The person to whom this was addressed, did not seem to
relish it; and his face not being so well disciplined as the
generals
,
he coloured, as if offended, and showed other signs of
uneasiness; but as the general was tall and handsome, and
very well dressed, and withal, his senior by many years, he only
remarked, I think, sir, our countrymen always become
ridiculous
,
or worse, by imitating Europeans either in manners or
opinions.
In the meantime, Mr. Littlejohn could not but express his
surprise, when alone with Spiffard, at the sudden and strange
illness that had overcome him; for he had observed the change
in the young man's countenance, before he fell, fainting, from
his seat.
Why, my young friend, what is the matter? What
overcame
you so strangely and suddenly?
If I did not know that she died years ago, I should say
that
woman is my mother!
What woman?
She, so richly dressedso unlike every other person in
the room; she who entered, leaning for support on the man
you called general.
O, Mrs. Williams. Were you not introduced to the
general?
No! nor wished to be.
He is called a very handsome and very polite man. A
traveller, and man of the world.
His face appeared to me like a beautiful mask, and I could
not but fancy that it was kept on to hide deformity.
You show yourself a physiognomist.
It is rather feeling than observation.
General Williams and his wife move among our fashionable
people; but they are becoming rather remarkable.
They are not Americans?
He
is. He is one who has been seen by Europeans
wandering
abroad, and from his specious appearance and manners,
has been unhappily considered a fair specimen of his country,
although ever villifying her institutions, and belying her
character
,
in word and deed. `Leaving the fear of heaven on the
left hand,' he has been `fain to shuffle, to hedge, and to lurch,'
to keep up false appearances, or minister to depraved appetites.
He married in England, and now lives in a style of splendour
betokening riches, probably derived from his wife. Courteous
behaviour, and costly entertainments, have ranked them with
those who rank themselves highest among us; but those who
look beyond the surface, or see, even there, indications of
something within, not corresponding to the without, are giving
symptoms of shyness. He is noted for imitating the
aristocracy
of Europe, in bows, smiles, and sarcasms; and her
appearance
is such, not unfrequently, in public, as may be thought
at least equivocal. But why should such an apparition effect
you in this extraordinary manner?
The resemblance to my mother both in person, feature,
manner, style of head-dress, and that indescribable expression
of countenance which you have hinted at, took me by surprise.
You are aware of my susceptibility on a subject that has
entwined itself with my very being; and this extraordinary
likeness
to one so connected with all my early associations,
overpowered
my reason. Features, complexion, eyes, dark glossy
hair; my mother had a sister, but she was no heiressshe
could not
Such resemblances and coincidences frequently occur.
I am ashamed that I have caused so much trouble and
confusion
.
You have told me of the misery your father endured, and
have spoken of the cause. He did not brave the opinion of the
world.
O no! He bore his sorrow patiently, and endeavoured to
hide its cause.
But here is one who looks as if
that
did not exist, which all
sees, and he ostentatiously exhibits.
How can such conduct be accounted for?
It would appear at first view unaccountable; but the mind
of man is ever activeand that which is strange, leads to
suspicions
and conjectures, all perhaps, unfounded.
And you say this man married in England?
Yes. But except the fortuitous resemblance you spoke
of, all this does not touch you so nearly as it does those who
have been the intimates of the parties. Come, let us return to
the company.
I am sicksick, sir. I must go home. I will explain to
you another time. But, notwithstanding discrepant
circumstances
,
I cannot discard a belief that I have seen the sister of
my mother.
Discard all unpleasant thoughts; you owe an apology to
our kind hostess; and see, here she appears, anxiously looking
for you.
Mrs. Cadwallader having ascertained that Spiffard had
recovered
,
now joined them, and exacted his promise to return to
the drawing-room; and after answering a question of Mr.
Littlejohn's
,
by telling him that Mrs. Williams had gone home,
left the friends to follow at their leisure.
CHAPTER XXI.
Midnight, and an apparition
,
And didst thou not, when she was gone down stairs, desire me to be no
more so familiarity with such poor people.
I myself could make a chough of as deep chat.
But this is worshipful society.
It is said, labour in thy vocation; which is as much as to say, let the
magistrates be labouring men; and therefore should we be magistrates.
George
.Thou hast hit it; for there's no better sign of a brave mind,
than a hard hand.
Shakspeare
.
The madness of a lawless mob,
Is rife to do the devil's job;
More fierce, more pittiless, more fell,
Than any king that groans in hell.
Anon
.
Approve the best, and follow what I approve.
Love
Leads up to Heaven, is both the way and guide.
Milton
.
A young negro took our horses, with that affectation of extreme
politeness
and good breeding, which is so highly amusing in many of his colour,
and which inclines me to think that they appreciate the character of a fine
gentleman, more than any part of the community.
Latrobe
.
Doctor Cadwallader
, whose patient she was, having
conducted
Mrs. Williams home, returned to the company, and
found the general bowing, smiling, conversing, or listening,
apparently as much at ease as if nothing had happened in any
way extraordinary. The doctor passed him without speaking,
and assiduously shunned him for the remainder of the evening.
Mrs. Cadwallader took her husband aside, and spoke to him
with warmth in a low tone. His reply was, Never again!
But where, added he, is the young gentleman who fainted
so unaccountably at her appearance?
Still with Mr. Littlejohn, in your study.
She joined a group of ladies, and, at the moment, Littlejohn
and Spiffard entered, the latter intending to make his apologies,
and retire; but his intentions were prevented by the doctor,
who immediately addressed him with inquiries, and cheerful
assurances.
It is strange, Mr. Spiffard, that the entrance of Mrs.
Williams
should have such an effect upon you. Gentlemen of
your profession see such a variety of character, that one might
expect you to be proof against any exhibition. I am sorry
that my house should have been the theatre where such a
scene occurred.
My apology must be, sir, that I saw or fancied a
resemblance
to a person in whom I was formerly much interested.
The sudden recurrence of images exceedingly painfulthrew
me off my guard and overpowered mind and body. I hope
you will excuse and forget my behaviour. I wish to apologize
to Mrs. Cadwallader and then steal away, unnoticed. I have
caused a great confusion where only pleasure ought to reign.
No, no. You were not the cause. Why should you think
more of the affair when you see how coolly the general takes
it. He is a better actor than you are.
That may well be, sir.
At least said Littlejohn, on the great stage, where all
are `merely players.' Williams, like the old greek actors,
plays in a mask. If I am not mistaken in Mr. Spiffard he is
only an actor in the mimic world, and has no disguises for the
great masquerade of real life. My young friend will excuse
me, I hope, for saying, that, my attachment to him, recent as
our acquaintance is, proceeds principally from a conviction
that in private life he is no actor. He appears to me to be a
creature without disguise himself, and without suspicion of
disguise
in others.
Spiffard looked serious, paused a moment, then replied, As
I feel the necessity of speaking of myself, permit me to say,
that, at my first entrance into life as a man, I found the
common
opinion in respect to players was, that they were more
artificial in their intercourse with the world than other men;
and having from my earliest infancy a most devout love of
truth, I determined that my love of the drama should not
interfere
with what I considered the very essence of moral worth.
I have been and I trust I shall always remain, rather one that
`wears his heart upon his sleeve for daws to peck at,' than a
hypocrite or an actor in my intercourse with society; perhaps
these feelings may render my manners less acceptable, but I
would rather be esteemed unpolished by others, than know
myself, false.
The doctor shook the young man by the hand cordially, and
after a little more conversation, persuaded him to remain, for
at least a part of the evening. Cooke, who had been engaged
in chat with Governor Tompkins and knew nothing of what had
befallen Spiffard, advanced from the inner apartment with his
companion. Littlejohn introduced the two last mentioned, and
the conversation that the Governor and the tragedian had been
engaged in, which was theatrical, was continued; until
Williams
,
with his courtly smiles approached and joined them.
Cadwallader walked away. Doctors Hosack, McLean, and
Francis advanced, and the first accosted Tompkins with a
question relative to the western part of the state. Spiffard
shrunk from the courteous general's approach, and appeared to
place Littlejohn between him and the man of bows, as a
safeguard
.
No introduction took place. The frank and urbane
manners of the governor led to ease and cheerful chat, as was
customary wherever he came; and a colloquy ensued, of which
we will endeavour to give the reader a part, at the risk of
holding
him too long from the stirring incidents of our story.
Doctor Hosack's inquiries led to the first subject of
discussion
.
Before I was married, observed Littlejohn, I indulged
my propensity to travel, which has always been very great.
I thought, sir, you had never been in Europe, said
Williams
.
Never, sir, nor in Asia or Africa. My first wish was to
gain a knowledge of my native land; hoping afterwards to see
others, when qualified to make comparisons. My most ardent
desire at that time, governor, was to pry into the manners,
and study the character of the aborigines.
The opportunities for that study are much greater now,
said Tompkins. I have, probably, while travelling the circuit
when I was a judge, passed over more Indian ground than you
could penetrate through in your early days, by any effort that
a white man might then be able to make.
True, sir, but not find so many Indians.
They have been sadly abused and cheated, said Williams.
The merchant continued. My first journey was made
under
the wing of your predecessor, Governor George Clinton,
when he made our treaty with the six nations, which opened
the way for that immense display of the arts of civilization,
now rendering the then wilderness, from the Mohawk to Lake
Erie and from the St. Lawrence to the Alleghanies, a land
flowing with milk and honey; teeming with beings united as
brethren and cultivating science while they cultivate the soil.
I then saw enough of the red men to excite my curiosity
intensely
;
and I prevailed upon one of the interpreters, (a white
man who, when a child had been carried off and adopted by
those who murdered his parents,) to be my guide into that
country of the west, which although now smiling with orchards,
gardens, meadows and corn-fields; studded with villages,
towns and cities; was then an almost impenetrable thicket,
forbidden to the white man unless he passed over it with fire
and sword. With this guide, and after the treaty which
opened
my path, I commenced my journey; and I look back upon
it as the most delightful portion of my life; probably because
the most teeming with novelty, at an age when all is new.
But, said Williams, I should think it very monotonous;
and peculiarly unprofitable, unless it led to a speculation in
furs.
My speculations, although a merchant, have been aimed
to penetrate beyond the skin, or any other covering, whether
in the desert or the drawing-room. The speculations I then
made, and the knowledge I obtained of facts, traditions,
customs
,
manners, religion, superstition, impostures, (for there
are impostors even among uncivilized men,) most unblushing
and steady-faced imposters, wearing masks more impenetrable
than any I have met with in refined society:fellows who,
though never trusted as leaders, have an influence in savage
life, as great as their brethren exercise over the ignorant in
polite society.
The result of your inquiries would be very acceptable,
said the governor.
The result of my inquiries, at that time, and some little
since, compared with what I can gather from books, has
produced
such opinions respecting the character of our Indians as
differ from those of most men.
And they are
First, said Hosack, let me help you to a glass of this
Madeira.
And I will, said Tompkins, with his permission, fill a
glass for Mr. Cooke. Cadwallader keeps the best madeira in
the state. What do you think of that colour, Mr. Cooke?
It is brighter than that of an Indian painted for a war-dance
or scalp-hunt.
As deceitful and as deadly.
O, no! Mr. Spiffard, when not abused, it is as hospitable
and as generous, was the apology for the bright liquor
made by doctor McLean.
At this moment two black waiters bowed before them,
dressed with as much attention to the fashion of the day, as
any person in the room, not even excepting the handsome
general, and with all the tact of European footmen they
presented
the splendid salvers, bountifully laden, the one with
porter, wines and cordials, the other with cakes, fruits, and
sandwiches.
Character is shown in trifles. Cooke threw down a
bumper
at one toss of the glass. Tompkins and Hosack held up
the wine and looked through it at the brilliant chandelier above
them, seeming to enjoy the flavour through the eye by
anticipation
.
McLean and Francis touched glasses, and made less
of the imaginary but quite as much of the real taste of the
liquor
.
Littlejohn touched his lip to the glass, filled for him by
doctor Hosack, and put it away. Williams took a plate and
filled it with eatables after tossing off a tumbler of foaming
brown-stout; and Spiffard gently declined the proffered
temptations
by an inclination of the head.
And now, my dear sir, your opinion of our red-skins.
said Tompkins.
Or rather, said Cooke, the red-skins of the forest. We
do not ask our own characters.
Our Indians appear to me so essentially different from all
the other races of men, said the merchant, that the more I
have examined the subject, the more wonderful it has
appeared
to me. The wide difference between the savage and
civilized
man is obvious, and easily explained. But the very
nature
of the American savage, is the opposite in many respects
to the savage of any other part of the globe. We have just
seen two negroes, whose ancestors were brought hither as
slaves, by the ships of speculating christian merchants,
freemen
of England or her coloniesthese were savages in the
literal acceptation of the wordI meant the African negroes,
not the Enropean merchants
Thank you, sir, for the commentary, said Spiffard,
smiling.
Whatever lexicographers may say, I never could confound
the words savage and barbarian. The first may be innocent,
the last must be cruel.
A nice distinction, Mr. Cooke.
Sirr, the merchants who fit out slave-ships are barbarians.
They send forth their hell-hounds to hunt men for the torture of
the sugar mill, as the pious cavallieros of Spain halloo'd on
their blood-hounds in chase of Indians for the living-death of
their gold-mines. A savage
may
be a barbariana
slave-dealer
must
be one.
The general had finished one plate-fulltaken a glass of
champagne, and was helping himself to another supply of
jelly, when he observed, the African is benefited by the
change, in my opinionas for slaveryall are slaves but those
who command by virtue of knowledge or riches.
The merchant proceeded, The fathers of these two
cringing
waiters were savages, whose black skins have been
ornamented
with lines, circles, and crescents, scored by a
flint-knife
or sharp-edged shell, and whose intellectual attainments
might be estimated by the insuperable difficulty of teaching
them to count ten. Now, see their sons, as courteously
servile
as the descendants of the European kidnappers who
enslaved
their fathers; and probably as well versed in vice.
They imitate the white in every species of foppery, folly,
absurdity
and crime. They imitate him as tyrants and as slaves.
Not so the Indian. The conformation of his head shows his
great superiority to the imitative negro
and he feels in his
woods and prairies superior to the encroaching white-man.
The vices of civilization brought in contact, undermine him
and he perishes; but he never bows. He is eloquent and
politenever cringing. Two young Osages or Iroquois could
never be induced to carry the delicacies of a drawing-room
around, like those blacks, and bow, and cringe, and fly, at the
nod of the white man, although they see the white man do it.
They are not too proud to serve us as warriors, hunters, or
voyageurs. remarked the governor.
True: but without servility. They are at home in the fight
the chase and the canoe. They adopt our weapons and excel
in their use. They serve us in the forest or on the rivers and
lakes, and are proud to show their superiority to us. You
could not by the training of centuries bring the descendant of
an Indian to bear himself like yon black.
Or like yon white, said Cooke.
Yet, they are great beaux, said the governor.
True, sir, no beau in this assembly, and I can see a great
many perfect coxcombs, is more attentive to ornamenting his
person than a young Indian brave. Both their men and women
are as fond of show, and as much tickled with tinsel, as we
are; but the Indian would not, like the black, or the white,
dress himself like a chief and conduct himself like a slave.
This may be all true, observed Dr. McLean, but is it
not his pride that makes him suppress any token of admiration
at the inventions and improvements of the white man, although
he wishes to imitate them?
He values his independence too highly to pay the price.
He is revengeful.
As a white.
Deceitful.
To destroy his enemy. It is the theory and practice of
European warfare.
He is a drunkard, said Spiffard, and to obtain the
means of excitement, will degrade himself to become a liar
and a thief.
In this, I acknowledge that he imitates his white
neighbours
.
This is one feature which puzzles me in the
character
of this proud people. Their religion, their liability
to be deceived by false prophets and conjurers, and some other
points may be accounted for; but their obstinate rejection of the
truths of christianity, or, if apparently received, its utter
inefficacy
,
is, to use the same word, another puzzle. The present
race of Europe is a mixture of the three divisions of the old
world. All nations, while in a savage, or semi-savage state,
have bowed the head to the law of the gospel. At first to the
outward forms, and by degrees to the spirit, more or less,
according
to circumstances. If a king, chief, or leader, was
induced
to receive the sign of the cross, all his nation, people,
or followers, professed themselves christians. But the
aborigine
of America either rejects peremptorily, or acquiesces
from politeness. He will hear sermon, kneel at mass, hang a
cross among his ornaments, but he remains ever ready for the
chace of beast or man, ever delighting in blood and torture.
The success of some missionaries, particularly the
Moravians
,
may be objected, but their great and exemplary efforts
produced but transient and partial effect. Individuals
doubtless
became christians, (at least I am willing to believe so) but
never did an Indian profess christianity because a king or chief
called himself by that name.
Is it not because they will not submit to law, inquired
Spiffard.
They have an inexplicable moral law, to which they
submit
more willingly than civilized men submit to any legal
restraint
,
however trifling, which interferes with their passions
or interests. If an Indian has, in the opinion of his tribe,
incurred
the penalty of death, and is by the council adjudged to
die, although he may be far from home, and beyond all control
by coercion, if notified of the doom pronounced, he returns and
offers his life to expiate his fault. If he is in debt to any one,
he asks time, and life, for a hunt; brings home the product,
settles his pecuniary account, and then meets the final
settlement
of the death-blow, without any apparent reluctance.
As Cooke moved from the group we have been attending
to, he repeated, there are more things in heaven and earth,
Horatio, than are dreamt of in your philosophy.
Hypocrisy is carried farther with these savages than with
any other people in the globe, was the general's remark.
I love them for their democratic independence, said
Tompkins.
Democracy! said Williams with a sneer. They
certainly
are good democrats in filth, drunkeness, deceit and
violence.
I am sorry, General Williams, that your long residence in
Europe has prejudiced you against the institutions of your
country. Democracy, government by the representatives of the
people, natives of the soil, is the palladium of America. You
resided in Paris during the reign of terror, and, excuse me,
your prejudices may be derived from what you saw of mobs.
No, sir, I was then a pure democrat, but I have since had
experience of the vast superiority of European society, and my
judgment of the government necessary to produce this
superiority
,
is founded upon long observation. Every thing in this
country appears little and mean, with great ostentation and
unbounded
pretension.
Humph! pretension, said Littlejohn.
Your countrymen, said Tompkins smiling, are much
obliged to you.
Nayyou must not misunderstand me. I love my
country
sincerely. But you will allow that the vulgar herd think of
nothing but levelling. I remember in this city of New-York,
and its environs, beautiful and commanding hills, from whose
summits we might contemplate the neighbouring islands, with
the plains and mountains of New-Jersey, the majestic rivers
and bay, and even look to the Atlantic ocean. Then, when
entering the superb harbour from the sea, the city appeared to
rise from the waters, hill above hill; now, a foreigner in
approaching
,
cries how flat the land is upon which that town is
built. He sees nothing but marks of mediocrity and tokens
of trade.
And you may remember, as I do, between these towering
hills, enveloped in mists, like many a haughty European head,
deep ponds of stagnant water, the receptacles of filth and
sources of pestilence; low and wide spread marshes, where
the bittern fished for the frog, and the snipe hid his long bill
in the mud. Where are they now? It is true we have a level;
but it is a wholesome level. The materials of superfluous
heights have been made useful. The lowly morass has been
lifted to the level of the adjacent plain, and is covered with
the neat abodes of thousandsthe fountains of disease are
converted into the habitations of health. Thus it is that
democracy
would and will, by degrees, leave no head so high as
to be lifted to the clouds and see mankind through a mist, and
will raise from the pestilential miasmata of vice and ignorance
those who had been doomed by the aristocracy of former days
to the slough of despond or the stagnant pool of corruption.
All a dream, sir, a dream!
A glorious reality! Our institutions are raising millions
to the level, and above the level of European society. Our
schools daily increase. Millions are imbued with the love of
their country; become familiar with her institutions; obedient
to her laws; and rich in her literature, and
that
of
their
fatherland
.
Bravo, governor! Democracy has a worthy champion in
the West-Chester farmer's son.
Give me your hand, my old friend, and the friend of my
father. You are not afraid of that system which would lift
the poor and the ignorant to the level of good citizenship, and
reduce the usurper of power to a state wherein he may be
useful
instead of prejudicial.
All this is very pretty, gentlemen, and very specious.
But you are teaching the ignorant and vulgar, who must ever
be the mass of society, that they ought to be the rulers of the
well born and well educated. Mere number, that is, brute
force, will govern. The consequence is, that if I, or any
other gentleman, come in contact with one of the very lowest
of the people, provided the individual does not wish any
favour
,
or has no design upon my purse, his language or
behaviour
will be insolent or brutal. Go into a mechanic's
workshop
and ask an apprentice for his master: the answer is, I
have no masterthat is, you get no answer. One of the
journeymen, if an European, may, perhaps, say, `the boss is
not here.' The meaner officials of the country, from the same
cause, assume a tone of familiarity that calls for correction, but
which their suporiors in office dare not attempt. I have seen
a constable in this city put his thumb and finger into the
mayor's snuff-box, when offered to a distinguished guest of
the corporation, and take his pinch with the sangfroid of perfect
equality.
I am an old man, Mr. WilliamsI beg pardongeneral
I should have said, and Littlejohn fixed his eyes on the
person
he addressed with an expression that might have made
the blood mount to the forehead of any other man. I have
lived many years, and never found that my countrymen were
deficient in civility, unless provoked by the
assumption
of
superiority
.
I think the action I have mentioned was neither civil nor
proper.
Where, asked Governor Tompkins, where was the
offence
if a constable put his finger and thumb into a mayor's
snuff-box? They are both servants of the same sovereignthe
sovereign people; and both part and parcel of sovereignty.
I am an officer of higher grade than the mayor, and I have
taken my pinch from the box of Jacob Hays, and Jacob has
had thumb and finger in mine many a time.
Ah, there it isyou all look forward to the time of
election.
Ha, ha, ha! May be so! But my snuff received no injury
except from diminution; for Jacob has a broad thumb and
finger, and makes a grasping pinch, as many a greater sufferer
than my snuff-box can testify.
Say what you will, governor, I wish to find respect paid to
mymy he was going to say rank, but his eye met
Littlejohn's
,
and he changed his word to appearance.
It is a trite saying, that appearances are deceitful,
observed
the last mentioned interlocutor.
If I go into an inn, said Williams, I may stand in the
common bar-room for minutes before I can be told whether I
may have shelter or refreshment. Whereas, in England, the
moment I appear, I am saluted with proper respect, and
ushered
into an apartment fit to receive a gentleman.
By an obsequious cringing menial, who, not being paid by
the keeper of the inn, anticipates, in you, the bearer of his
wages, said Littlejohn.
Jemmy Bryden, of the Tontine, tells a story of himself when
he kept the Fountain inn at Baltimore, perhaps apropos to
appearances
,
said Tomkins. Notice had been given to the
landlord that President Jefferson would, on a certain day,
honour
the Fountain inn with his presence, and pass the night.
Greatly pleased was Jemmy Bryden. He
boo'd
in anticipation,
and much he talked of the expected honour. Every preparation
was made, and the landlord stood ready on the appointed day to
receive the president of the United States with every attention
due to his rank. At this crisis a stage-coach drove up to the door,
and a tall traveller stept out, with saddle-bags on arm, and
was stalking through the hall to the interior of the Fountain
inn. `Ye canno go in there,' said Jemmy, `sit ye doon, mon,
in the bar-room.' The tall man did as he was desiredthrew
his saddle-bags on one chair and himself on another, with
perfect
nonchalance; took out his snuff-box, and after helping
himself, offered it, open, to Jemmy, who was in the act of
popping in thumb and finger, when a well dressed gentleman
approached, and asked, of the tall man, (with the saddle-bags)
`when will your excellency have a carriage ordered?' at the
same time demanding of the astonished landlord `why he had
not shown the president to the apartments ordered for him?'
Spiffard seized the opportunity offered by Mrs. Cadwallader's
approach to propose the
amende honourable
, by taking a place at
the harpsichord; and, with her, left the group of gentlemen who
had been attracted to listen to the amiable governor.
Again Spiffard approached the harpsichord, which, as we
have seen, was opposite the door of the outward apartment:
again he was seated opposite the fatal mirror. Again the ladies
surrounded him at the call of Cadwallader. And this time he
was permitted to show his skill both as a vocal and
instrumental
musician. He sung a plaintive balladit was thought
he had composed it himselfand his auditors were melted to
tears. He changed suddenly to a strain of mock bravura,
and gave a comic song with characteristic expression. The
effect his efforts had producedthe attentions of the elegant
Mrs. Cadwalladerthe inspiring looks, and half suppressed
sounds of delight, escaping from the lovely girls around him
all tended to encourage the young comedian, and his animal
spirits were exalted to their highest pitch, when other sounds,
most discordant and shrill were heard, and the company turned
to the door from whence they proceeded.
The first words were indistinct, although screamed by a
voice scarcely human. Then was heard, stand out of the
way, fellow! I will go in!
The hand of the musician was arrestedhis voice faltered
he lifted his eyes to the mirror, and again saw the dreaded
vision
which had before deprived him of self-government and
stopped the beating of his heart.
Mrs. Williams burst into the apartment a perfect image of
raging insanity. The elegant dress with which she had
previously
VOL. I. 12
appeared, when she entered hanging upon the general's
arm, and was still, in part upon her, but in utter disorder;
appearing as if the act of disrobing had commenced before the
impulse of madness had seized and hurried her from her
chamber
to this second humiliating exhibition. No cloak, shawl,
or hat, served to hide the ravages made in her habiliments, or
veil her distorted maniacal countenance. Her first appearance
had been, in part, maudlin; the second was that of furious
passion and raving insanity commingled. Every feature was
distorted, and although inexpressibly wild, yet the open mouth
and muscles reluctantly obeying the confused intellect, dimmed
that brightness which flashes from uncontrolled passion, when
its madness is not under the influence of poison.
Her dark hair hung in disorder, made more conspicuous by
the previous care which had been taken in its arrangement,
and the remains of ornaments which had been lavished upon
the now straggling tresses. In this plight she had walked, or
glided, a hideous spectre, through the streets, from the splendid
mansion of the general to that of Doctor Cadwallader.
Williams! Williams! she shouted, as she entered, in a
tone high, hoarse, discordant. Williams! I will bear it no
longer! Why am I to be left alone? Why am I to be
abandoned
?
I am betrayed! deceived! I will expose the
hypocrite
.
I will let the world know
While uttering these ravings, which seemed to threaten some
disclosure, as a punishment to be inflicted upon the courteous
general, she had advanced, and the receding company gave
her ample space to exhibit the wildest contortions of body and
limbs.
The cry of SpiffardMr. Spiffard? was heard, and he
was seen by those near the harpsichord, pale, and sinking from
the music-stool. Again he might have fallen to the floor, but
for the aid of Doctor Cadwallader, and an exertion of mind made
by himself, when he found that he was a second time causing
a confusion, which to the company must appear inexplicable or
ridiculous.
The unhappy woman ceased her call upon her husband, as
soon as the name of Spiffard struck her ear. She stood still a
moment. Who says Spiffard? Where is he? Where's the
Yankee farmer? Where's my sister? Let me see Spiffard!
Let me see my sister! My father! My mother! O, my
mother!
Williams, who had been seated on an ottoman, making
himself
agreeable to a lady, at the time his wife entered, was, for
once, taken by surprise. He at first strove to appear
unconcerned
;
but when certain words reached his ear, he started
from his seat, and hurrying through the retreating crowd that
had made a circle round his wife, arrived in time to prevent her
falling on the floor, as she called upon her father and mother,
in a tone that indicated exhaustion and returning reason,
accompanied
by deep, heart-breaking sorrow.
The physicians hastened to her assistance, and the unhappy
woman was conveyed home; this time, accompanied by the
general, who had murmured something, in broken sentences, of
delicate healthunhappy diseasenervous affection, to
those who assisted and rode with him to his door, in a coach
offered by one of the company.
Spiffard was surrounded by friends, among whom was
Littlejohn
,
all interested in his apparent suffering, and all very much
at a loss to account for the extraordinary incidents of the
evening
.
He soon took leave of his kind hostess, and retired.
After much whispering, tale-telling, and many grave looks, and
foreboding shakes of the head, the various groups dispersed,
and left the doctor and his lady to form plans for their future
conduct towards those of their guests who had been most
conspicuous
in the scenes of pain and pleasure, on which we now
drop the curtain.
Before we proceed with our hero's story, which is becoming
more interesting as it approaches the catastrophe, it is
necessary
to go back, and see how, and by what means, General
Williams, the handsome American, and his English wife, had
become connected with the fate of the Yankee water-drinker.
We are not practised in the delightful art of story-telling,
whether true or false, real or imaginary; but we find that others
who have practised the art with success, have thought it not
inconsistent with that interest which they wish to excite in their
readers, to skip backwards and forwards in their narrations;
now dropping the chain of events (as a housewife drops a
stitch in her knitting work;) now taking it up again, and filling
the void skilfully, (like the aforesaid industrious dame;) so that
their work (like the glove or stocking,) may be made to suit
those it is intended for. This being the established mode, we
shall in all humility follow it.
The reader has seen that our lover of truth and water found
his maternal grandfather, Mr. Atherton, when he visited him in
Lincolnshire, reduced to poverty; that he had lost his wife; and
that he was dependent upon the exertions of his only remaining
daughter for subsistence. This daughter, once thought little of
in comparison with her beautiful sisters, had proved the only
solace of his age. This neglected one was not adorned by
polished skin, or Grecian feature, but she possessed the lasting
beauties of the mind. Cheerful, pious, dutiful, and industrious;
she was the prop of the paternal tree, that had not afforded
her a due portion of its protecting influence, when its stem was
vigorous, and its branches flourishing.
The neglect which Sophia Atherton had experienced from
her father and mother, taught her to rely upon another parent;
and caused her to seek instruction from the sources which that
parent had placed within her reach.
We have seen that our hero did his duty, in placing his
grandfather and aunt beyond the reach of want. We will go
still further back, take up another stitch, and bring up another
thread of our knitting work, in another chapter.
CHAPTER XXII.
Things as they were thirty years ago
.
A paramour is, God bless us, a thing of naught.
Shakspeare
.
O, what a tangled web we weave,
When first we practise to deceive.
Scott.
Smile in men's faces, smooth, deceive, and cog;
Duck with French nods, and apish courtesy.
Methought a serpent eat my heart away.
Cupid is a knavish lad,
Thus to make poor females mad.
One man holdeth troth, a million false.
Which is the villain? Let me see his eyes;
That when I note another man like him,
I may avoid him.
O what authority, and show of truth,
Can cunning sin cover itself withal.
Shakspeare
.
Meine Ruh'ist hin.
Meine Herz ist schwer;
Ich finde sie nimmer
Und nimmermehr.
Goethe
.
Wrong has but wrong, and blame the due of blame.
Shakspeare
.
I HAVE pledged myself to give some account of the
handsome
and courteous General Williams, and to explain his
connection with the fate and story of Zebediah Spiffard.
William Williams, (who had contrived to assume, with some
plausibility, the title of general, in consequence of a short period
of enrolment in the French republican army, at the
commencement
of their struggles for liberty,) was one of those
unprincipled
speculators, who have, in the minds of the superficial,
left a stain on the American character in Europe. He was a
Pennsylvanian by birth, and descended from one of the
companions
12*
of William Penn; but had very early in life, thrown off
both the principles and garb of the primitively apostolic society,
of which his ancestor had been a member and leader.
By the death of his parents, he was left in possession of
some property, which he dissipated even before he was read
out of meeting. After sponging upon such of his countrymen
as his exterior and professions could deceive, (and he had a
tongue could wheedle with the devil,) he sought a wider field
for the display of his abilities in Europe. He did not go
empty-handed
to Paris; and arriving at a time when his professions
of zeal in the cause of liberty, as well as his being an
American
,
were recommendations, he entered the army under the
auspices of the good LaFayette; but found means to retire,
before seeing any active service, with the rank of major, which
was easily advanced to that of general, after going to London.
The vicissitudes occasioned by the many revolutions of
France, enabled him to gamble, or speculate, to advantage in
Paris: he, however, found it convenient to cross the channel,
and he arrived at the metropolis of Great Britain with a full
purse, splendid appointments, and an honourable military title.
All this was not sufficient to gain him an introduction to the
higher classes of that great city. He imitated their vices and
extravagance; but his schemes upon their gold and bank notes,
though backed by skill, failed, at the outposts of nobility, the
gaming tables, to which he had gained admittance. Many
other schemes failed, although some succeeded, and he was
nearly at the bottom, where ebbing fortune threatened to leave
him, when, at a public place, he met the attractive Sophia
Atherton.
The outward marks of wealth had not been stripped from the
general, and he succeeded in gaining an introduction to, and
attracting
the attention of this fallen, and now neglected, victim of
seduction. Though much
her
senior, he was younger,
handsomer
,
and more attentive than her noble seducer; and found
no difficulty in commencing a suit which ended in a very
different
manner from his first intentions.
Williams, who was in all things as great a libertine as the
hereditary lawgiver of Great Britain, with whom Miss
Atherton
lived, met her at one of those ball-rooms, where persons
who had fallen, like her, but were yet of the first class of the
degraded, (and who resorted to this place by permission, and
under certain restrictions, appearing in splendor, attended by
the carriages and servants of their illegitimate lords,) were
accustomed
to assemble; and where a show of decorum was
preserved
.
He gained the information he wished from the
proprietors
of this dancing assembly; and with the cunning of the
unwise, conceived a plan for restoring his shattered fortunes,
and escaping that royal seat, called the King's Bench.
He was informed that my lord was about to marry, and
would willingly make pecuniary sacrifices to get rid of the
beautiful frail-one in question. My lord was extremely rich
a legitimate heir to his estates and titles was his objectand
the general's informant hinted that his lordship would probably
pay well to be relieved from the presence of the lady who had
been exhibited in triumph, but was now tolerated as a burthen,
which he wished to remove without resorting to harsh, or what
might be considered, dishonourable measures.
The unhappy Sophia, disappointed in her hopes of continued
attachment from the man who had gained her heart, (we do not
say her love; heart may mean wishes, desires, hopes, whether
of admiration, or riches, or splendor;) disappointed in all her
vain expectations, tormented by conscience, cut off from such
society as she could esteem, and made daily more sensible of
her deplorable fall, was pleased by the particular attentions of
the handsome general; who appeared as a man of fashion,
distinction
,
and wealth. They met frequently at the
before-mentioned
dancing assembly, and after, by appointment, at other
places; she guardedly preserving with fidelity, that treaty with
my lord, by the terms of which she enjoyed the liberty she
exercised
;
and always accompanied by his lordship's servants, in
attendance, or by some person appointed by him. Of course,
he was apprised of Williams's attentions to his protegee, and she
knew that he had such information. After a time, my lord told
her that if the gentleman would marry her, he would yield his
consent, however unwillingly, and would settle a handsome
annuity upon her for life.
Williams found the charms of the beautiful Sophia, (who
communicated the munificent intentions of my lord,) increase
as his funds and credit diminishedand became more pressing,
in proportion to the pressing calls of his creditors. The dread
of that resting place, before nameda place not unknown to
several of our republicans who have made their visits too long
to the land of their fathersincreased. This uneasy bench
began to appear in his dreams; the fear of it made him more
fervent in protestations, and more assiduous in attentions.
The lady, on her part, became, in some measure, attached to
her professed admirer. Her hopes rested on him. To become
a wife, was, of itself, a circumstance ardently to be desired.
She hoped that she might again be received as a child at the
paternal hearth. She saw, or imagined, a way opened by which
she might escape the tortures of an upbraiding conscience; for
conscience, though lulled by the opiates of dissipation, would
awake, and the voice was louder at every awakening. She
hoped yet for the blessing of her father, and to have the stains
of sin washed from her by the tears of repentance and
forgiveness
,
shed and mingled on the bosom of her mother; for yet
she knew not that she was the murderer of that too fond and
indulgent parent. She encouraged the adventurer's addresses,
in the delusive hope of retrieving character, and finding
happiness
;
for hope is swift, and flies with swallows' wings.
Williams
pursued her to avoid a prison, satisfy his creditors, and
secure the means of living, if not in splendour, at least in
sensual
indulgence. Her beauty, for yet her brilliant complexion,
(aided by the arts of the milliner, mantua-maker, and other
coadjutors of the toilet,) lent to Sophia Atherton no small
portion
of attraction for such a man as William Williams.
The other party to this bargain, the noble peer, who could
trace his blood to one of the robbers attending upon the
Norman
conqueror; (and who had, as we have seen, watched the
progress of the intrigue,) chose his opportunity to bring it to a
close. One morning, (that is, a little before sun-set in June,)
when he, by appointment, met Sophia, he, assuming an air of
badinage, and exercising a degree of frankness, not often put
in requisition, told his victim that he thought the Yankee
gentleman
would serve her turn, and advised her to secure
him. His frankness, however, did not extend so far as to make
known to her that the general was no general; and that the
splendid equipage, furniture, and other indications of wealth,
were unpaid for.
I will do my endeavour to arrange matters in such a
manner
that you shall have no just cause to complain of my want
of liberality. The general will make you what is called `an
honest woman;' and if he takes you to Yankee-land, you will
shine as a brilliant star among the pine-knots of New-England,
or a sun, illuminating with your splendour, the fashion-aping
coteries of Boston or Washington.
We will not record the answer of the humbled and penitent
Sophia. The interview ended in an understanding that
Williams
should be invited by her to see
my lord's
collection of
pictures
,
statues, medals, and other evidences of his
virtu;
and
a concerted-accidental meeting should take place between the
noble peer and the ignoble general.
This happened as was arranged. Let it be observed that
the female partner in the transaction was the only one who did
not attempt to deceive. The general imposed upon her, and
wished to impose himself upon the noble, as a man of honour
and wealth. The noble had obtained a knowledge of the
worthlessness
of the impostor upon whom he intended to place the
ostensible responsibility for the future welfare of the woman he
had ruined; but was satisfied that he acted as a man of
honour
,
in providing her with a husband, and securing her from a
want of the luxuries she had been accustomed to. Sophia
imparted
to the man on whom her hopes now rested, all her former
aberrations and future aspirations. She was again deceived!
The two gentlemenalas! that the term should be so
prostituted
the
nobleman and general(these words must pass
for designations of the individuals who met to complete the
bargain and sale,) concurred in deceiving the object of the
traffic. The general, accompanied by his intended wife,
admired
the works of art he ostensibly came to see. My lord
dropped in by chance
, was introduced; and the negotiators, at
a signal given by the master of the mansion, were left
tete-a-tete
,
by the withdrawing of the ladythe property to be bought
and sold.
My lord told Williams that he was aware of his pursuit of
Miss Atherton, and added:
She is a lovely woman, sir, a treasure, of which, I am
conscious
that I am unworthy. My age is unsuited to her youth
and beauty. She has confessed that you have engaged her
affections. Family reasons render it proper that I should
marry, and my union with a lady of rank is arrangedthe time
fixed. Now, sir, you are a man of honoura general in the
American service
No, my lordI have been in the French army.
True, I recollectfor to be frank, I have not been so
inattentive
to Miss Atherton's future prospects, as not to make
certain inquiries
. You live in style, keep your carriage, and
all thatbut, to be plain, I understand that your circumstances
are not such as appearances indicate, or, as Miss Atherton
thinks them.
The peer paused. The general determined to throw off a
mask which he found was no longer a disguise. He confessed,
that he was a bankrupt; but he was too much under the
influence
of habit not to begin some smooth sentences respecting
remittances and expectations, which the hereditary lawmaker
interrupted by proceeding thus.
Sir, I believe we understand each other, and may as well
come to the point. We are both men of the world, but I am
the greater favourite of fortune, and you the happier as
un
homme a bonnes fortunes
. In plain English, I am rich and you
are poor.
The countenance of the peer was as he spoke the last lines,
very like that which Moritz Retzch has given to Mephistophiles
in his sketches from Faust. The general kept his
own
countenance
bowed
and smiled. The rich man proceeded.
I will come down handsomely if you will publicly marry
Miss Atherton.
Publicly?
Publicly. That is, in the presence of undeniable
witnesses
.You
hesitate. Your friends, you know, need not be
made acquainted with any particulars of the lady's former
history
.
Your honourable character must be her passport in either
hemisphere. Mephistophiles again.
Certainly, Sir.
I will settle upon her for her life, one thousand poundsof
course sterling
per annum
.
For
her
life.
Her
life. She is still youngtrue, the young diewell,
then, if you survive, five hundred a year for
your
lifeyou
shall be a general on half pay. Mephistophiles again.
But my present debts?
What! must I wipe off all old scores?well, well, so be
it. We will make a clear field.
Such was the bargain and sale. It is sufficient for us to
know that it was fulfilled
honourably
. The general
introduced
his beautiful wife to his friends, who, being principally
Pennsylvanians of a respectable class, were less liable to know
the history of Miss Atherton, whose name alone, was made
known to them by the husband, with the addition, that her
family
resided in Lincolnshire; and the bride and bridegroom left
London for the country seat. That she was an heiress was
very clear,
to the general's creditors
.
Sophia had stipulated that she should visit her parents and
sister. Her mother was dead. Her father refused to see her,
or forgive her. The knowledge that her mother died in
consequence
of her flight and infamy, was a sore blow, awakening
anew her lulled conscience. Her hopes of reconciliation were
blasted. Her sister Eliza saw her privately and wept over her.
She remembered what had passed in the days of early youth,
school-days friendshipchildhood innocence, for though un
like and differently treated by their parents, there still were
many
hours that they had spent together, when they had chid the
hasty-footed time for parting them. Besides, religion had
taught Eliza forgiveness; she practised its precepts. To do
as she would be done by, and to render good for evil, were
laws her pure heart never rebelled against. She endeavoured
to be a mediator between the father and repentant daughter;
but even
her
influencethe influence of wisdom, purity and
love, could not bend the obstinacy of a weak-minded man,
whose hopes had been blasted where he placed his fondest
expectations.
The wretched Sophia was doomed to further disappointments
on her return to London: trifling in comparison with those she
had last experienced, but they were additions; and when the
cup is full, a drop causes overflowing. Riches command
outward
tokens of respect; but the heart requires more; and
neither Williams nor his wife found it. The reception Mrs.
Williams met with from those to whom her husband
introduced
her was cool. There was some mystery identified with
her and her marriage, and mystery begets suspicion.
Shortly some good natured friend, with the best intentions in
the world, informed her that it was said, and positively
asserted
,
notwithstanding that she had contradicted it, that, Mrs.
Williams had been divorced from a former husband in
consequence
of certain indiscretions: only think how ridiculous,
my dear, and another
had said
that a certain peer had been
noticed (while looking at her through his glass, at the
operahouse
,)
giving intimations of former intimacy; and then
whispering
to some of his companions: and it
was reported
that
the peera newly married, though an old man, had been a
particular
friend of Mrs. Williams. Other reports said that she had
been separated from her husband and a flock of fine children,
by a private compromise between general Williams and the
injured party. In short the unhappy woman found that the
past was incessantly intruding upon the present, not only by
the busy suggestions of memory, but by circumstances which
to the
sound
would have caused no pain. She saw that there
was no rest for her in her native land.
To add to her misfortunes, she had, when first conscious of
the falling off, and increasing neglect of her seducer, sought in
the wretched resource of the wretched, a temporary relief from
mortification and grief; and now, under the affliction caused by
the failure of her hopes, she again had recourse to the same
aggravating palliative.
Williams found his situation disagreeable, and proposed a
visit to his native country. Sophia, although she had no
favouring
recollections of her former residence in America, and
might have objected to Boston, gladly agreed to the proposal
of visiting the relations of her husband in Philadelphia. To
go where she was unknown, seemed desirable; but to seek a
refuge in such obscurity was like the hopeles attempt to fly
from the observation of a Roman tyrant when Rome was the
world, and the only refuge of the guilty was death. A change
of place was, however, a revival of hope.
The
soi-disant
general had no brothers; and but one sister
living. She had never deviated from the seet of which her
ancestors had been shining lights, and had married, in meeting,
(with all the decent and rational forms of quakerism,) a man
like herself. She was now a widow, residing in Philadelphia,
in circumstances which assure competence to those whose
desires are moderate, and surrounded in her simple dwelling by
four daughters as prudent, neat, and unpretending as she had
been when at the same joyful epocha of life, the age of
expectation
.
To this sister the general announced his intentions of
visiting his home, and being her guest until he should establish
himself and her new sister, in a suitable dwelling, as her
neighbour
.
The travellers were anxiously expected by the quaker widow
and her daughters. Their plain domicil was prepared to receive
them, and their hearts were as open as their doors. They
received notice of the arrival of the long expected guests, who
had left the ship and come up to the city in a steamboat. A
trusty porter was in waiting to conduct them to the retired
dwelling of Mrs. Smith, which, surrounded by other quaker
families, stood in a court-like street, a
cul de sac
, which was
not in existence when her brother left home. The travellers
were espied as they entered the secluded place. Williams
approached the door of his only remaining relative. His
sister
and her daughters stood at the entrance to receive him, and
one they were prepared for his sake to love. Mrs. Williams,
who more than divided the attention of the female group, hung
on his arm. They were followed by the black porter with his
wheelbarrow of baggage, two servants, a man and woman;
two dogs, favourites of the master, were close at his heels, and
a third, the pet of the mistress was borne in the arms of the
female servant. The kind faces of the quakers beamed with
pleasure as they saw the near approach of the new sister and
aunt. She had already ascended the first step of the porch,
already the sister had advanced with outstretched handwhen
Fidelle uttered a cry and escaped from the arms of his
conveyer
.
The lady shrieked, run Williams! see what's the matter
with Fidelle!
This want of tact, not to say feeling, can only be accounted
for by what has already been hinted at. I only state the fact.
As to the expecting ladies, I can give no adequate notion of
the change of feeling which took place in them, when they
saw the new-come relatives retire from them in pursuit of a
little yelping cur; and then saw the general, (having captured
the puppy) advancing againhis attentions and caresses
hestowed
upon the brute animal, while his wife stretched her
arms to receive
Fidelle
, and turned her back on her husband's
relations. When they saw this specimen of their guests, the
reader may imagine the shock their affectionate hearts received.
Their countenances I cannot describe, except that of the
youngest girl, who, seeing nothing but the ridiculous in the
scene, stood behind her mother, and showed by her laughing
face that she was only restrained by the matron's presence from
giving audible indications of her delight.
Even the neighbours had been drawn to their windows
for neighbours love to participate in neighbours'
pleasures-and
some of them drew in their heads that an indecorous smile
might not be observed, or laugh heard. And many a heart and
door was shut to the visiters, by this freak of the dog, the
gentleman, and the lady.
Mr. and Mrs. Williams, after a time, commenced
housekeeping
,
in an expensive style, in Walnut-street. They were
discontented, and passed a winter in Washington. It was
worse there. They removed to Richmond, and finally to
New-York
.
They lived in splendourthey gave dinners and
parties, and were in return invited and feasted. All looked
beautiful, for a time,
without
, but the canker-worm feasted
within. In the winter of 1811-12, the once beautiful Sophia
was reduced to the state in which we have seen her at Doctor
Cadwallader's.
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.